<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89607-0014 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-07-89.f2.A1013</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 108 / Wednesday, June 7, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">10 CFR Parts 2 and 26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN: 3150-AC81</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Fitness-for-Duty Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Nuclear Regulatory Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule and statement of policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC) is issuing itsregulations to require licensees authorized to construct or operate nuclearpower reactors to implement a fitness-for-duty program. The general objectiveof this program is to provide reasonable assurance that nuclear power plantpersonnel are reliable, trustworthy, and not under the influence of anysubstance, legal or illegal, or mentally or physically impaired from anycause, which in any way adversely affects their ability to safely and competentlyperform their duties. A fitness-for-duty program developed under the requirementsof this rule is intended to create an environment which is free of drugsand the effects of such substances.The Commission is taking this action to significantly increase assuranceof public health and safety. The scientific evidence is conclusive thatsignificant decrements in cognitive and physical task performance resultfrom intoxication due to illicit drug abuse, as well as the use and misuseof legal substances. Given the addictive and impairing nature of certaindrugs, while recognizing that the presence of drug metabolites does notnecessarily relate directly to a current impaired state, the presence ofdrugs does strongly suggest the likelihood of past, present, or futureimpairment affecting job activities. In addition, the NRC believes thatthe reliability, integrity, and trustworthiness of persons working withinnuclear power plants is important to assure public health and safety. Sincethere is an underlying assumption that workers will abide by the licensee'spolicies and procedures, any involvement with illegal drugs shows thatthe worker cannot be relied upon to obey laws of a health and safety nature,indicating that the individual may not scrupulously follow rigorous proceduralrequirements with the integrity required in the nuclear power industryto assure public health and safety. In addition, the Commission is revisingits enforcement policy to reflect this fitness-for-duty rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE:</T2> July 7, 1989. The information collection requirementsin this final rule do not become effective until they are approved by theOffice of Management and Budget (OMB). The NRC will announce the date thatthe information collection requirements are approved in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Loren Bush, Reactor SafeguardsBranch, Division of Reactor Inspection and Safeguards, Office of NuclearReactor Regulation, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC20555, Telephone: (301) 492-0944.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>On September 22, 1988, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission published in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>(53 FR 36795) proposed amendments that wouldissue a new regulation 10 CFR Part 26, ``Fitness-for-Duty Program,'' whichwould require licensees who are authorized to operate nuclear power reactorsto implement a fitness-for-duty program that met uniform standards establishedby the rule to promote the public health and safety. Interested parties were invited to submit comments in connection withthe proposed amendments within 60 days after publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. There were a total of 3,079 comments made by378 responders and attendees during a public meeting held on October 17,1988. A detailed summary and analysis of the comments are contained inNUREG-1354, ``Fitness-for-Duty in the Nuclear Power Industry: Responsesto Public Comments.'' Upon consideration of the comments received bothin writing and during the public meeting and other factors involved, theNuclear Regulatory Commission has adopted the proposed regulations, withcertain modifications generally set forth below. Copies of NUREG-1354 may be purchased from the Superintendent of Documents,U.S. Government Printing Office, P.O. Box 37082, Washington, DC 20013-7082.Copies are also available from the National Technical Information Service,5285 Port Royal Road, Springfield, Virginia 22161. A copy is also availablefor public inspection and/or copying at the NRC Public Document Room, 2120L Street NW., lower level of the Gelman Building, Washington, DC. <ITAG tagnum="84">Comments and Responses to the Proposed Rule </ITAG>1.0 General Overview <ITAG tagnum="81">Summary of Comments </ITAG>The NRC received 378 comment letters in response to the Notice of ProposedRulemaking (NPRM). The NRC considered all comments submitted in a timelymanner in response to the NPRM and comments and questions received duringa public meeting on the draft rule held by the NRC. The comment periodfor the NPRM closed on November 21, 1988. Comments were received from the general public; from workers in nuclearpower plants; from union locals, national and international headquartersof unions; from the Nuclear Management and Resources Council (NUMARC),55 power reactor licensees, several non-power reactor licensees; from severalvendor and contractor organizations; and from other interested parties.There were several major issues presented by the commenters. These aresummarized along with the NRC responses in the sections that follow. Anoverview of these comments is provided in this section. Of primary concern to roughly half of all commenters was the requirementfor random drug testing. Although these commenters clearly objected tothe use of illegal drugs within the nuclear power industry, this provisionof the proposed rule drew a strong negative reaction from private citizens,labor unions, and workers covered by the proposed rule. Vigorous objectionswere stated based on the perceptions of invasion of privacy and conflictwith Constitutional rights resulting from the drug testing provision. Manyof these commenters  stressed that the level of substance abuse in thenuclear power industry is insufficient to justify such strong action, thatnuclear power plant workers have demonstrated their reliability over theyears, and that it is both demoralizing and insulting to require proofof their reliability through random drug tests. Other issues were raisedconcerning the legality of the proposed rule, including its relationshipto labor laws and state and local statutes. These objections are summarizedmore fully in the following sections. Those commenters opposing random testing were usually supportive of oneor more alternatives. Foremost among these was a combination of supervisorbehavioral observation and for-cause testing. While a few commenters opposedchemical testing of any type, most of the commenters, including union organizationsand members, expressed support for for-cause testing. Preaccess authorizationtesting also received some support and very little opposition. A major criticism of the proposed rule was raised concerning whether theNRC was basing the rule on concerns about on-the-job impairment or on concernsabout basic employee reliability, or even upon more general concerns withpublic morality. Some commenters expressed the opinion that off-site druguse should not be a concern of the NRC, and that the NRC should not requirea testing program that is not directly oriented to detecting current impairment.In contrast, most licensees and NUMARC provided general support for theprovision for random testing, viewing it as an effective deterrent to theuse of illegal drugs. However, they did object to the possibility thatthey would be too severely limited by the provision that licensee testingprograms must follow the HHS Guidelines. They wanted greater flexibilityin the establishment of cut-off levels and the panel of drugs to be covered.Most of the licensees expressed concern over the testing rate to be requiredby the rule, indicating that it should be at an annual rate equivalentto or less than 100 percent of the workforce subject to testing. They furtherobjected to any provisions that would make the licensee responsible forproviding employee assistance program services to contractor personneland objected to the extent and type of training required by the proposedrule. Other issues raised and more detail on these issues are providedin the sections that follow. 2.0 Need for Rule <ITAG tagnum="81">2.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>A number of commenters raised the issue that there was insufficient evidenceof a drug abuse problem in the nuclear power industry to justify the needfor the rule. Several commenters indicated that the NRC has failed to establisha factual record regarding the nature and extent of the drug abuse problem.Also mentioned was the opinion that the apparent lack of uniformily amongnuclear utility programs is not sufficient justification by the NRC forthe rule. <ITAG tagnum="81">2.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>Although drug use among nuclear power plant workers may not be as widespreadas in other segments of the population, the NRC does have information toindicate that there is a sufficient problem in the nuclear power industryto warrant the fitness-for-duty rule. For example, data provided by onelicensee indicates that 47 of approximately 4,000 random tests of employeeswere positive, 4 percent of the applicants for employment have tested positivefor drug use, and 30 employees and 60 contractors tested positive for cause.Pre-access testing of nearly 12,000 contractor personnel resulted in a5 percent positive rate. Another licensee reported that approximately 2percent of approximately 5,000 tests of employees and contractors werepositive, 179 persons tested positive for cause, and that the drugs involvedincluded PCP, marijuana, cocaine, amphetamines, barbiturates, alcohol andother drugs. Nationally, among licensees implementing random drug testingprograms, an average of around 1 percent of the random tests are positive.In the first nine months of 1988 there were 387 events involving drugsand alcohol reported to the NRC. These events included licensee and contractoremployees in all organizational levels and disciplines. Of particular concernto the NRC is that during the last year (1988), 11 licensed reactor operatorswere reported as being involved with drugs and two were reported as abusingalcohol; none were using these substances while on duty. The number of significant events reported to the NRC that involve druguse or abuse has been increasing dramatically since 1985. There was a 44percent increase in reported events between 1985 and 1986. A 73 percentincrease was experienced in 1987. This increase appears to be related tothe emphasis on fitness for duty by nuclear power licensees and the recentlyrevised safeguard reporting requirements that contained explicit guidancefor reporting of drug-related events. However, the increase may also bean indication of an increase in the incidence of drug problems at nuclearpower plants. These data provide sufficient evidence of a significant level of drug useby those employed in the nuclear power industry to support the need fora fitness-for-duty rule. Pursuant to the NRC's statutory authority to protectthe public health and safety, the NRC must acknowledge that nuclear powerplant workers are not immune to, nor insulated from, drug use or abuseof substances that may affect safety-critical job performance. The NRCbelieves that any drug use in the nuclear power industry warrants preventionand proactive intervention by the NRC to ensure public safety. The NRCbelieves that this view is consistent with the increasing awareness ofnuclear power licensees that have, as addressed in their comments, drugtesting and rehabilitation programs for their workers. 3.0 Impairment vs. Reliability <ITAG tagnum="81">3.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>A number of commenters questioned whether certain provisions of the rule,such as random drug testing, were based on concern over on-the-job impairmentor were based on concern over the reliability and trustworthiness of theworker. One set of commenters expressed the strongly held belief that mandatorychemical testing is only appropriate if there is evidence to suggest thatworkers are impaired on the job. Commenters also stated that, because urinalysisdoes not measure impairment, the detection of illicit drug use throughurinalysis is irrelevant to the safe operation of nuclear power plants,and thus should not be an element of the rule. Two commenters requestedfurther evidence regarding the impact of off-the-job drug use on job performance.One commenter stated that, although a positive urinalysis test result doesnot establish whether an individual was impaired at the time that the samplewas given, it allows the employer to determine drug use and conclude reasonablythat the possibility exists for future impairment which can impact workplacesafety. Other commenters noted that impairment is not the sole issue. A fundamentalconcern of drug abuse predominantly relates to the reliability and trustworthinessof the worker who knowingly uses drugs which are illegal. Several commenters,including NUMARC, noted the importance of worker reliability and trustworthinessin an access authorization program, and stated that the use of illegaldrugs on or off the job could adversely affect the safety of nuclear powerplant operations, or adversely reflect on the integrity, reliability andtrustworthiness of workers with unescorted access who are responsible fornuclear power plant safety. A number of commenters objected to specific wording in the proposed rulerelated to impairment. These commenters stated that the term ``impairment''is imprecise and subject to various interpretations. Another commenterstated that few nuclear power plant workers are qualified to make a judgmentof worker impairment, and that the term presumes an initial standard bywhich the worker's job performance can be measured. <ITAG tagnum="81">3.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC recognizes that illicit drug abuse and the misuse of legal substancessuch as alcohol, prescription drugs, and over-the-counter medications canimpair workers in the performance of their safety-related duties and resultin significantly reduced workforce reliability. The scientific evidenceis conclusive that significant decrements in cognitive and physical taskperformance result from intoxication due to illicit drug abuse, as wellas the use and misuse of legal substances. The NRC understands that, exceptin the case of alcohol, chemical test results do not reveal any directinformation regarding drug impairment per se. However, the NRC disagreeswith the argument made by commenters that, as a result, chemical testsdo not provide information that is relevant to a fitness-for-duty program.The NRC believes that the reliability, integrity, and trustworthiness ofworkers within nuclear power plants are important to public health andsafety. The granting of a license is based on the assumption that workerswill abide by the licensees' policies and procedures in all areas. Indicationsof lack of reliability, integrity or trustworthiness, therefore, even sofar as they pertain to off-site behaviors, are relevant to the NRC's needto assure that nuclear power plants are operated safely. The relationshipbetween reliability, integrity and impairment is by no means indirect inthe case of drug abuse. Most of the substances under consideration areeither physically or psychologically addictive to many individuals. TheNRC cannot be confident of the individual's ability to limit the use ofaddictive substances to situations that do not adversely affect plant safety.Illegal drug use can result in on-duty impairment. There is a possibilitythat a worker who uses illegal drugs off-duty may be impaired from thosedrugs while on-duty, and, even if the worker does not use drugs while onduty he or she may be impaired from either hangover or withdrawal effectsassociated with drug use. In addition to impairment, any illegal drug useestablishes that the worker cannot be relied upon to obey laws of a healthand safety nature, indicating that the worker also may not be reliablein terms of scrupulously following the rules and regulations that havebeen established in the nuclear workplace to ensure the protection of publichealth and safety. For these reasons, a worker who uses illegal drugs maynot be sufficiently trustworthy or reliable to perform his or her dutieson the job in a manner that assures public health and safety. In contrast,the legitimate use of legal drugs does not automatically demonstrate thislack of reliability. However, workers who do use alcohol or legal drugsare expected to use those substances responsibly. Irresponsible use ofthese substances in a manner that results or is likely to result in on-dutyimpairment, or otherwise demonstrates a disregard for public health andsafety, is considered substance misuse within the scope of this rule. The debilitating effects of long-term drug abuse are also well documentedin the scientific literature, and have the potential for affecting complexphysical and cognitive functions long after the effects of acute intoxicationhave dissipated. For example, residual effects of intoxication may persistwhen the worker returns to work the following day. Hangover effects, withdrawalsymptoms, and cycles of drug abuse and abstinence can also result in decreasedreliability and diligence. Off-site drug use may also result in increasedabsenteeism, medical costs, and staffing requirements, thus having adverseeffects on overall workforce reliability. Ultimately, drug abuse directlyand indirectly affects activities which bear on safety. It is thereforea reasonable conclusion that the abuse of illicit drugs and the misuseof licit drugs pose safety concerns in the nuclear power industry and ispredictive of a lack of reliability, integrity, and trustworthiness. The wide range of potential on-the-job impairment is complex in natureand difficult to observe, and therefore requires a broad approach to assurenuclear power plant safety. In addition to supervisory observation, othermeans are required to detect drug abuse, psychological stress, and physicalinjury or illness. To detect illicit drug abuse and the misuse of alcoholand other licit substances, the NRC has adopted a mandatory chemical testingprotocol for these drugs. The rule provides for mandatory chemical testingprior to the initial granting of unescorted access or assignment to activitieswithin the scope of the rule (andSection; 26.24(a)[1]). Mandatory chemicaltesting is to be conducted on a random basis to effectively detect anddeter illicit substance abuse and misuse (andSection; 26.24(a)[2]). For-causetesting is to be conducted after an accident in which the contributionof employee performance cannot be ruled out or based on reasonable suspicionthat an individual is intoxicated or demonstrates behavior indicative ofsubstance abuse or other involvement with drugs (andSection; 26.24(a)[3]).Following a positive test for drug abuse, follow-up chemical testing willbe used on an unannounced basis to verify abstention from the use of drugsor misuse of alcohol and other licit drugs (andSection; 26.24(a)[4]). The NRC agrees that on-the-job impairment is a result of many complex factors,and that impairment is a complex phenomenon, depending on the cause ofimpairment, individual circumstances, and the job task at hand. The NRCrecognizes that on-the-job impairment may result from substance abuse,psychological stress, or physical injury or ailment which can pose unacceptablesafety risks, and the rule reflects this position. The NRC believes thattrained, competent, reliable, and trustworthy workers are essential forthe safe operation of nuclear power plants. The fitness-for-duty rule addressesthe potential for worker impairment of any kind, including substance abusethat could affect the safe operation of nuclear power plants. In the assessmentof a worker's application for access authorization, the background of theworker, psychological state, and criminal record are assessed. Similarly,any use of or involvement with illicit drugs, on or off duty, and the misuseof alcohol and other licit drugs provide evidence that the worker may notbe fit for duty. The NRC recognizes that even with a relatively high rate of random testingand with vigilance on the part of licensees to detect impairment or potentialimpairment in the workplace, the existence of drug problems within theworkplace cannot be entirely eliminated. The undetected presence of drugscan be inferred from even a low positive test rate. However, the NRC concludesthat the design features, redundancy of safety systems, and extensive trainingfor unexpected equipment and personnel malfunctions provide reasonableassurance that the public health and safety is protected provided drugabuse continues to be aggressively addressed by the nuclear industry. Thefinal rule provides reasonable measures to assure that nuclear power plantworkers can safely, competently, and reliably perform their duties. 4.0 Scope of Rule <ITAG tagnum="81">4.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>4.1.1 <T3>Non-Power Reactors and other Licensees. </T3> Several comments werereceived from universities and others involved with research reactors orother non-power reactors. The commenters stated that there is no need toextend coverage of the rule to these facilities because a drug-relatedproblem has not been demonstrated to exist and that a relatively minorthreat is posed by these facilities to the public safety. Unbearable costsand impracticality were also cited as arguments against inclusion of thesefacilities in the rule. A few comments were received from individuals involvedwith SNM handling, making the same general points. There were no commentssupportive of expanding coverage of the rule to facility types other thannuclear power reactors. 4.1.2 <T3>Construction.</T3> Comments were received from two licensees recommendingthat the language of the rule be changed to include plants during the constructionphase. 4.1.3 <T3>Types of Workers Covered. </T3>The random testing provisions of theproposed rule would apply to all persons granted unescorted access to protectedareas at operating nuclear power reactors. Most of the commenters who objectedto this provision commented to the effect that including all individualswith unescorted access to protected areas is unnecessary, and assertedthat many of these individuals, e.g., vendors, secretaries, clerks, andsome engineering and management personnel, have no potential for precipitatingor escalating a safety-related incident. As an alternative, it was suggestedthat only those licensee or contractor personnel with unescorted accessto vital plant areas should be subject to random testing, since this more-limitedgroup was viewed as including all individuals with the capacity to do significant,safety-related harm. 4.1.4 <T3>Contractors. </T3>Many commenters pointed out the lack of specificityconcerning licensee vs. contractor responsibilities. Most of these, mainlyfrom licensees, were of the opinion that the contractor should have fullresponsibility for a qualified fitness-for-duty program. 4.1.5 <T3>Technical Support Center (TSC) and Emergency Operations Facility (EOF)Staff. </T3>Several comments received on this issue stated that licenseeor contractor personnel who may be required to respond to the TSC or EOFhave been granted unescorted access and so are already covered under therule and need not be specifically mentioned in andSection; 26.3. Commentersquestioned whether any non-licensee or non-contractor personnel involvedwith the TSC or EOF would have to be covered under the fitness-for-dutyprogram.4.1.6 <T3>NRC Staff and NRC Representatives. </T3>Many commenters contended thatNRC staff should be subject to the same fitness-for-duty requirements,including random testing, as are licensee staff. Some thought that NRCrepresentatives should be subject to these requirements also. <ITAG tagnum="81">4.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>4.2.1 <T3>Non-Power Reactors and other Licensees. </T3>The NRC sees no reasonat this time to extend coverage of the rule to other facility types. Nomodifications to the rule are required to satisfy the concerns addressedby the comments, because the rule is presently limited to nuclear powerreactors. The NRC may consider extending the coverage of the rule at afuture time. 4.2.2 <T3>Construction. </T3>The NRC agrees with the comments received that licenseesholding construction permits should fall under the scope of this rule tothe extent that a minimum program is provided. Wording indicating the provisionsof the rule that pertain to construction sites has been added at Sections26.2(b) and (c). 4.2.3 <T3>Types of Workers Covered. </T3>The NRC believes that the inclusionof all workers with unescorted access to the protected area within thescope of the rule is the proper response to the threat constituted by substanceabuse. All such workers have the ability to carry in and distribute impairingsubstances. All such workers can engage in deliberate or accidental actionsthat can lead to challenges to safety systems or interfere with the abilityof other workers to safely operate and maintain the plant. Although Federalrequirements preempt State and local concerns in the area of radiologicalsafety, in those states that support an on-site presence requiring unescortedaccess, the NRC may consider providing access to the chemical testing portionsof the NRC's fitness-for-duty program if so requested by the individualstates.  4.2.4 <T3>Contractors. </T3>The NRC believes that it is appropriate to hold licenseesresponsible for all workers to whom the licensee grants unescorted access,whether the workers are licensee employees or contractor or vendor personnel.The manner in which the licensee assures that contractor and vendor personnelare subject to the requirements of the fitness-for-duty program describedin this part is left to licensee discretion, however. For example, nothingin the rule prohibits licensees from accepting the fitness-for-duty programsof their large contractors and vendors when those programs are effectiveand meet the requirements of this part. At their discretion, licenseesmay also choose to provide chemical testing and training for contractorand vendor personnel who are granted unescorted access to protected areasof a plant. This provision would likely be used when the contracting organizationshave insufficient resources to support their own fitness-for-duty programs.The rule would require the licensee to provide a procedure to enable acontractor employee to appeal a positive alcohol or drug determination;this would not apply where the contractor is administering his own alcoholand drug testing. In recognition of the temporary relationship betweenlicensees and most of their contractors and vendors, the NRC does not requirethe licensees to ensure that EAP services are provided to contract workers.However, nothing in the rule prohibits licensees from making these servicesavailable to contractor employees. 4.2.5 <T3>Technical Support Center (TSC) and Emergency Operations Facility (EOF)Staff. </T3>The NRC believes that it is particularly important that individualswho have TSC and EOF assignments related to nuclear power plant safetycan be relied on to perform under the emergency conditions that would requirethem physically to report to the TSC or the EOF. To clarify the Commission'sintentions in this matter, the words ``physically report'' have been addedto andSection; 26.2(a) of the rule. State and local representatives who maybe present in licensee emergency facilities located outside the protectedarea and do not have responsibilities directly affecting reactor safetyare not covered by the rule. Otherwise, these representatives would becovered by the licensee's program, or as an  alternative, be covered bythe NRC's program. Licensee employees, contractors, or vendor representativeswho are unexpectedly called to licensee emergency facilities during anaccident are also not covered by the rule as this group is ill definedand likely to be used only in supplementary capabilities. 4.2.6 <T3>NRC Staff and NRC Representatives. </T3>The NRC agrees with the commenterswho asserted that NRC staff and representatives should also be subjectto fitness-for-duty requirements. However, the NRC cannot allow the accessof its employees to any part of the licensee's nuclear power facilitiesto be restricted. The NRC needs prompt, unfettered access to properly performits regulatory duties and the proper performance of these duties requirespublic confidence that NRC employees not be intimidated or impeded in anyway by those they are responsible for regulating. In general, the NRC expectsthat any NRC employee who requires unescorted access will be subject tothe chemical testing provisions of the NRC's fitness-for-duty program.The Commission must reserve the right to obtain unescorted access for anyof its employees. The NRC also agrees that its contractors must be fit for duty and may covercertain of its contractors under the chemical testing provisions of theNRC plan. The Commission expects that NRC contractors who are granted unescortedaccess will either be subject to the NRC's program, the licensee's program,or to a program that the NRC accepts as adequate. To be consistent withthe Commission's intent, ``representatives'' has been deleted from andSection;26.2(a) of the rule, and replaced with ``employees.'' 5.0 Chemical Testing <ITAG tagnum="81">5.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>A large number of comments were received concerning the chemical testingprovisions of the rule. These pertained primarily to the random testingprovisions, but comments were also received concerning testing before grantingunescorted access, for-cause testing, and follow-up testing.The comments on random testing were directed both toward random testing,in general, and the proposed use of urinalysis as a testing technique,in particular. Comments were received that provided statements of generalsupport or opposition to the random testing provisions. Comments were alsoreceived that raised questions about specific elements of the random testingprogram in the proposed rule. 5.1.1 <T3>Opposition to Random Testing. </T3>Opposition to random testing wasexpressed by numerous individuals; several unions including the Brotherhoodof Carpenters and Joiners of America, the Utility Workers of America, andthe International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers; over 200 union membersas part of a letter writing campaign; one utility; and a few other organizations.While most explicitly supported the goal of a drug-free workplace, oppositionto random testing as a means to achieve this goal was stated in the strongestterms. A number of reasons were given for opposition to random testing. Many commenterswere specifically opposed to random testing as an unwarranted invasionof privacy. Numerous commenters expressed the opinion that random testingis an infringement of Constitutional rights. Several questioned whetherthe extent of the drug problem in the nuclear industry warranted such drasticaction. Other reasons cited for opposition to random testing included:andbullet; The view that random testing is ineffective in achieving the NRC'sgoals of deterrence and detection, andbullet; Better techniques are available for deterring and detecting druguse, andbullet; Random testing is excessively burdensome and expensive,andbullet;  Random testing is embarrassing and demeaning, andbullet; Random testing creates morale problems and may thus lead to theloss of qualified and drug-free workers from the industry, and andbullet; Inaccuracies in the testing process will lead to innocent peoplebeing accused and punished for wrong-doing. 5.1.2 <T3>Support for Random Testing. </T3>While many licensees viewed randomtesting as only one part of a comprehensive fitness-for-duty-program, mostlicensees and NUMARC expressed strong support for random testing as a majorcomponent of an effective program. This view was shared by several otherorganizations, such as contractors and vendors, as well as many individuals.NUMARC cited industry experience that the implementation of random testingprograms has typically resulted in lower levels of drug problems. Local No. 51 of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers expressedsupport for random testing when it is supplemented by behavioral observation.The Local reported that the affected workforce at the Illinois Power CompanyClinton Nuclear Station is tested on a random basis each day and that thistesting program, coupled with behavioral observation, has apparently provento be a deterrent to drug abuse. This testing program was achieved throughcollective bargaining and is considered by the Local to be a valuable workingpractice. A check with the utility revealed that 100 percent of the workforceis given an unannounced test on an annual basis; and in addition, all personsare subject to random testing at a 20 percent rate. Since the rate of positivetests has significantly declined, the utility may plan to lower the rates.5.1.3 <T3>Alternatives to Random Testing. </T3>A number of comments were receivedin response to the NRC's request for information on alternatives to randomtesting. The unions and affiliated locals and individuals, a number ofother individuals, two licensees, and a few other organizations expressedthe opinion that the goals of random testing could better be addressedthrough other methods. The majority of these commenters stated that a combinationof behavioral observation, primarily on the part of the supervisor, andfor-cause testing was both adequate and effective. Opinions were expressedthat behavioral observation and for-cause testing have the advantages ofnot subjecting everyone to needless tests, dealing with fitness-for-dutyproblems in addition to drug abuse, and being more likely to stand up underreview of the courts than random urinalysis. Most licensees also supportedbehavioral observation and for-cause testing, although not as a substitutefor random testing. A number of commenters suggested specific observational techniques includingcomputer-assisted neurophysiological and neuropsychological tests, physicalskills tests such as those used by law enforcement personnel, and OcularKinetics. Others suggested that the annual physical be used to screen fordrug abuse, either through chemical testing or observation. Unannounced,random medical examinations were also proposed. Sacramento Municipal UtilityDistrict provided a detailed description of its program based on screeningby trained medical personnel. This program was also cited by a few othercommenters. Several commenters proposed that drug awareness and health education weremore effective deterrents. Other commenters stated that greater emphasison rehabilitation would be more effective than random drug testing. A few commenters suggested that pre-employment or pre-access drug screeningwas adequate. A few additional commenters preferred announced or periodicunannounced testing to random testing. Finally, a few commenters suggestedthat the NRC direct its attention to the underlying causes of drug abuse,such as the alleged poor work environment at nuclear power plants, ratherthan at detecting and punishing drug users. 5.1.4 <T3>Specific Changes in Random Drug Testing Provisions. </T3>Among thecommenters who generally accepted the provision for random drug testing,a number of comments were received concerning the specific approach outlinedin the proposed rule. Many of these comments, such as those having to dowith drug types and cut-off levels, are summarized elsewhere. One majorconcern, however, had to do with the rate of testing to be required bythe NRC. Although the NRC had specifically requested comments on the preferred rateof testing, many commenters felt that the intention of the NRC was to requiretesting at a rate of 300 percent annually. Most of the comments received,therefore, addressed whether a 300 percent annual rate of testing shouldbe imposed. The 300 percent testing rate received very little support among those whootherwise supported random testing. NUMARC and most licensees stated thatindustry experience demonstrated that many fitness-for-duty programs hadbeen successful with substantially lower rates of testing. Several commentersstated the opinion that a 300 percent testing rate would be unnecessarilyburdensome to the licensee in terms of costs, and to the individual interms of repeated testing. A number of commenters questioned whether informationfrom military experience that was apparently used in the NRC's decisionto propose a 300 percent testing rate was appropriate to the nuclear powerindustry with its older and more stable workforce. Finally, one commenterquestioned whether the testing laboratories could effectively handle theworkload implied by a 300 percent testing rate. Numerous commenters suggested alternatives to the 300 percent testing rate.Proposals ranged from a 5 percent per year rate to a 200 percent per yearrate. However, NUMARC and most licensees proposed a 100 percent annualtest rate for the random testing program. They further requested that the100 percent rate be reevaluated based on the experience of utilities, andbe reduced to a 25 percent rate if warranted by experience. A few commentersrequested that the testing rate be left to the discretion of the individuallicensee, because licensee management would be most knowledgeable abouttheir particular situations. A number of other testing strategies were proposed. One basic approachthat was favored by several commenters was to require unannounced annualtesting of all workers, augmented by random testing at a lower rate, suchas 25 percent per year. Several other commenters suggested techniques forprotecting individuals from being over tested. These included a requestthat a worker not be re-tested until all other workers have been tested,a request that tested workers be subjected to a lower rate of testing forthe balance of the year, and that there be limits imposed on the maximumnumber of tests for a particular worker in a given year.Commenters also expressed the opinion that workers of different types shouldbe tested at different rates. A few commenters expressed the opinion thatthe testing rate should be relaxed for workers in non-safety critical jobs.Many commenters requested that licensees be allowed to establish differenttesting programs for their own, versus contractor or vendor, employees.Specifically, a number of utilities stated that treating all workers asone population would result in those workers who are permanently on-sitebeing tested more frequently than those workers who are on-site for onlypart of the year. By having separate testing populations for licensee andcontractor or vendor employees, the commenters felt that the burden oftesting would be distributed more fairly. Two inquiries were received concerning policy for those randomly selectedindividuals who are not on-site at the time they are selected. One commenterasked how they would be folded back into the testing population. The otherstated the position that the workers should not be required to return towork solely for the drug test. Several comments were received requesting changes in the definitions ofrandom and unannounced tests contained in andSection; 26.3. <ITAG tagnum="81">5.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC is sensitive to the issues raised in opposition to random testingin general and to random urine testing in particular. Nevertheless, theNRC believes that there is sufficient evidence supporting the effectivenessof random testing in deterring and detecting substance abuse and that acarefully designed chemical testing program covering persons authorizedfor unescorted access to the protected area of nuclear power facilitiesis warranted at this time. As indicated below, in response to the sensitiveissues of privacy and protection of individual rights, the NRC has takengreat care to provide strict specimen collection procedures, chain-of-custody,laboratory certification, test confirmation, and confidentiality requirementswithin the rule. The NRC is convinced by evidence from the military andfrom licensees already implementing random testing procedures that randomtesting is an essential and effective component of the fitness-for-dutyprogram. The NRC has designed the rule to minimize, to the extent possible,the expense and burden of the chemical testing component upon licensees,contractors, vendors, and upon their workers. Stringent quality assurancerequirements are imposed upon the licensees, contractors, and vendors aswell as upon the laboratories that will be conducting the chemical teststo ensure that test results will be accurate and that false positive resultswill be essentially eliminated. Although the NRC believes that behavioral observation and for-cause testingcomprise important elements of a substance abuse deterrence and preventionprogram, and has included them in its rule, it does not believe that, atpresent, these elements alone are sufficient to provide the level of deterrenceand detection necessary. Nevertheless, the NRC appreciates the potentialvalue of developing techniques in behavioral observation and detectionof impairment through testing, and intends to monitor progress in theseareas. It is prepared to modify the requirements of the fitness-for-dutytesting program to incorporate such elements as they become viable, aslong as the techniques address the reliability and trustworthiness issueof use as well as the safety issue of current impairment. The NRC is sensitive to the importance of employee morale to plant safety,and has taken care to provide safeguards in the program to assure the fairness,uniformity, and accuracy of the random testing. The NRC also recognizesthe value of health education and rehabilitation programs in assistingworkers and in deterring substance abuse, and notes evidence that randomtesting programs have been found to be an effective incentive for workersto seek information and assistance. To this end, the NRC has included inthe rule, as discussed below, requirements for a licensed physician toreview positive test results prior to notification of the licensee, andis requiring that licensee workers have access to an employee assistanceprogram designed to provide assessment, short-term counseling, referralservices, and treatment and follow-up monitoring. The NRC has considered a number of alternative rates and sampling proceduresto address the many comments received. The NRC agrees that the high ratesof testing needed in the military may not be as essential for the nuclearpower industry, as long as adequate coverage and deterrence is assured.In this regard, the NRC notes that the Navy, using a 300 percent per yeartesting rate, observes about 5 percent positive tests. Commenters in thenuclear industry, with random testing programs, reported less than 1 percentpositive tests, with a utility using a 100 percent per year rate reporting0.5 percent positive. This appears to be reflective of a substantiallydifferent workforce population. The approaches considered were: andbullet; Alternative A from the proposed rule, which sets the two goalsthat at least 90 percent of the workforce be tested and that the testingrate for the already-tested population during a year not be set lower thana rate equal to 30 percent of the workforce. The disadvantage of this alternativeis its complexity of administration and the provision of a lesser deterrentduring part of the year. andbullet; Alternative B from the draft rule that requires testing at a rateequal to 300 percent of the workforce. The disadvantage of this alternativeis the possible excessive disruption of work activities and the testingof a few individuals at a very high rate which may impact morale. The costof this rate may be excessive given the reported low number of positivetests for testing rates at 100 percent per year or lower in the nuclearindustry. andbullet; A method whereby each worker is randomly assigned a day duringthe next 365 days on which to be tested, and then is randomly reassignedto a day in the following 365-day period. The worker could be tested severaltimes in one year, but is guaranteed at least one test per year. This allowsfor testing of the entire workforce during any 365-day period and reducesthe testing rate in comparison to Alternative B (estimated rate: 200 percent).However, there is a possibility that more workers may be selected for testingon a given day than the licensee has a capacity to test. The disadvantageof this alternative is the need to select testing dates well in advanceand the security problems which may result. andbullet; A method whereby all workers are subjected to unannounced testingonce during the year, and random testing at a low rate (e.g., 25 percent-50percent) is also used during the year to assure ongoing deterrence. andbullet; A method whereby random testing is conducted at a rate equal toapproximately 100 percent of the workforce, resulting in about two-thirdsof the workers being tested during the course of a given year. This isthe alternative selected by the Commission and is reflected in the finalrule. While the NRC has considered a number of alternatives, several of the alternativesproposed by commenters were eliminated. The proposals for testing rateslower than 100 percent per year cannot currently be supported, althoughthe NRC will consider reducing testing rates after several years basedon positive experience in the industry. For the time being, however, theNRC believes that testing rates substantially below the 100 percent ratewould not assure adequate deterrence. The NRC does not anticipate licenseesexperiencing significant problems in finding laboratory capacity to supportrates in excess of 100 percent. Because of the need to assure an adequateminimum rate of testing, the NRC cannot leave the choice of a testing ratesolely to the discretion of the individual licensee. The proposal that workers not be retested until all other workers are testedand the proposal that there be a specified maximum number of times thatworkers are tested within a year cannot be supported because they wouldmake the process non-random and would defeat some of the deterrent valueof testing. Several of the above alternatives would have the effect oflimiting the amount of retesting on particular individuals. The NRC recognizes that vendor and contractor personnel could be subjectedto lower rates of testing to the extent that they are not on-site for theentire year. The NRC believes that there are several strategies availableto deal with the implied over-testing of licensee employees. The licenseecan divide those being tested into discrete populations (e.g., employeesand contractors, or even by contractor). The NRC expects that all categoriesof workers will be tested in accordance with the alternative rate and procedureselected for the final rule. The NRC will permit the licensee to samplewithin categories of workers, to sample randomly on at least a weekly basisamong those currently on-site, or to employ some other method that satisfiesthe standards of the selected alternative for all categories of workerscovered under this part.The NRC does not believe that additional guidance is needed on how to dealwith workers who are not on-site when they are randomly selected for testing.Current practice is to either test them immediately upon return to thesite (with a supporting procedure that prevents disclosure of their selection),place them in a special pool of people to be randomly selected within afew weeks, or to return the person to the testing pool and select someoneelse. Usually, the licensee assures itself that there is a legitimate reasonfor the absence, and, if any patterns are evident an investigation is usuallyconducted along with for-cause tests. Current industry practice is consideredadequate on this point. 6.0 Reliability of Test Results <ITAG tagnum="81">6.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>The NRC received numerous comments pertaining to the reliability of testresults. Several comments in this category expressed concern about theperceived high rate of false positive results and the possible consequencesto workers. An official of the Utility Workers Union of America contendedthat immunoassay screening tests have false positive rates of 5 percent.A private individual cited a Human Relations Institute andamp; Clinic's reportclaiming that laboratories using initial and confirmatory test procedureshave had false positive rates ranging from 4.5 percent to 23.8 percent.Two commenters, a private individual, and an International Brotherhoodof Electrical Workers (IBEW) union member asserted that testing laboratoriesin general have had false positive rates of 30 percent to 60 percent, respectively.The United Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners of America and two unionlocals, one of the IBEW and another of the Coalition of California UtilityWorkers, cited Center for Disease Control (CDC) study data from the early1980s to claim that testing technologies are too inaccurate. One set ofcomments, mostly from the IBEW, wanted the NRC to ensure a 100 percent,or error-free, testing rate. Commenters attributed false positives to lowcut-off levels, cross reactivity between drugs, and the varying levelsof voided metabolites in the body associated with marijuana use. One commenter,the Utility Workers Union of America, thought that individuals who hadreceived false positives should be awarded monetary compensation. Anothercommenter, the United Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners of America,contended that the EMIT 100 test used in initial screening had too highfalse negative rates. Some commenters, mostly NUMARC and 39 licensees supporting the NUMARC comment,thought that the validity of the test results could be challenged eitherby the generation of true positives from use of over-the-counter drugsand other legal substances or by the mishandling of samples. Four othercommenters (Florida Power and Light, the Oil, Chemical and Atomic WorkersUnion [OCAW], an IBEW union worker, and a private individual) identifiedthe following as possible challenges to the validity of test results: mislabelingor misidentification of samples; use of improper sample collection techniques;inadequate safeguards against tampering; failure of laboratory equipment;passive inhalation of marijuana; time of day of the sample; and erroneousreading of test results. NUMARC and OCAW recommended adherence to chain-of-custodyprocedures, in general, while the Wisconsin Electric Power Company andthe United Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners of America specificallyrecommended those procedures outlined in the HHS Guidelines. The DuquesneLight Company recommended that chain-of-custody procedures be followedat the site and in the laboratory. Houston Lighting and Power asked theNRC to prohibit personnel from working in the ``Fitness-for-Duty Program''(that is, the testing program) who have relatives working at the site.<ITAG tagnum="81">6.2 Summary of Responses</ITAG>The NRC acknowledges the concerns regarding the rate of false positivesand specimen collection and handling techniques, and recognizes that theseconcerns are based upon problems that existed several years ago when drugtesting programs were being introduced. The Federal Aviation Administration,in their response to public comments on the same matter (53 FR 47032, November21, 1988), provided a clear response that we find no reason to improve:<ITAG tagnum="21"> * * * In the early years of drug testing and analysis, laboratorysecurity and analytical procedures had not reached today's level of sophistication.False-positive test results occur primarily in analysis of a specimen duringan initial screening test, although contemporary screening tests, suchas immunoassay tests, have become extremely accurate and approach 99 percentaccuracy levels. Despite its increased accuracy, the initial screeningtest remains a less expensive test used only to yield a preliminary indicationof the possible presence of drugs or drug metabolites. In order to ensurethe integrity and accuracy of any test result, each positive initial screeningtest result must be confirmed using GC/MS analysis. The GC/MS confirmationtest is an extremely accurate and sophisticated test and is virtually error-freewhen used in compliance with the DHHS guidelines * * * The Mandatory TestingGuidelines will provide a system of checks and balances during collectionand analysis of specimens. This system ensures the integrity and accuracyof the tests using appropriate scientific methods and rigid chain-of-custodyprocedures * * * Since the mid-1980s, laboratories have become increasinglysophisticated in their analytical methods and chain-of-custody procedures.Many laboratories have compiled extensive records demonstrating scientificaccuracy and protection of individual specimens. For example, CompuChemLaboratories, a major drug testing laboratory, has analyzed over 500,000urine samples, conducting discrete testing for nine different drugs whichresulted in nearly five million distinct analyses of these specimens, since1980. CompuChem also has analyzed approximately 750,000 urine samples forthe presence of two different drugs, resulting in nearly 1.5 million analysesof these specimens, pursuant to its contract with the military. None ofthe over six million analyses performed for DOT, the military, and otherprivate and public entities has resulted in a false-positive test result.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> In late 1987, a CompuChem clerical worker incorrectly labeled twosamples that belonged to DOT employees. Within hours after the test resultswere questioned by the Medical Review Officer, CompuChem and the MedicalReview Officer had identified and corrected the error. CompuChem was notsatisfied with its prompt resolution of the error. As stated in its commentto the NPRM, CompuChem has instituted an additional system of review byCompuChem personnel and computer checks, to ensure that ``* * * this onein a million error will not reoccur. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Another drug testing firm, PharmChem Laboratories, has conducted overeight million nonmilitary drug tests nationwide. In its statement to FAAduring the public hearing held in San Francisco on June 9, 1988, PharmChemnotes that several courts have determined that the GC/MS confirmation testis virtually 100 percent accurate, assuming that proper chain-of-custodyprocedures are followed * * *</ITAG>The NRC has adopted the provisions of the HHS Guidelines with some modificationsto further ensure the integrity and accuracy of test results using appropriatescientific methods and rigid chain-of-custody procedures at the site andin the testing laboratory. The confirmatory testing process also eliminatesany false presumptive positive tests resulting from a cross-reacting drugdetected during initial screening. As cross-reacting substances are generallyprescription or over-the-counter medications, testing procedures in a licensee'sfitness-for-duty program will include an inquiry on the individual's useof these medications. Chain-of-custody procedures and a system of reviews, checks, and balancesduring collection and analysis of specimens outlined in the NRC Guidelineslimit and prevent errors and possible subversions. To protect the workerfrom inappropriate sanction due to any errors in the testing process, cross-reactingsubstances, or legitimate medical use of controlled sustances, a MedicalReview Officer (MRO) screens all presumed positive test results and mayinterview those individuals who have tested positive with the GC/MS confirmatorytest. The MRO is trained in prescription and over-the-counter (OTC) druginteraction as well as the physical signs of illicit drug abuse. A comprehensivediscussion of the MRO's responsibilities and a discussion of matters suchas clinical signs of abuse are contained in the ``Medical Review OfficerManual: A Guide to Evaluating Urine in Drug Analysis'' (September 1988)published by the National Institute on Drug Abuse. The worker has an opportunityto identify any ingested licit, prescription, OTC drugs as well as certainfood substances that may affect a test result. The chain-of-custody andcollection procedures outlined in the NRC Guidelines, along with computertechniques of tracking specimens, limit the probability of mishandling,mislabeling, and misidentification of samples. The NRC Guidelines alsooutline procedures for the collection of samples to ensure the integrityof the samples and to limit opportunities for sample tampering. To furtherlimit the possibility of subversion of the integrity of the testing process,the NRC Guidelines require licensees to carefully select persons responsiblefor administering the testing program based upon the highest standardsfor honesty and integrity and to implement measures appropriate to ensurethat these standards are maintained. Background evaluations of testingprogram personnel would be conducted to verify the integrity of such individualsgiven the potential misuse of that position. Behavioral observation andperiodic re-conduct of the background evaluations would assure continuedintegrity. Supervisory personnel and an individual's co-workers would beprohibited from performing as collection site personnel and consequentlyfrom being involved in the chain-of-custody process. The NRC does not believe that ``passive inhalation'' of marijuana smokewill lead to false positives. Studies conducted to simulate conditionsthat result in passive inhalation have not accurately reflected conditionsoutside the laboratory often using artificially devised and extremely confinedareas with poor ventilation, followed by immediate testing after prolongedexposure. The cut-off levels in the NRC Guidelines will be set sufficientlyhigh to preclude the possibility of controversy due to chances that a positivetest resulted from passive inhalation. The NRC notes that a trustworthinessquestion may be raised even in the case of passive inhalation. The onlyeffect associated with the time of day of the sample is that urine samplescollected earlier in the day contain higher concentrations of drugs ordrug metabolites. Samples collected earlier in the day do not generatemore false positives as initial positives are still confirmed with theGC/MS test. Erroneous reading of test results would be limited by chain-of-custodyprocedures and the system of reviews required of testing laboratories.7.0 Training and Behavioral Observation <ITAG tagnum="81">7.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>The NRC received numerous comments regarding the scope of training requiredof licensee, contractor, and vendor personnel granted unescorted accessto protected areas. Most commenters concurred that training should be providedto all employees covered under the rule to ensure that they understandthe licensee's fitness-for-duty program, their responsibilities, the consequencesof substance abuse, and the availability of assistance through the EmployeeAssistance Program (EAP). In accordance with NUMARC, many commenters supportedthe training of supervisory and managerial personnel in behavioral observationtechniques and procedures for initiating appropriate corrective action,including referral of employees for medical assessment or counseling. However,a majority of commenters also expressed strong opposition to the proposedlevel of training required of non-supervisory personnel assigned escortduties (andSection; 26.22[b]). The NRC also received a significant number of comments regarding the requirementthat initial training of licensee personnel be completed prior to assignmentof duties within the scope of this rule and within three months of initialsupervisory assignment, as applicable (andSection;andSection; 26.21[b] and26.22[c]). Most of these commenters requested that the NRC revise the proposedrule to allow drug awareness and behavioral observation training to becompleted within six months of initial supervisory assignment. Commentersalso suggested that refresher training be completed every two years ratherthan annually. <ITAG tagnum="81">7.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC has revised the proposed rule to clarify its intent that escortpersonnel are not required to receive training in supervisory responsibilities.The revised rule requires that all non-supervisory personnel assigned toescort duties must be familiar with techniques for recognizing drugs andindications of the use, sale, or possession of drugs; be familiar withtechniques for recognizing aberrant behavior; and be knowledgeable of theproper procedures for reporting incidents of aberrant behavior to the appropriatemanagement authorities. The NRC received many comments opposing the required completion of drugawareness and behavioral observation training of supervisory and managerialpersonnel within three months of initial supervisory assignment. However,because of the critical position that supervisory and managerial personnelserve in detecting impaired workers, the NRC has determined that the currentprovision regarding supervisory training is necessary and will remain asstated in the rule. The NRC has also determined that the provision requiring licensee personnelto receive annual refresher training in drug awareness and behavioral observationtechniques will remain as stipulated in the proposed rule. Because supervisorypersonnel represent the first line of defense against fitness-for-dutyproblems, it is critical that they be trained to recognize these problemsand handle them appropriately. Therefore, the NRC believes that the trainingof supervisory and managerial personnel in behavioral observation techniqueswill provide licensees with an invaluable tool for the detection and deterrenceof drug-and alcohol-related impairment and for the detection of impairmentfrom other causes. Because of the significant level of knowledge and trainingrequired to accurately detect subtle indications of drug or alcohol impairmentand the critical need to identify drug and alcohol abusers before theycompromise public safety, the NRC believes it is prudent to require supervisorytraining on an annual basis, or more frequently when necessary. In addition,the NRC will continue to require annual refresher training of all non-supervisorypersonnel to ensure that licensee and contractor employees understand therequirements of the licensee's fitness-for-duty program, are aware of theirresponsibilities, and, in the case of licensee employees, are aware ofopportunities for assistance available through EAP services. NRC auditsof licensee programs and interviews with contractor and licensee personnelhave indicated a need for this level of refresher training. 8.0 For-Cause Testing <ITAG tagnum="81">8.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>8.1.1 <T3>Suitability of For-Cause Testing. </T3>As summarized earlier, manycommenters stated that they were in favor of for-cause testing in placeof alternative testing methods such as random testing. 8.1.2 <T3>Definition of Impairment. </T3>Several commenters including NUMARCstated that the current definition of for-cause testing is too broad. Suggestionsfor improvement included replacing ``is impaired'' with ``may be impaired''or ``may have demonstrated aberrant behavior.'' Finally, commenters statedthat most of the examples in paragraph 26.24(a)(3) of when for-cause testingshould be required need better definition. Several examples were suggested.8.1.3 <T3>Testing Following an Accident.</T3> Several commenters stated thatrequiring for-cause testing following an accident would inhibit root causeanalysis of the accident. One commenter stated that for-cause testing shouldbe required after a serious accident. 8.1.4 <T3>Initiation of Testing.</T3> Several commenters addressed who shouldbe allowed to initiate for-cause testing. Several commenters stated that``impaired behavior'' can only be determined by a physician or other healthcare professional. Others thought that a minimum of two management officialsmust document an employee's impairment. One commenter stated that for-causetesting should not be the result of a ``discrete expression of concernby a nameless accuser.'' <ITAG tagnum="81">8.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC agrees with the commenters that the definition of the circumstancesin which ``for-cause testing'' is appropriate should be clarified. Thedefinition provided in andSection; 26.3 has been deleted and the languagein  andSection; 26.24(a)(3) has been revised. The NRC does not agree thatimpaired behavior can only be determined by a physician or other healthcare professional. Supervisors are close to their workers and directlymonitor worker performance, often on a daily basis. The NRC also does notagree that a minimum of two managers should be required to document a worker'simpaired behavior. In some cases, the impaired behavior may be observedby only one manager during a task that cannot be easily repeated. 9.0 Sanctions <ITAG tagnum="81">9.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>9.1.1 <T3>Period of Denial of Access.</T3> Sections 26.27(b)(2) and (b)(3) stipulatethat, as a minimum, the first positive test confirmed by the Medical ReviewOfficer shall result in immediate removal from access for at least 14 daysand referral to an EAP for assessment and counseling. Any subsequent confirmedpositive test would result in removal from unescorted access for a minimumof three years. A worker who is involved in the sale, use, or possessionof illegal drugs while within the protected area of a power plant wouldbe removed from covered activities for a minimum of five years. This sectionfurther specifies that the rule does not prohibit the licensee from takingmore stringent actions. This section prompted many and varied comments. Many licensee commentersincluding NUMARC argued that the entire andSection; 26.27 should be deletedbecause licensee management has the responsibility to decide these issues.They believe that establishing sanctions is not within the Commission'sstatutory authority. Other licensees recommended that the rule should notprescribe any specific time periods for these events because each mustbe treated on a case-by-case basis. For instance, a licensee commentedthat some relatively minor situations do not require even fourteen daysto assess the worker's drug usage, determine a solution to the problem,and safely return the worker to unescorted access. There was no particular consensus among those commenters who mentionedspecific time periods for removal from access. Local No. 51 of the InternationalBrotherhood of Electrical Workers recommended that a worker be suspendedfor five days after the first confirmed positive test and for ten daysafter the second. The System Council U-2 of the IBEW recommended dischargefor six months after the second confirmed positive. Local No. 51 also believedthat the three-year removal from access is too severe as it would almostcertainly lead to dismissal. Permanent dismissal was recommended by HoustonLighting and Power even for the worker's first confirmed positive test.Carolina Power and Light believed that the 14-day requirement is adequate.Many licensees believed that they should have the option to undertake measuresranging from counseling through discharge following the first positivetest result. They stress that they must have the flexibility to do whateverit takes to assure at least a chance at successful rehabilitation of theworker. There was somewhat less variance in the comments on the appropriate responseto a determination that a worker has been involved in the sale, use, orpossession of illegal drugs within a protected area. Several licenseesstated that the worker should be discharged in such circumstances. NUMARCrecommended that the worker be permanently barred from access. Anotherlicensee would discharge the employee but allow the person to be consideredfor rehire after three years. 9.1.2 <T3>Follow-up Tests.</T3> Section 26.27(b)(3) of the proposed rule [andSection;26.27(b)(4) in the final rule] would require that workers whose accessis reinstated ``shall be given unannounced follow-up tests at least onceevery three months for three years after reemployment to verify continuedabstinence from drugs.'' This requirement prompted a variety of responses.Various union representatives stated that this testing rate and durationwould be ``excessive, harsh, and punitive'' and argued for less frequenttesting over a shorter probation period. NUMARC recommended that workersregaining access be tested once every three months but for one year only.On the other side of the spectrum of views, Public Service Electric andGas stated that the condition of such workers requires ``close monitoring,tracking, and continued urine sampling.'' Rancho Seco's practice in suchcircumstances requires weekly urinalysis during the first quarter afterreturn to work and monthly testing thereafter. (The length of the probationperiod was not mentioned.) A third set of commenters indicated that thefrequency and duration of such follow-up tests need not be prescribed inthe rule but should be left to the employer's determination. <ITAG tagnum="81">9.2 Summary of Responses. </ITAG>9.2.1 <T3>Period of Denial of Access.</T3> The Commission's intent in andSection;26.27 is that a worker who may pose a threat to safety be removed fromsafety-sensitive duties as long as he or she remains such a threat. Thesesanctions are not meant to serve as punishment for substance abuse. Thus,the section allows but does not mandate the permanent denial of unescortedaccess to protected areas in any of the enumerated drug-related events.The section also recognizes that the severity of threat to safety is acomplex matter. Obviously, a long-term heroin addict with an expensivehabit would likely be a far more serious threat than a recreational marijuanauser. Yet, an effective fitness-for-duty program must be prepared to dealwith both types of problems. It is the NRC's belief that andSection; 26.27(b)(2) includes an appropriatemix of flexibility and stringency. The 14-day period seems reasonable inthat, in almost all cases, it would take at least that long to diagnosea worker's problem, determine a solution, and assure that the problem isaddressed before the worker can again be granted access; this may, in somecases, be limited to counseling. Also, the NRC believes that 14 days isneeded to conclude that the first confirmed positive test may have resultedfrom behavior that does not in fact pose a serious safety threat. Thisminimum period is not meant to constitute punishment. Instead, this periodis intended to ensure an adequate time for assessment of the worker's conditionand requirements. The NRC does not take a position on whether a workerin this situation should be denied unescorted access longer than 14 days.That is to be decided by the licensee. Removal from unescorted access for a minimum of three years after a secondconfirmed positive test is, on the other hand, quite a stringent requirement.Some commenters noted that dismissal may occur in such cases. The NRC believesthat this measure is appropriate, however, in light of this rule's goalof assuring that workers are not impaired due to substance abuse. A secondpositive test would indicate that the person is most likely not able tostop using the substance in question and could, therefore, pose a threatto safety. The severity of a three-year loss of unescorted access may alsoprovide an incentive for employees to voluntarily enter into rehabilitationprograms when they realize the seriousness of the substance abuse problem.Section 26.27(b)(3) also appears to be well suited to the rule's goal.The tenor of most comments on this section favored more stringent measuresthan the section would require, and the NRC wishes these commenters tonote that the five-year period is intended to be only the minimum removalfrom unescorted access necessary to protect public health and safety. Thefive-year period should operate as both a deterrent to the proscribed activitiesand as a measure that may in fact result in permanent denial of accessin most cases where involvement in illegal drugs is detected in protectedareas.9.2.2  <T3>Follow-up Tests</T3>. The NRC recognizes the need to adjust the frequencyof follow-up testing as required in andSection; 26.27(b)(4). Research indicatesthat recidivism is most likely during the first 90 days following treatment(Hubbard and Marsden' 1986; Rounsaville. 1986). Most relapses to substanceuse will take place during that first 90-day period. If a person can remainsubstance-free during that period, he or she will have a chance to continueto be abstinent. In light of this research, the Commission has amended this section. Ratherthan requiring a uniform frequency of testing for the entire three-yearprobation period, the heightened potential for recidivism during the earlystages of that period should be recognized with a rate of testing morefrequent than once every three months. As amended, this section requires that workers whose access is reinstatedbe given unannounced follow-up tests at least once every month during thefirst four months of restored access. During the next two years and eightmonths, the worker should be tested at least once every three months toverify continued abstinence. As compared to the proposed rule's requirement,the higher testing rate during the first four months would provide theworker with an increased incentive to remain abstinent as well as createan increased probability of detecting any resumption of substance use thatmay occur. Thereafter, the lower testing rate would be less onerous forthe worker while still providing added assurance that resumption of substanceuse would be detected. 10.0 Impairment From Other Causes <ITAG tagnum="81">10.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>A number of commenters discussed issues pertaining to impairment from causesother than workers' use of illegal drugs. 10.1.1 <T3>Identified Additional Sources of Impairment.</T3> Workers' use of substanceswas mentioned most often in these comments, especially the use of alcohol,prescription medications, and over-the-counter medications; the use ofcaffeine was also mentioned. Comments were also made about the followingspecific sources of worker impairment: (1) Emotional and mental stressin general and stress specifically related to poor attitudes, poor morale,and family problems; (2) fatigue, including fatigue caused by mandatorylong hours of duty, rotating shifts, and workers working shifts incompatiblewith their biological clocks; (3) illness, including allergies; and (4)physical and physiological impairments. One commenter noted that illnesses,particularly colds and flu, are major causes of impairment because boththe illness and the medication a worker takes to treat the illness cancause impairment. With regards to fatigue, one commenter objected to theproposed rule because, under the rule, it was his interpretation that workersmay be disciplined and possibly terminated due to fatigue caused by workschedules and overtime. A number of commenters did not specifically address any one of these sourcesof impairment, but expressed one or more of the following general concerns:(1) The rule should be expanded to address several or all of these potentialcauses of impairment, regardless of the source of the impairment; (2) itis inappropriate for the rule to focus on illegal drug use and not to alsoaddress, in detail, the use of legal drugs, alcohol, or both; and (3) therule requires licensees to address impairment from sources other than illegaldrug use and to provide reasonable assurance that on-duty workers are notimpaired from the use of any substance, but it provides no guidelines ordirection towards this end. Some commenters noted that urine testing is an inadequate means of detectingimpairment caused by many of these factors, and thought that specific testsfor impairment, medical clarification exams, or supervisors' observationsshould be used to detect impairment. 10.1.2 <T3>Legal Drugs.</T3> Some commenters thought that the rule should notaddress legal drugs. One commenter stated that impairment should not beaddressed and that the concern should be limited to illegal drug use. Anothercommenter thought that the language of the rule should be changed to statethat the goal of the rule is to achieve a workplace free of <T3>illegal drugs</T3> and their effects rather than a ``drug-free workplace.''This commenter also noted that this change should not preclude a licenseefrom prohibiting on-site use of alcohol. Several commenters stated thatexpanding the rule to address legal drugs would raise substantial legalconcerns (e.g., making the use of legal drugs illegal, forcing a violationof physician/patient confidences) and one commenter thought that theseconcerns merely highlight the fact that any drug testing is an affrontto personal liberty. NUMARC stated that prescription drugs should be addressed only generally;workers should be required to notify their supervisors of intended useof prescription drugs and care should be taken in response to positivetests that occur as a result of prescription drug use. If prescriptiondrugs are included in the testing program, the response to positive testresults should be based on medical advice and workers must not be penalizedunless they are abusing the legal/prescription drug. This position wasstrongly supported, with about half of those commenters who discussed legaldrugs supporting the NUMARC position. Several commenters stated that only the drugs listed in the HHS Guidelinesshould be the basis for industry testing. The addition of drugs beyondthose specified in the HHS Guidelines would create a conflict with HHSrestrictions. Further, a number of commenters were concerned that the proceduresspecifying how licensees are to identify additional drugs and incorporatethem into their programs would defeat the goal of establishing uniformity.Commenters also thought that these procedures were unworkable, burdensome,and open to legal challenges. A number of commenters stated that the rule should not be expanded to addresslegal drugs, and that workers should not be denied the use of medicationsnecessary or beneficial to their health and well-being. Several commentersstated that regulation on prescription drugs is outside of the appropriatescope of NRC regulations and that such decisions should be made by physiciansand on an individual basis. Other commenters thought that testing for legaldrugs is unnecessary, but workers should report the use of those drugseither to their supervisors or to the medical department for an individualdecision to be made about what actions should be taken to ensure againston-the-job impairment. One commenter indicated that the prescribing physiciancould be consulted when making this determination. Other commenters stated that it was appropriate to expand the testing programto include legal drugs that may cause impairment. Some of these commenterswant the rule to specifically state this, while others want the rule toaddress the testing protocol for these drugs in detail, as has been donefor the classes of drugs for which the rule does require testing. The followingdrugs or drug classes were identified by various commenters as warrantingspecial concern: barbiturates, benzodiazepine, methaqualone, methadone,and propoxyphene. For some of these drugs and drug classes, cut-off levelswere proposed. Commenters also pointed out that some of the classes of drugs currentlytested for include drugs that can be used for legitimate medical reasonswithout creating significant impairment, and the rule should be expandedto ensure such legitimate use of these drugs is protected. Several commentersstated that requiring workers to report the use of prescription drugs totheir supervisors adequately addressed the concerns surrounding the useof legal drugs. 10.1.3 <T3>Alcohol.</T3> Many commenters made statements about whether or notalcohol should be added to the rule. The majority of these commenters,about 60 percent, stated that the rule should be expanded to address alcohol,but that details of how alcohol will be addressed should be published forpublic comment before the changes are implemented. These commenters includeNUMARC, a number of commenters who stated that they support the positionstated by NUMARC, and a number of  commenters who made this statement withoutlinking it to NUMARC. About 25 percent of the commenters addressing thisissue stated that alcohol should be addressed in the rule without sucha qualification. About 15 percent of the commenters who addressed thisissue stated that alcohol should not be addressed in the rule. Other commentersexpressed the concern that the extent to which alcohol is addressed inthe rule should not make implementation an insurmountable burden.The following reasons were given for delaying implementation of an alcoholrule: (1) Time should be allowed for the industry to study and developadditional suitable and effective programs to handle alcohol-related problems,much the same as has been provided for drug program development, and (2)prior to final rulemaking, the details of the alcohol requirements shouldbe made available for public comment. The following reasons were given for including alcohol in the rule: (1)Alcohol use and misuse is prevalent, (2) alcohol use can lead to on-dutyimpairment, (3) alcohol misuse creates fitness-for-duty problems comparableto and perhaps more substantial than the problems caused by illegal druguse, and (4) an NRC regulation requiring testing for alcohol would lendsupport to established programs. The following reasons were given for excluding alcohol from the rule: (1)Programs already in place and guidance being produced by Edison ElectricInstitute (EEI) effectively deal with alcohol-related problems, makingadditional guidance or regulations unnecessary; (2) if additional prescriptivedetail is provided, and if that guidance conflicts with established programs,the rule could result in a less effective approach to dealing with alcohol-relatedfitness-for-duty problems. Many specific recommendations were made about the desirable characteristicsof an alcohol testing program. A number of commenters recommended usingbreath tests for blood alcohol concentrations (BACs), although some commenterssaid that blood tests are more accurate and should therefore be used. Mostcommenters stated that alcohol should be treated in a manner similar toother drugs, and that testing for alcohol and other drugs should be doneon the same occasions. NUMARC, along with about 35 other commenters, statedthat tests for alcohol should be done on a random basis, as compared tothree commenters who stated that alcohol should only be included in for-causetests. A few commenters thought that alcohol testing as part of pre-accessor preemployment screening was unnecessary. Several commenters addressedBAC cut-off levels by stating the level they recommended, stating the levelthey were currently using, or urging the NRC to establish a cut-off level.Recommended or currently used cut-off levels ranged from 0.04 percent to0.10 percent, with the vast majority of commenters citing the 0.04 percentcut-off level. One licensee requested the NRC to establish the 0.04 percentcut-off level, but stated that if the NRC does not establish this level,they would use the 0.10 percent BAC cut-off level used in their local statemotor vehicle codes. With regards to sanctions in the event of a violationof alcohol policy, commenters expressed both the opinion that it is appropriateto regard a positive alcohol test the same as a positive drug test, andthe opinion that sanctions for violations of the alcohol policy shoulddiffer from sanctions for violation of the drug policy and should be leftto the discretion of the licensee. One commenter recommended a rule requiring a period of pre-work abstinencefrom drinking, such as the eight-hour rule used in the aviation industry.<ITAG tagnum="81">10.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC agrees that the possible sources of impairment identified by thesecommenters constitute important fitness-for-duty concerns that should beaddressed in licensees' programs. Further, the NRC believes that the ruledoes address these issues, in that the rule requires licensees to providereasonable assurance that workers are not impaired from any cause and requireslicensees to make EAPs available to workers to assist them with these typesof problems. 10.2.1 <T3>Additional Sources of Impairment Not Warranting Action at This Time.</T3>The NRC does not believe that the health and safety of the publicis best served by the NRC providing, at this time, additional prescriptiveregulations regarding emotional and mental stress, fatigue, illness, andphysical and physiological impairments. The NRC believes that there area number of ways of effectively addressing these problems, that often theapproach used must be tailored to the specific case at hand, and that soundmanagement practices, which are consistent with the licensee's managementstyle, can be expected to be more fruitful than would detailed prescriptiveregulations. <ITAG tagnum="84">Additional Sources of Impairment Warranting Action at This Time</ITAG>The NRC agrees with the commenters who stated that the rule should be expandedto address impairment that is caused by workers' use of alcohol and legaldrugs. The NRC believes that these are especially significant areas ofconcern because of the negative effects of alcohol and prescription sedativeson vigilance and judgment, which are important components of many jobswithin protected areas. The NRC also believes that there is often a relationshipbetween illegal drug abuse and the abuse and misuse of legal drugs andalcohol. The distinction between some types of medication use and drugabuse is not absolute. All use of prescription and over-the-counter drugslies somewhere in a spectrum that has responsible safe use at one end,dangerous abuse at the other end, and practices such as irresponsible misuseand accidental misuse somewhere in the middle. For these reasons, the NRCbelieves that a licensee's policies regarding workers' use of legal drugsand alcohol is as important for ensuring public health and safety as thelicensee's policy regarding illegal drug use. The nexus between illegal drug abuse and the abuse or misuse of legal drugsand alcohol makes it difficult to separate these issues. For example, insome cases the proposed rule addresses classes of drugs that are both abusedillegally and used in legal medications (e.g., opiates and amphetamines).Therefore, within a drug testing program adhering to the proposed rule,an overlap between illegal and legal drugs already exists. Additionally, many of the issues that must be resolved when addressingeach of these areas are very similar. For example, if chemical testingis to be used to detect the use of one or more legal drug(s) or alcohol,then the issues pertaining to the testing protocol that must be addressedwhen testing for illegal drugs_such as chain of custody, establishing cut-offlevels, laboratory quality assurance_must all be addressed. Further, allof these issues should be addressed because individual workers may haveclosely-related substance abuse problems involving illegal drugs, legaldrugs, and/or alcohol. Effectively detecting and deterring the abuse ofsome substances (illegal drugs) while failing to detect and deter the abuseor misuse of others (legal drugs, alcohol, or both) may result in someworkers who have drug problems merely substituting one impairing drug withanother rather than giving up the unacceptable use of any drugs. This closetie between illegal drug abuse as a fitness-for-duty concern and legaldrugs and alcohol as fitness-for-duty concerns, along with the significanceof these issues, warrants the NRC addressing all of these issues in a fitness-for-dutyrule. The NRC does not agree that it is beneficial to wait until licensees havestudied these problems and attempted to develop their own solutions beforetaking action. The NRC believes that, as was the case when the NRC delayedrulemaking regarding illegal drug use, such a practice may contribute toinconsistent policies in the industry and that it is possible that somepolicies will be developed that prove to be inadequate. Further, such awaiting period would result in an unacceptable delay in the implementationof important components of the NRC's fitness-for-duty rule. 10.2.2 <T3>Legal Drugs. </T3>The NRC does not think that it is appropriate topublish detailed regulations concerning legal medications at this time.The NRC acknowledges that the task of establishing the panel of drugs forwhich testing is warranted, and the appropriate testing protocols to beused when performing those tests, is an important and difficult task thatwarrants careful consideration. Further, the NRC believes that all of theapproaches recommended by commenters regarding the regulation of workers'use of legal drugs may prove unacceptable. Some of the recommended approachescan be expected to provide inadequate assurance that a worker's use oflegal drugs does not result in on-duty impairment. Other approaches mayprove to be unnecessarily intrusive. For example, it may be unnecessaryfor workers to report to a supervisor or Medical Review Officer their useor intended use of some prescription drugs.The NRC believes that requiring workers to report to the Medical ReviewOfficer their use or intended use of some types of drugs is essential,however, and should be considered by licensees. However, the NRC believesthat defining these drugs in terms such as ``all prescription drugs'' or``all drugs that may cause impairment'' may be a poor method of developingsuch a list. There may be over-the-counter drugs, such as over-the-counterstimulants and sedatives, that have significant potential for causing on-dutyimpairment and thus warrant being reported. Conversely, there may be prescriptiondrugs that have very little potential for causing impairment and do notwarrant being reported. Specific policies could be produced that wouldeliminate the need for workers to report their use of these drugs. Forexample, it may be possible to assure that some drugs do not create significantproblems simply by providing guidance to workers about when the drugs canbe used or about the maximum doses of the drugs that can be used by on-dutyworkers. The development of such guidance could simplify licensees' fitness-for-dutyprograms, promote consistency throughout the industry, and reduce the intrusivenature of the fitness-for-duty programs. However, the NRC believes thatsuch guidance should be developed by the industry. Input from the medicalcommunity would be especially valuable in this area and should be sought.Should timely progress not be made in this area, the NRC may instituteadditional rulemaking. The rule has been modified to require licensees to educate workers aboutthe effects legal drugs may have on job performance. Also, in line withcomments, the NRC accepts that chemical testing for some legal drugs isappropriate, however, whether to test for these drugs, such as barbituratesand benzodiazepines, is left to the discretion of each licensee. The Commissionhas asked the staff to explore with the Secretary, DHHS, the addition ofthese drugs to the required testing panel. 10.2.3. <T3>Alcohol. </T3>The NRC believes that alcohol is a fitness-for-duty concern.The NRC believes that no on-duty alcohol consumption should be permitted,and that conducting breath tests to determine workers' BACs is a necessarystep towards detecting and deterring any on-duty use or any unacceptableoff-duty use of alcohol. Breath tests, when conducted following the protocols in the NRC ``Guidelinesfor Nuclear Power Plant Drug and Alcohol Testing Programs'' (Appendix Ato Part 26), provide relatively accurate and reliable measures of BACs,and are sufficient for all alcohol tests. Workers should have the rightto have further confirmatory tests performed at their request. Becauseof the improved accuracy obtained when using blood samples, further confirmatorytests will be performed using blood samples analyzed with gas chromatographicmethods. The NRC believes that the scientific literature strongly demonstrates thatBACs can be correlated with impairment, and that a BAC cut-off level of0.04 percent is appropriate. This cut-off level is low enough to providereasonable assurance that alcohol-caused impairment will be detected whenbreath tests are performed, and high enough to eliminate practical andtechnological problems associated with very low cut-off levels. The NRCtherefore requires that blood alcohol concentration cut-off levels be setat 0.04 percent. Licensees have the general responsibility for evaluatingthe fitness of their personnel whether or not some specified limit is indicatedfor either drugs or alcohol. Licensees may establish lower cut-off levels,but should recognize that there are practical problems associated witha zero or near-zero cut-off level for alcohol, and should consider thepotential impacts of these problems carefully before using very low cut-offlevels. The NRC recognizes the value of a required period of abstinence from drinkingthat should precede all scheduled tours of work. The NRC therefore is requiringlicensees to include an abstinence period of at least 5 hours in theirfitness-for-duty programs. The NRC does not agree with those commenters who state that chemical testsfor on-duty alcohol-caused impairment need only be performed on certaindrug testing occasions, such as when for-cause testing is performed. TheNRC believes that licensees should not indicate to workers that alcoholuse that results in on-duty impairment is of less concern than is illicitdrug use. Further, the NRC believes that any use of alcohol that resultsin on-duty impairment poses a significant potential threat to public healthand safety. Finally, the NRC agrees with comments that state that it would be easyfor a worker to pass an announced test for alcohol misuse, such as a pre-employmentor pre-access authorization screening. However, this is true for many illicitdrugs that, like alcohol, are eliminated from the body relatively quickly.As is the case when testing for these illegal drugs, detection of ruleviolations may be rare, as workers need only abstain for a reasonable periodprior to the test to be assured of passing the test. However, it is alsovery likely that those who are detected through such tests will have avery substantial problem that must be addressed. Some licensees who currentlyinclude tests for alcohol in their preemployment screening process havediscovered several alcohol abusers who would have gone undetected withoutthe screening process. For these reasons, the NRC requires that chemicaltests for the misuse of alcohol be conducted whenever tests for illegalsubstance abuse are performed. Furthermore, to assure deterrence against``lunch time drinking'' the rule will require that random testing be conductedat various times during the day. With regards to sanctions related to alcohol in the final rule, the NRCagrees that it may not be essential that the actions taken to address alcoholmisuse be identical to the actions taken to address illegal substance abuse.However, the NRC does believe that it is essential that licensees testfor the misuse of alcohol and that detected impaired workers are removedfrom duty. Further, sanctions must be adequately severe to deter drinkingpractices that result in on-duty impairment, and severe enough, as comparedto the sanctions associated with illegal drug use, to ensure that workerswho abuse illegal drugs are not encouraged to merely switch from a patternof unacceptable drug taking activity to a pattern of unacceptable alcoholconsumption. One way of doing this is to take actions in the event of aviolation of the alcohol policy that are the same as, or similar to, theactions taken when the illicit drug policy is violated. In the absenceof such actions, an effective program must provide assurance that a highlevel of deterrence is present and that workers who are impaired as a resultof alcohol misuse are removed from duty.11.0 Confidentiality of Test Results <ITAG tagnum="81">11.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>A number of commenters were concerned about the confidentiality of testresults and the potential impact of the rule on the privacy of workers.There was concern that test results might be inappropriately released tothe detriment of workers. A number of specific suggestions were made toprotect workers' rights. 11.1.1 <T3>Confidentiality of Results. </T3>One commenter favored identifyingsamples by a number coded to an individual worker rather than by name.Other commenters believed that there should be a protocol defining whichlicensee's workers should have access to fitness-for-duty records at variousstages of the testing process. Several commenters expressed the view thattest results should not be releasable to licensees or contractors under10 CFR 26.27(b) without the written approval of the affected worker. Onecommenter proposed that all medical personnel involved in the fitness-for-dutyprocess adhere to the American Occupational Medical Association's (AOMA's)``Code of Ethical Conduct for Physicians Providing Occupational MedicalServices,'' and the AOMA ``Ethical Guidelines for Drug Screening in theWorkplace.'' 11.1.2 <T3>Use of Samples for Other Purposes. </T3>A number of commenters werealso concerned that specimens taken from workers would be used for purposesbeyond the scope of the proposed fitness-for-duty rules and suggested thatlanguage be added to the regulations limiting use of the samples to designatedpurposes. 11.1.3 <T3>Tests Conducted by the Licensee. </T3>The proposed rule (10 CFR 26.24[d])would allow licensees to conduct preliminary tests of a sample before forwardingit to a laboratory. Several commenters were concerned that results of suchpreliminary tests would be inappropriately disclosed and acted upon priorto confirmation by the contract laboratory. They proposed that access tothe results of such preliminary tests should be strictly limited, perhapsto the licensee's laboratory staff only. 11.1.4 <T3>Confidentiality for Employee Assistance Programs. </T3>One commenternoted the lack of specific confidentiality requirements in the proposed(andSection; 26.25) on employee assistance programs and stated that suchprotections were necessary for the programs to be successful. Another commenterstated that the term ``safety considerations,'' as used in this section,should be defined. A commenter also requested that language be added thatemployee assistance program EAP counselors would notify management whena belief exists that any worker's condition (self-referred or not) mayconstitute a hazard to himself or others. 11.1.5 <T3>Access to Records. </T3>Several commenters suggested that access tothe results of chemical testing should be limited to the greatest extentpossible, especially given the potential damage to a worker from disclosureof false positive results. In particular, many commenters believed thattest results should not be released to law enforcement agencies. There were a number of comments concerning access to fitness-for-duty recordsby NRC employees and representatives. Several commenters expressed theview that the NRC has no need for access to individual names and that ifsuch information were provided it might be inappropriately disclosed ormade available to the public. It was noted that licensees are expresslydirected not to include the names of individuals under the proposed reportingrequirements to NRC (andSection; 26.73[a][3]), but that NRC is eligible toreceive names under proposed andSection; 26.29(b). Two commenters suggested that the Protection of Information (andSection;26.29) include references to contractors and vendors as well as licensees.They further suggested that the reference to employment decisions be replacedby access decisions. Another commenter raised the question of whether contractorsas well as licensees should be able to obtain fitness-for-duty informationunder the proposed regulation at andSection; 26.29(b). An additional commentersuggested that release of fitness-for-duty information under a court orderbe added to the list of permitted disclosures under andSection; 26.29(b).<ITAG tagnum="81">11.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>11.2.1 <T3>Confidentiality of Results. </T3>The NRC believes that further requirementsfor the protection of worker records at the testing laboratory beyond therequirements of the NRC Guidelines are not needed at this time. Section3.1 of the Guidelines contains specific protections for such records. The NRC concurs in the comment that information on a worker denied unescortedaccess or removed from his position under a fitness-for-duty program shallbe provided to licensees and contractors subject to this part but onlyupon a written release by the affected worker. Appropriate language hasbeen added to andSection; 26.27(a). The effect of the language is that ifthe worker elects not to provide such a release to the hiring licenseeor contractor, the worker would be denied unescorted access to protectedareas. The comment that Medical Review Officers subscribe to the AOMA Code ofEthical Conduct and their ethical guidelines for drug screening in theworkplace has merit. The NRC will continue to study this suggestion. Forpurposes of the present rulemaking, however, the NRC is satisfied thatthe statement of qualifications for Medical Review Officers in andSection;2.9(b) of the NRC Guidelines is adequate and sufficient. 11.2.2 <T3>Use of Samples for Other Purposes.</T3> The NRC believes that provisionsin the rule limiting use of laboratory results to the purpose and scopeof the rule are adequate. The protections afforded by the NRC Guidelinesand andSection; 26.29(b) are deemed to be sufficient. Specifically, andSection;2.1(d) of the NRC Testing Guidelines requires that specimens collectedunder Part 26 may only be designated or approved for testing as describedin Part 26, and shall not be used to conduct any other analysis or testwithout the permission of the tested individual. Moreover, there shouldbe no incentive for employers to disclose the information to unauthorizedpersons because of the possibilily of liability related to such disclosure.11.2.3 <T3>Tests Conducted by the Licensee.</T3> The NRC concurs that there isa potential for abuse of positive test results from preliminary tests conductedby the licensee. These preliminary tests do not have the accuracy of laboratory-conductedconfirmatory tests. Consequently, the final rule limits access to the preliminarytest results to the licensee's testing personnel. 11.2.4 <T3>Confidentiality for Employee Assistance Programs.</T3> The EAP requirementat andSection; 26.25 specifies that such programs are to provide confidentialassistance except where safety considerations must prevail. The NRC believesthat the plain meaning of these terms is sufficient for this rulemakingand that further clarification in the rule is not required. The NRC concursin the suggestion that employee assistance program counselors notify managementwhen there is a reasonable belief that any worker's condition may constitutea hazard to himself or herself or others, and the rule's language has beenclarified. 11.2.5 <T3>Access to Records.</T3> The NRC has elected to retain the provisionson entities entitled to access to laboratory records as proposed in andSection;26.29(b) with the exception that release of the information under a courtorder is added. The NRC does not anticipate requesting the results of laboratorytests correlated to individual names. Nevertheless, the NRC wishes to reservethe right to have access to specific results when needed for particularsituations involving safety and investigative matters such as malfeasancein the administration or management of the fitness-for-duty program. TheNRC also has decided to retain the provision providing access to appropriatelaw enforcement officials, but has added the provision that such officialsmust be under court order. It is noted that there is no requirement toroutinely provide such officials with laboratory results. Moreover, itis unlikely that such results would be requested because the officialswould have no prior knowledge of the results of laboratory tests. The NRC concurs in the comment that contractors within the scope of therulemaking should be included in the disclosure and access provisions ofandSection; 26.29(b) and the final rule reflects this addition. The referenceto employment decisions in the proposed rule has been replaced by accessdecisions. 12.0 Employee Assistance Programs <ITAG tagnum="81">12.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>The NRC received a significant number of comments from licensees regardingemployee assistance programs. The majority of commenters agreed that employeeassistance programs services are an effective method of combatting thebroad spectrum fitness-for-duty problems. However, most of the commentersspecified that under the proposed rule the scope of licensee employee assistanceprogram services should be limited to regular, full-time licensee personnel;contractor or vendor personnel should not be covered. Several other commentersindicated that employee assistance program services should not be regulatedby the NRC rule in any manner, and would be better addressed by the licenseesthemselves. <ITAG tagnum="81">12.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC believes that employee assistance program services provide a valuabletool in combatting fitness-for-duty problems in the nuclear power industry.Therefore, as currently stipulated in the rule, it is the responsibilityof each licensee to ensure that all licensee personnel have access to employeeassistance programs services and that contractor employee assistance programsmeet the criteria of the licensee's employee assistance programs. The NRChas also noted that supervisory personnel should not refer employees directlyto counseling or treatment. Rather, supervisory personnel should referemployees to an employee assistance program counselor for assistance andfurther evaluation and referral.13.0 Importance of Health and Human Services Guidelines <ITAG tagnum="81">13.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>13.1.1 <T3>Proposed Alternatives to the HHS Guidelines. </T3>Several commenterssuggested that an alternative to the HHS Guidelines is the College of AmericanPathologists (CAP) Forensic Urine Drug Testing (FUDT) program. The commenterscontend that the CAP FUDT program is as equally rigorous as the HHS Guidelinesbut better suited to licensee's needs because: (1) It has an educationalcomponent for laboratories, (2) it has accredited 25 laboratories as ofOctober 11, 1988, whereas NIDA has accredited none, (3) the CAP FUDT programallows laboratories to test for additional drugs and at other cut-off levelsthan those specified in the HHS Guidelines, and (4) the CAP FUDT programdoes not require approval from the HHS Secretary. One commenter suggested that an alternative to the HHS Guidelines is the``AFL-CIO Guide for Drug and Alcohol Testing on the Job.'' Several commenterspointed out that stringent quality controls are required of testing laboratoriesunder state programs; two commenters stated that New York State had a stringentlaboratory certification program. 13.1.2 <T3>Applicability of HHS Guidelines to the Nuclear Power Industry. </T3>Afew commenters indicated that the HHS Guidelines should be adopted by theNRC in their entirety. The large majority of commenters stated that, althoughthe HHS Guidelines provide many excellent procedures for ensuring the qualityof drug testing programs, the HHS Guidelines contain terminology and provisionsthat are inappropriate for application to the nuclear power industry. Theinappropriate terminology and provisions noted by the commenters include(1) references to ``agencies,'' to Pub. L. 100-71, to the Privacy Act,and to the HHS Secretary; (2) limitations in the panel of drugs for whichcertified laboratories can test; (3) cut-off level specifications definedfor screening and confirmatory tests; (4) requirements that a licensedphysician, as a Medical Review Officer, review all test results; (5) theconflict with on-site testing created by the requirement that all testingbe done by certified laboratories; (6) laboratory certification procedures;and (7) limitations on splitting specimen samples. To ensure that the HHSGuidelines are appropriately adapted to the proposed rule, many commentersrecommended that the pertinent sections of the HHS Guidelines be incorporatedinto the rule itself. 13.1.3 <T3>Limitations in the Panel of Drugs for Which Certified LaboratoriesCan Test. </T3>A number of commenters specifically supported the intentionand value of establishing uniformity across licensees in the panel of drugs,with a smaller number supporting a more flexible approach that allows licenseesdiscretion to deal with local variability in drug use. A number of commenters objected to the procedures specifying how licenseesare to identify additional illegal drugs and incorporate them into theirprograms, on the grounds that these mechanisms defeat the purpose of uniformity,are unworkable, are burdensome, and open licensees to legal challenges.Some of these same commenters, along with others, recommended that theHHS-specified panel of drugs be expanded to include (for example) alcohol,methadone, barbiturates, benzodiazepine, propoxyphene, methaqualone, andprescription and over-the-counter drugs. Comments made at the public meetingexpressed concern about the potential for intrusion into personal medicalinformation if the panel of drugs is not strictly specified and limited.13.1.4 <T3>Cut-off Levels Defined for Screening and Confirmatory Tests. </T3>Asubstantial number of comments were received on the cut-off levels forscreening and confirmatory tests, many suggesting specific cut-off levelsfor particular drugs. An important disagreement among commenters centeredaround the issue of uniformity in cut-off levels. Some commenters recommendedthat standard cut-off levels be established and applied by all licenseesin order to minimize inconsistency across licensees, maximize the defensibilityof the cut-off levels, and avoid conflict with the certified laboratorytesting procedures. These commenters thought that discretionary cut-offlevels were unworkable because they would be challenged in court and wereinconsistent with certified laboratory procedures specified in the HHSGuidelines. Among these commenters, some supported the existing HHS cut-offlevels and some recommended that the HHS levels be modified, generallyto be more stringent. A number of commenters suggested standards matchingthose used by the military. Other commenters, particularly those representinglicensees with ongoing drug testing programs, recommended that licenseesbe allowed discretion to establish cut-off levels more stringent than theminimum specified in the rule. As a compromise, some commenters suggestedthat laboratory procedures and testing be modified to require them to compileresults at both the minimum uniform standard cut-off and the discretionarylevels established by the licensees. These commenters provided different reasons for establishing various cut-offlevels, ranging from very stringent to more lenient. A few commenters supportedthe establishment of cut-off levels based on an objective of establishinga drug-free workplace, recommending essentially zero tolerance and settingcut-off levels just high enough to avoid positives from dietary consumptionof legal substances. Others proposed the establishment of cut-off levelsthat were the lowest (most stringent) levels associated with impairment.Others, sometimes explicitly recognizing that the establishment of cut-offlevels involves administrative considerations, recommended the use of ``standard''and moderate levels that assist in the establishment of an accepted, widely-usedstandard and reduce vulnerability to legal challenges. Still others, generallythose representing the workers and unions, supported cut-off levels thattest for impairment rather than use and that set levels where job performanceis probably affected. A number of licensees commented that they are currently operating drugtesting programs which have more stringent (lower) cut-off levels thanthe HHS Guidelines, especially for marijuana. Commenters were divided intheir position regarding adoption of the HHS Guidelines for cut-off levels.Some supported the HHS Guidelines; others supported the more stringentlevels proposed by NUMARC. A large number of commenters thought that theHHS cut-off level for marijuana was too lenient, citing experience fromongoing programs that a very high proportion (over 80 percent in CommonwealthEdison's 6-year-old program) of positive marijuana test results fall between20 and 100 ng/ml. A number of commenters provided specific recommendationsfor screening and confirmatory cut-off levels for individual drug types.13.1.5 <T3>Regulation of On-Site Screening Test. </T3>Although the majority ofcomments in this category addressed specific aspects of on-site testing,several commenters objected to conducting on-site screening tests by licenseeson the grounds that such testing should not be conducted by employers andthat it would be more costly, create too high a risk of false results,and result in claims of inequitable treatment. Other commenters, principallyrepresentatives of licensees and a health care products manufacturer, supportedon-site screening tests as effective, timely, and less costly, particularlyif only specimens that tested positive in the on-site aliquot test aresent to the certified laboratory. Some commenters favored modificationof the proposed rule (andSection; 26.24[d]) to allow licensees to establishHHS-certified on-site laboratories and to avoid conflict with the HHS Guidelines.Changes in the specified procedures for on-site testing were also recommended,including enabling certified laboratories to match the cut-off levels establishedby the on-site program. The need for careful attention to conflicts withspecific wording in the HHS Guidelines was noted. (Further discussion ofthe cut-off level issue is provided elsewhere.) 13.1.6 <T3>Requirements for Review of Test Results by a Medical Review Officer.</T3>A number of comments were received concerning the qualifications androle of the Medical Review Officer as specified in the HHS Guidelines,paragraph 2.7(b) (53 FR 11985, dated April 11, 1988). Commenters recommendedthat, should the HHS Guidelines be generally adopted, these specificationsshould be modified to eliminate the requirement that the MRO be a licensedphysician. They recommended broadening the definition to include otherlicensed medical care providers with training and knowledge in substanceabuse disorders and their treatment, identification and use of controlledsubstances, and prescription practices of pharmacies, and to provide forconsultation of the MRO with a licensed physician for resolution of unusualcircumstances. One commenter recommended changing the term ``Medical ReviewOfficer'' to ``Medical Review Professionals'' to avoid possible confusionwith licensee executive officers.13.1.7 <T3>Laboratory Certification Procedures. </T3>A number of commenters thoughtthat the number of blind samples was excessive and recommended that therequirement for licensees to submit blind samples be eliminated or substantiallyreduced. One commenter pointed out the potentially negative effects ofhaving licensees prepare the false documentation associated with blindsamples, and others questioned whether a sufficient supply of blind sampleswould be available on a timely basis. A number of commenters also questionedwhether sufficient certified laboratory capacity would be available toimplement the proposed rule. Comments both supported and opposed the requirementthat laboratories be certified by HHS. Those supporting such certificationrecommended modification of the proposed rule to specify that licenseesare to use HHS-certified laboratories that are directed to conduct drugtests consistent with NRC and licensee requirements. Several other commentersobjected to the requirement for HHS certification, noting that it wouldlikely prevent them from using high-quality local laboratories, and wouldprevent them from testing additional drugs or setting more stringent cut-offlevels (unless such modifications are made in the application of the certificationprocess, as discussed above). They recommended that the NRC adopt a provisionauthorizing licensees to utilize a drug testing laboratory that is eithercertified via the HHS Guidelines or is certified under a state programthat is generally comparable to the HHS program. Other commenters suggestedauthorization of laboratories certified by The College of American PathologistsForensic Urine Drug Testing (CAP FUDT) program. 13.1.8 <T3>Splitting Specimen Samples. </T3>A number of commenters recommendedthe use of split samples to provide an additional quality control measureand to further protect the rights of the workers by allowing a second checkon confirmed positive results. Commenters differed in their specific recommendationsconcerning the number (2 or 3) and specific procedures for testing thereserved sample(s). <ITAG tagnum="81">13.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>13.2.1 <T3>Proposed Alternatives to the HHS Guidelines. </T3>The NRC believesthat the rigor required by the HHS Guidelines is not matched by any ofthe proposed alternatives. The NRC Guidelines address many of the concernsexpressed by the commenters. The NRC believes that the highest standardsare needed to assure that the testing process is accurate, produces validresults, and provides suitable protection for those being tested. 13.2.2 <T3>Applicability of HHS Guidelines to the Nuclear Power Industry. </T3>TheNRC believes that many of the basic requirements of the HHS Guidelinesmust remain a vital component of the NRC drug testing regulations. However,the NRC is aware that the Guidelines, as written by HHS to apply to testingby Federal agencies, do not perfectly fit the circumstances of the licenseesregulated by the NRC. There are many references to legal authorities andother matters that are peculiar to Federal agencies (e.g., references tothe Privacy Act, to Executive Order 12564, to the Secretary) and terminologythat may be confusing in the NRC-regulated industry context. In addition,the HHS drafted the Guidelines to apply to the physical and organizationalcircumstances of Federal agencies. Obviously, the circumstances of industriesregulated by the NRC are very different from those of Federal agencies.Furthermore, as discussed below, other aspects of the rule, i.e., permissionto expand the panel of drugs and establish more stringent cut-off levels,require modification of the HHS Guidelines to facilitate implementation.Consequently, the NRC agrees with many commenters and is, in its rule,directly implementing in its own regulations specific testing program guidelines(an adaption of the HHS Guidelines) that are applicable to NRC licenseefitness-for-duty programs. These testing guidelines are intended to leaveintact the safeguards for accuracy and privacy in drug testing establishedby the HHS Guidelines while ensuring that the parties regulated by theNRC can practically implement the requirements. Editorial changes havebeen made to the HHS Guidelines to adapt the terminology to the NRC andits licensees' fitness-for-duty programs. Special note should be made that the list of substances to be tested andcut-off levels established in the testing guidelines are subject to changeby the NRC in response to industry experience and changes by the Departmentof Health and Human Services as advances in technology, additional experience,or other considerations warrant inclusion of additional substances andother concentration levels. 13.2.3 <T3>Limitations in the Panel of Substances That Certified LaboratoriesCan Test. </T3>Under the HHS Guidelines (2.1[a]), a Federal agency's randomdrug testing program may test a urine sample <T3>only </T3>for certain specified drugs. The NRC Guidelines at Section2.1 modify this requirement by expanding the minimum panel of substancesfor which specimens from the pre-access, for-cause, random, and follow-uptesting program are to be tested by adding alcohol in addition to marijuana,cocaine, opiate metabolites, phencyclidine, and amphetamines. Furthermore,the rule will allow licensees to include additional drugs, especially thosefound to be prevalent in their geographic area. Licensees would be requiredto develop appropriate test protocols and cut-off levels. For-cause testsare not limited to a specified panel of substances. In determining which drugs to include in the NRC Guidelines, the Commissionassessed evidence regarding the extent of use of the various drugs recommendedby commenters and the potential for impairment from the licit use, whereappropriate, or abuse of those drugs. The NRC concluded that the panelof drugs in the HHS Guidelines adequately covers the most extensively abusedillegal drugs, but does not sufficiently address the major drug class ofsedatives (i.e., benzodiazepines and barbiturates). The use and abuse ofsedatives by nuclear power plant workers are of significant concern forseveral reasons. Although most sedative drugs are obtained legally through prescriptionsor in over-the-counter medications, these drugs are subject to abuse. Infact, some researchers have suggested that sedative abuse is more prevalentthan the abuse of opiates in this country. In addition, continued abuseof these substances can lead to dependency and ``physician-hopping'' orillegal behaviors to obtain supplies of the drugs. Consequently, detectionof the use of sedatives and an evaluation by the Medical Review Officerof the manner in which a worker is using sedatives are important to preventthe development of sedative-abuse problems. Of greater significance is that the use of sedatives while on the job,even at physician-prescribed doses, may result in significant impairment.Although many types of performance are detrimentally affected by the useof sedatives, attention and the ability to maintain vigilance are particularlyimpaired. And, when combined with alcohol, the impairing effects of sedatives,especially bartiturates, are long-lasting and severe. However, to maintainconsistency with the HHS program the Commission has decided not to includebenzodiazepines and barbiturates in the required panel of drugs at thistime. The NRC will further explore this matter with the Secretary of theDepartment of Health and Human Services, and may issue an amendment toPart 26 if deemed appropriate. In response to objections by licensees to the requirement that they mustconsult with local law enforcement authorities and drug counseling servicesto determine whether other drugs are being used in the geographical localeof the facility and the local workforce and, where appropriate, add thesedrugs to the list of drugs being tested, the NRC has made this elementof the program optional. To address the issue of changing drug use patterns,the NRC may conduct periodic reviews of the minimum drug panel that couldresult in the inclusion of additional substances. 13.2.4 <T3>Cut-off Levels Defined for Screening and Confirmatory Tests. </T3>Inresponse to comments concerning the appropriate cut-off levels at whichsamples will be considered positive, the NRC proposes the screening andconfirmatory cut-off levels set forth in the NRC ``Guidelines for NuclearPower Plant Drug and Alcohol Testing Programs.'' These levels define thestandards for establishing presumptive positive and negative results forthe minimum panel according to the NRC rule. However, in response to numerouscomments by licensees, many of whom have existing drug programs with morestringent cut-off levels for the substances included in the proposed minimumdrug panel, the NRC rule establishes minimum standards for the panel ofdrugs and allows licensees the discretion of setting more stringent cut-offlevels for these drugs. For example, instead of using their normal cut-offlevels for for-cause and follow-up testing, licensees could obtain dataon any trace amounts of drugs for medical evaluation of at-risk persons.Certified laboratories are authorized to test and report results at thesemore stringent cut-off levels, if so requested by the licensee. In keepingwith the objective of uniformity and the establishment of a comparabledatabase, however, the laboratories are <T3>also</T3> required to report results for the ``standard'' cut-off levelsestablished in the rule. 13.2.5 <T3>Regulation of On-Site Screening Test. </T3>Although the NRC is sensitiveto the concerns of workers expressed in the comments, the stringent qualityassurance requirements of the rule and the rigor of the HHS certificationprocess have convinced the NRC to retain the option of on-site testing.Under the NRC rule, licensees may perform the breath tests for alcoholand the preliminary screening tests of urine specimens provided that thelicensee's staff possess the necessary training and skills for the tasksassigned, their qualifications are documented, and adequate quality controlsare implemented. These requirements have been included in the NRC Guidelines.Following preliminary screening, these licensees would submit all presumptivepositive specimens and a sample of negative specimens to an HHS-certifiedlaboratory for a second screen and for confirmatory testing. This willsubstantially reduce the number of specimens that must be packaged, sent,and handled at the certified laboratory. The NRC rule does not prohibitlicensees from establishing laboratories and seeking HHS certification.Should HHS certification be obtained, the licensee would be allowed toconduct both screening and confirmatory tests at this laboratory. 13.2.6 <T3>Requirements for Review of Test Results by a Medical Review Officer.</T3>After careful review of the comments received regarding the MedicalReview Officer and examination of the <T3>Medical Review Officer Manual </T3>prepared by the Department of Healthand Human Services (September 1988), which describes the role and responsibilitiesof the MRO, the NRC has concluded that this position does require the qualificationsof a licensed physician. To maintain consistency with the HHS program,the NRC has decided to retain the title Medical Review Officer.13.2.7 <T3>Laboratory Certification Procedures.</T3> The NRC has given carefulconsideration to the number of blind samples licensees must submit to thecertified laboratory and has determined that the number specified in theNRC Guidelines is necessary to maintain adequate quality control. In addition,licensees which expand their drug panel beyond the NRC specified minimumpanel are responsible for submitting a sufficient number of appropriately``spiked'' blind samples to meet equivalent laboratory quality controlrequirements for those additional drugs. The NRC has consulted with personnelof the Office of Workplace Initiatives in the National Institute on DrugAbuse and has been assured that sufficient blind samples and laboratorycapacity will be available to implement the proposed rule on a timely basis.Given the importance of protecting workers from false positive test resultsand the absence of clear evidence that alternative certification proceduresprovide an equivalent level of rigor, the NRC rule maintains the requirementfor laboratories to obtain HHS certification in order to perform confirmatorychemical tests on specimens submitted for tests under the provision ofthe NRC rule. In addition to HHS certification, laboratories used by licenseesmust demonstrate comparable performance and rigor in testing for the additionalsubstances included in the licensee's specified panel of substances (i.e.,the NRC minimum panel plus any discretional additions of the licensee).13.2.8 <T3>Splitting Specimen Samples.</T3> The NRC is sensitive to the concernsof nuclear power plant workers regarding the adverse consequences of falsepositive test results and the advantages of using split samples to providean additional quality control measure and further protect the rights ofworkers by allowing a second check on confirmed positive results. The firstaliquot, along with appropriate chain-of-custody documentation could be(1) transmitted to the HHS-certified laboratory for screening and confirmatorytesting or (2) transmitted to the authorized on-site screening laboratoryfor preliminary testing. The second aliquot of the split sample, alongwith appropriate chain-of-custody documentation, could be placed in a securerefrigeration unit or forwarded to a second laboratory for retention. Shouldthe specimen test positive, the second aliquot could be tested by the secondHHS-certified laboratory. In the case of on-site screening, the second aliquot could be discardedif the preliminary test (screen) is negative. If the screening test isconducted off-site, the second aliquot could be discarded immediately uponnotification of a negative test result for the specimen. Even though thereis a high degree of assurance of the accuracy of the test results providedby the chain-of-custody and HHS-certified laboratory procedures, chain-of-custodyconcerns by tested workers would remain no matter how precise the processor valid the results. Therefore, the NRC has decided not to mandate norprohibit split samples; the approach may be used by licensees where additionalconfidence in the process by the workforce is sought. 14.0 Relationship to Access Authorization <ITAG tagnum="81">14.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>This section covers comments relating to the potential overlap of the proposedFFD rule and Industry Guidelines appended to the proposed Access AuthorizationPolicy Statement (AAPS) appearing at 53 FR 7534, March 9, 1988. 14.1.1 <T3>What is an Appropriate ``Suitable Inquiry''?.</T3> A number of commentersraised the issue that the ``suitable inquiry'' requirement in andSection;26.27(a) is too severe and also conflicts with the background investigationelements section of the AAPS. Proposed andSection; 26.27(a) requires thatlicensees conduct a suitable inquiry prior to granting unescorted accessto determine if a worker has tested positive for drugs in the past. Theterm ``suitable inquiry'' as defined in andSection; 26.3 requires verificationof employment history for the previous five years and to determine whetherthe worker had any positive drug tests. Many commenters pointed out thatthis requirement will be very difficult and costly to meet in part becauseprior employers will be reluctant, because of liability concerns, to releaserecords of drug use, even with a signed release form. One commenter pointedout, for example, that under andSection; 26.29(b) a licensee would not beauthorized to release such information to another employer who is not alsoa licensee. The commenters noted that the required background investigation in Section6.2.1 of the Industry Guidelines appended to the AAPS covers similar materialto the fitness-for-duty rule, but is not as severe. The investigation containsseveral elements, one of which is a check on an applicant's character andreputation including prior illegal use or possession of a controlled substance.Information is to be obtained from four references, two supplied by theapplicant and two developed by the utility. Employment verification isto be obtained for a minimum of three years. In addition, the evaluationcriteria in Section 7.1 of the AAPS require utilities to assess the impactof past illegal use or possession of a controlled substance. One commenter pointed out that the proposed suitability inquiry requirementswill conflict with the required background checks for security personnelin 10 CFR Part 73, Appendix B. These background checks require the licenseeto investigate a number of elements related to selection of security personnelincluding whether an individual has any history of alcoholism or drug addiction.There are no specific time periods associated with the required backgroundchecks. 14.1.2 <T3>Overlap in Training Requirements.</T3> One commenter stated that thetraining requirements for supervisors and escorts in andSection; 26.22 alreadyexist in Section 9(c) of the Industry Guidelines and that the requirementsin the fitness-for-duty rule could therefore be eliminated. 14.1.3 <T3>Relationship of Employee Assistance Programs to the Proposed AccessAuthorization Policy Statement.</T3> One commenter raised the questionof whether a voluntary referral to an employee assistance program raisesan access authorization issue under the Industry Guidelines appended tothe proposed access authorization policy statement. Under the Guidelines,illegal use of drugs is an evaluation criterion for unescorted access (andSection;7.1[b]) and an element of the continual behavioral observation program(andSection; 9[a]). 14.1.4 <T3>Temporary Unescorted Access Authorization.</T3> One commenter notedthe temporary unescorted access authorization in andSection; 6.4 of the Guidelinesand stated that it should be made clear that during the suitable inquiryperiod, the temporary access authorization would be available. <ITAG tagnum="81">14.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>14.2.1 <T3>What is an Appropriate ``Suitable Inquiry''?.</T3> The NRC recognizesthe potential overlap between the required background investigations inthe fitness-for-duty rule and the proposed AAPS. The NRC agrees that thebackground investigation required in the fitness-for-duty rule may be difficultto conduct in some cases and that the desired information may not alwaysbe forthcoming. Consequently, the term ``suitable inquiry'' in andSection;26.3 has been modified to provide for a ``best effort'' verification, thatis, attempts should be made to obtain information for the entire five yearperiod, but under no circumstances may unescorted access be granted basedon an employment check of less than three years. In addition, a requirementhas been added to andSection; 26.27(a) that a suitable inquiry will be conductedonly after obtaining a signed release from the worker or prospective workerauthorizing the inquiry. The NRC recognizes the potential additional requirements under the fitness-for-dutyrule as compared to currently required background checks for security personnelcontained in Appendix B to Part 73. Nevertheless, the required checks withprior employers in the fitness-for-duty rule are considered necessary forthe safety and security reasons noted earlier. 14.2.2 <T3>Overlap in Training Requirements.</T3> The NRC recognizes that thereis some overlap in the two training requirements, but does not find anyinconsistencies. Moreover, the fitness-for-duty requirements are more comprehensive,to include techniques for recognizing drugs and understanding the roleand responsibilities of other fitness-for-duty program elements such asthe employee assistance program. Consequently, no changes were made inthe final rule. 14.2.3 <T3>Relationship of Employee Assistance Program to the Proposed AccessAuthorization Policy Statement. </T3>The NRC recognizes that there is aconnection between the employee assistance program and proposed accessauthorization policy statement requirements. Under Section 26.25, employeeassistance program staff will provide confidential assistance except wheresafety considerations must prevail and when the employee assistance programcounselor believes that a worker's condition poses a hazard to himselfor herself or others. Otherwise, voluntary self-referrals to the employeeassistance program are treated confidentially and are not reported to management;therefore, that information would not be available for disclosure in responseto an inquiry of previous employers. The NRC is satisfied that there isnot an inconsistency in the employee assistance program and proposed accessauthorization policy statement requirements and consequently no changesare made in the final rule. 14.2.4 <T3>Temporary Unescorted Access Authorization. </T3>NRC agrees that licenseesmay grant temporary unescorted access authorization provided that all requirementspertaining to the granting of temporary access have been completed andthe prospective worker has passed a chemical test. Clarifying languagehas been added to andSection; 26.27(a). 15.0 Reporting and Recordkeeping <ITAG tagnum="81">15.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>15.1.1 <T3>Fitness-for-Duty Program Performance Data Form. </T3>Many commentson the data form were received. All were severely negative. The consensuswas that the stated data requirements are excessive, unnecessary, and expensiveand will contribute nothing to the public health and safety. Virtuallyall respondents asked for deletion of the form and its associated requirements.15.1.2 <T3>Reports to NRC. </T3>Section 26.73 directs the licensee to provideinformation concerning fitness-for-duty events. This was presumed to includeidentities of violators and a record of the incident and its disposition.Some commenters thought that the NRC is not qualified to ensure the necessarydegree of confidentiality demanded for these records, while others pointedout that the NRC handles much sensitive information including classifiedinformation and thus is well qualified to receive specific fitness-for-dutydata. Among the latter, one commenter went so far as to suggest that theNRC, rather than the licensees, implement and administer the violationstracking system. Public Citizen expressed general support of the reportingrequirements and recommended that they be augmented to include additionalinformation. 15.1.3 <T3>Reporting Time Requirements.</T3> Section 26.73(a)(2) requires detailedreports on all significant fitness-for-duty events and actions to be madeto the NRC Operations Center by phone within 24 hours and in writing within30 days. Many commenters claimed that the 24-hour requirement is excessive.Others pointed out conflicts or potential conflicts between reporting requirementsin the fitness-for-duty rule and those cited in 10 CFR 73.71, 10 CFR 50.72,and Reg. Guide 5.62. 15.1.4 <T3>Incident Locale. </T3>Commenters posed questions as to whether drugor alcohol-related incidents should be reported if they occur outside protectedareas_either on-site or off-site. <ITAG tagnum="81">15.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>15.2.1 <T3>Fitness-for-Duty Program Performance Data Form. </T3>The NRC does notbelieve that collection of data in a standard format unnecessarily burdenslicensees. Collecting data in a standard format would assure that appropriatedata is collected, and would facilitate periodic analysis and audits. Certaininformation is necessary for the NRC to evaluate the effectiveness of therule (and if necessary, make appropriate improvements or changes) and industryprograms and a standard data format would provide a tool for the Commission'speriodic review program. No specific improvements to the form were suggestedby commenters. However, NUMARC has developed and proposed to the NRC astandard form for data collection. The NRC will specify only the generaltypes of data to be collected in the rule with the expectation that allpower reactor licensees will use an NRC-approved NUMARC form. 15.2.2 <T3>Reports to NRC. </T3>The NRC sees no reason to change the rule in responseto comments that sensitive information not be provided. The reporting requirementsin andSection; 26.73 have been modified to add alcohol and delete writtenreports of reportable events. The rule has been modified to require periodicsubmittal of program performance data. 15.2.3 <T3>Reporting Time Requirements. </T3>The NRC will maintain the 24-hourreporting deadline for fitness-for-duty events involving licensed operatorsand supervisory personnel. Licensees should note that this provision supersedesand relaxes the 1-hour reporting period required for the fitness-for-dutycategories of safeguards events in 10 CFR 73.71. The NRC will publish arevision to Regulatory Guide 5.62 to ensure consistency with this rule.15.2.4 <T3>Incident Locale. </T3>The NRC has modified the wording of andSection;26.73, ``Reporting Requirements,'' to make it clear that incidents involvinglicensed operators or supervisory personnel occurring off-site or externalto protected areas must be reported.16.0 Audits of Fitness-for-Duty Programs <ITAG tagnum="81">16.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>Approximately one-third of the comments received concerning audits of fitness-for-dutyprograms addressed the frequency requirement for the audits, which is 13months in the proposed rule. The majority of these commenters stated thatthe rule should be revised to require an audit every three years, afteran initial audit is performed within 13 months of implementation of theprogram. Most of the other commenters stated that the audit frequency shouldbe once every three or five years. One commenter stated that the auditperiod should remain on a 13-month cycle. Two commenters questioned how information that is protected under andSection;26.29(b) can be used when sharing audit results of contractors as describedin andSection; 26.80(a). Section 26.29(b) prohibits disclosing some of theinformation that would be collected during an audit. Many commenters stated that the word ``effectiveness'' in andSection;andSection;26.80(a) and 26.80(b) is too subjective and that ``compliance with theregulations'' should be the requirement. Several commenters stated that the phrase in andSection; 26.80(b), ``individualsqualified in the subjects being audited,'' should be clarified. One commenter stated that andSection; 26.80(a) should be revised to deletethe requirement for the licensee to be responsible for the effectivenessof contractor programs and implementation of appropriate corrective actionfor contractor programs since this should be the contractor's responsibility.Two commenters stated that andSection; 26.80(a) should be clarified as towhether or not a licensee may accept audits for contractors conducted byother licensees. One commenter stated that the requirement in andSection;andSection; 26.80(a)and 26.80(c) that audit reports be maintained on-site and at corporateheadquarters be changed to corporate headquarters only. The basis for thiscomment is that some utilities have several reactor sites and maintainingthe reports at each site would be a redundant effort. <ITAG tagnum="81">16.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC has maintained the andSection; 26.80(a) requirement for an auditfrequency of nominally every 12 months. This decision is based on the needto assure the reliability and accuracy of chemical testing procedures.As industry experience with fitness-for-duty programs accumulates and ismade available to the NRC, the Commission may re-evaluate the frequencyof required audits, as warranted. The NRC agrees that andSection;andSection; 26.29(b) and 26.80(a) of the proposedrule contained a conflict concerning protection of information. Section26.29(b) has been revised to explicitly allow licensees to have accessto personal information that may need to be examined during audits. The NRC intentionally has used the word ``effectiveness'' throughout therule to ensure that all affected parties maintain an overall concern forthe rule's objectives rather than focusing on documentation of programcompliance with ``the letter of the law.'' Although compliance is important,the Commission's over-riding concern is an answer to the question, ``Isthe program working?'' The NRC believes that current wording in the rule is adequate to defineauditor qualifications. The intent of this section is to ensure that anindividual, for example, who is not a licensed physician and has no knowledgeof substance abuse is not assigned to evaluate the effectiveness of a particularMedical Review Officer's decision making. Similarly, the NRC expects thatpersons who are evaluating testing laboratories will be knowledgeable aboutthe forensic implications of laboratory procedures. Because individualswho possess the requisite skills to conduct these audits are likely tobe relatively rare and their services needed only infrequently, licenseeswill probably find it necessary to contract for appropriate audit staffrather than staffing an entire audit team from the licensee's Quality AssuranceProgram. Current wording in the rule is intended to recognize and encouragesuch an approach to staffing program audits.The NRC does not agree with the commenter who suggested that licenseesshould not be responsible for contractor programs. As noted in the discussionof comments pertaining to the scope of the rule, the licensee is the grantingauthority for unescorted access to protected areas and so is responsiblefor the fitness-for-duty and the reliability of any individuals to whomunescorted access is granted, whether contractor or licensee employee.Only by monitoring the effectiveness of contractor programs that the licenseeaccepts and requiring necessary changes can the licensee be assured thatthe trust implied by the granting of unescorted access is warranted. The intent of the wording in the proposed rule is to reduce the burdenon licensees by allowing audits of contractors to be shared between licenseesand to reduce the burden on contractors who provide personnel to severalutilities by reducing the number of required audits. However, each licenseehas the ultimate responsibility to ensure that all contractors performingactivities within the scope of the rule comply with the rule. The NRC agrees it is unnecessary to dictate where the licensees shouldmaintain copies of the audit reports as long as a copy is available forNRC inspection. Section 26.80(a) has been changed accordingly. 17.0 Implementation Schedule <ITAG tagnum="81">17.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>The NRC received numerous comments on the proposed implementation schedulefor the rule. Eighteen comments were received from individual licensees.In addition, a number of other licensees submitted letters endorsing theNUMARC position on the rule as a whole, including NUMARC's position onthe implementation schedule. Commenters generally agreed that 90 days wasinsufficient time to implement the provisions of the rule. Problems withthe development of training material, modification of existing EAPs, developmentof administrative procedures, negotiations with unions, and the establishmentof contracts with chemical testing laboratories were cited by many of thecommenters as reasons for the need for a longer period for implementation.Most commenters suggested that 180 days be allowed for implementation ofall provisions of the rule. Some commenters proposed that additional timebeyond 180 days be allowed for the implementation of the random testingprovisions of the rule. <ITAG tagnum="81">17.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC places a high priority on the implementation of the fitness-for-dutyprograms and policies required by the present rule. Many licensees alreadyhave in place most of the key program elements. However, because of thecomplex provisions of the rule, the need for some licensees to establishcontractual relations with laboratories, the need to develop implementationprocedures, the need to augment existing training materials, and the needto coordinate the provisions of the rule with numerous contractors andnegotiate with unions, the NRC is convinced that the quality of the programswill be enhanced by extending the implementation of all provisions of therule until 180 days after the effective date of the final rule. Becauseof the importance of the rule, the NRC cannot support the further extensionof the implementation of the random testing provision of the rule pastthe 180-day deadline. Although licensees need not submit written policies and procedures to theNRC for approval prior to implementing their programs, the Commission hasreserved to itself the authority to review the program at any time to assurethat the program meets the performance objectives of the rule. If the reviewor other inspections detect a shortcoming in the program, the Commissioncan then require corrective action. 18.0 Legal Issues <ITAG tagnum="81">18.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>18.1.1 <T3>Constitutionality of Rule.</T3> Several commenters noted that significantissues of constitutionality with regard to drug testing in the workplacehave been raised under the Fourth Amendment and that these issues are currentlybeing reviewed within the judicial system. Two drug testing cases are onthe current calendar of the United States Supreme Court. (<T3>National Treasury Employees Union </T3>v. <T3>Von Raab</T3>, 816 F.2d 170 (5th Cir. 1987), <T3>cert. granted</T3>, 108 S.Ct. 1072 (1988); <T3>Railway Labor Executives Association </T3>v. <T3>Burnley</T3>, 839 F.2d 575 (9th Cir. 1988), <T3>cert. granted</T3>, 108 S.Ct. 2033 (1988)). Generally, commenters representingoperators of power reactors support the constitutionality of the rule,while commenters representing labor organizations or individuals challengethe rule's constitutionality. A few of these commenters suggested thatthe Commission delay its rule until the Supreme Court has acted on thecases before it. A few commenters stated that the taking of the urine sample for analysispresented a violation of a person's right of privacy under the First Amendmentto the Constitution. A few commenters questioned whether the rule might not violate the selfincrimination provision of the Fifth Amendment to the Constitution, inparticular with regard to the potential for release of adverse test resultsto local police. 18.1.2 <T3>Federal Rehabilitation Act.</T3> A few commenters suggested that theCommission should address the Federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amendedby the Rehabilitation, Comprehensive Services, and Developmental DisabilitiesAmendments of 1978 (29 U.S.C.  701-796) in relation to its fitness-for-dutyrule. 18.1.3 <T3>Preemption of State and Local Laws.</T3> Several commenters noted thatsome states have enacted laws that appear to conflict with the Commission'srule, and requested clarification whether the Commission's rule would bepreemptive of state and local law. 18.1.4 <T3>Appeal Procedure.</T3> Some commenters questioned the need for andscope of the appeal procedure required by the rule. Reference to due processwas seen as importing unnecessarily complicated judicial type procedures,and that fairness was the goal. Reference to collective bargaining procedureswas viewed as undesirable because those procedures often incorporate bindingarbitration which would also unduly complicate the appeal of denial ofunescorted access because of an adverse fitness-for-duty finding. Finally,appeals should be limited to permanent employees of the licensee and notbe extended to the employees of contractors. 18.1.5 <T3>Protection of Information.</T3> Some commenters raised questions aboutthe protection of information, specifically reporting of information tolocal police, and disclosure of information to arbitrators and the affectedindividuals. One commenter asked the Commission to address the relationshipbetween protection of information under the Commission's rule and the informationprotection requirements of 42 CFR Part 2, dealing with drug and alcoholabuse treatment programs. 18.1.6 <T3>Collective Bargaining Rights.</T3> A commenter raised a question aboutthe relationship of the Commission's rule to the rights of workers underthe National Labor Relations Act to bargain over conditions of employmentand asked that the Commission state its position. 18.1.7 <T3>Employee Assistance Program.</T3> A commenter asked for the Commissionto indicate its legal authority for including employee assistance programsin the rule. 18.1.8 <T3>Administrative Procedures for Alcohol.</T3> A few commenters questionedwhether the notice of proposed rulemaking was adequate to address issuesregarding alcohol use and to support the inclusion of alcohol-related provisionsin the final rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">18.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>18.2.1 <T3>Constitutionality of Rule.</T3> It is the Commission's considered opinionat this point that continued assurance of nuclear safety in the operationof power reactors fully justifies the rule being promulgated. The imperativesof safe operation of nuclear power reactors demand a workplace where thereliability, integrity and physical and mental fitness for their assignedduties of all categories of workers with unescorted access to plant equipmentis unquestioned. The program being mandated by this rule is reasonablyrelated to the achievement of the Commission's safety objective. The Commissionhas no doubt that the rule will significantly enhance safety of operationsat nuclear power reactors. It goes without saying, however, that the Commissionwill review this rule in light of relevant future Supreme Court decisions,and make whatever revisions those decisions require. The two cases cited above were decided on March 21, 1989 in favor of drugtesting as presented by the circumstances of those cases (<T3>Skinner</T3> v. <T3>Railway Labor Executives Association.</T3> No. 87-1555; and <T3>National Treasury Employees Union</T3> v. <T3>Von Raab.</T3> No. 86-1879). Neither presented issues to the Courtfor its consideration in the context of the imperatives of nuclear safetynor addressed random testing. However, the logic of those cases gives theCommission added assurance that this rule represents a proper and prudentregulatory action for the protection of public health and safety. It is already well established that persons working in nuclear power plantshave diminished expectations of privacy in the workplace with respect tofitness-for-duty issues. For example, control room operators are licensedunder rules (10 CFR Part 55) that require medical examination bienniallyand general good health. Security personnel are subject to medical andmental qualifications, including use of alcohol and drugs (see 10 CFR Part73, Appendix B). All personnel and their hand-carried items (such as lunchboxes) are subject to search upon entering the protected areas of nuclearpower plants, including pat down searches when metal and explosive detectorsare not working or when there is suspicion that the person may be attemptingto bring proscribed items into the protected area (see 10 CFR 73.55). Most,if not all, licensees of nuclear power plants also are committed throughtheir security plans under 10 CFR Part 73, to conduct background investigations,administer psychological examinations, and observe employees for indicationsof aberrant behavior. Licensees also have behavioral observation programsthat follow Edison Electric Institute guidelines. Finally, all personswith unescorted access to nuclear power plants are, by Federal law, subjectto a criminal history records check that requires the taking of fingerprintsand the submission of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation(see 10 CFR 73.57). The provision of a urine sample or taking of a breathalyzertest is a small increment in the diminished expectation of privacy underwhich persons work in a nuclear power plant. Accordingly, the Commissionconcludes that its rule does not constitute an unconstitutional invasionof the right of privacy. Indeed, persons working in nuclear power plantsmay already be considered to be highly regulated, and, in regard to FourthAmendment issues, within the ambit of <T3>Shoemaker</T3> v. <T3>Handel,</T3> 795 F.2d 1136 (3rd Cir. 1986), <T3>cert. denied,</T3> 479 U.S. 986 (1986). On the assumption that the rule being promulgated is within the Constitutionin other respects, the rule's provisions on protection of information donot infringe upon the right of a person to not incriminate himself. Inthe Commission's view, the case of <T3>Schmerber</T3> v. <T3>California,</T3> 384 U.S. 757 (1966) controls the issue. In that case,the Court upheld the taking of a blood sample for alcohol analysis againsta Fifth Amendment challenge. A urine sample is no more incriminating. 18.2.2 <T3>Federal Rehabilitation Act.</T3> The Federal Rehabilitation Act of1973, as amended, does not include, within the concept of ``handicappedperson'', an individual who is an alcohol or drug abuser whose currentuse of alcohol or drugs prevents that individual from performing the dutiesof the job in question or whose employment, by reason of such current alcoholor drug abuse, would constitute a direct threat to property or the safetyof others (see 10 CFR 4.101(a) and 29 U.S.C. 706(7)(B)). An individual whose urine or breath sample tests positive for drugs oralcohol is obviously a current user whose continued unescorted access toplant equipment constitutes a threat to nuclear safety. However, a personwho enters into an employee assistance program and whose subsequent testsare negative is not a current user and would be entitled to the protectionof the Federal Rehabilitation Act if it were applicable to his place ofwork because of his employer's receipt of or benefit from Federal financialassistance. Federal financial assistance is defined at 10 CFR 4.4(d) andmeans essentially the provision by the Federal Government of any fundsor personnel or property free of charge or at reduced rates. The Commissiondoes not provide any Federal financial assistance to nuclear power reactorlicensees. On the contrary, the Commission charges power reactor licenseesfor the regulatory services it renders (see 10 CFR Parts 170 and 171).Whether or not other Federal agencies provide such assistance is not knownto the Commission. Each licensee implementing the Commission's fitness-for-dutyrule will need to determine for itself whether it is receiving such assistance.18.2.3 <T3>Preemption of State and Local Laws.</T3> The Atomic Energy Act of 1954,as amended, preempts to the Federal Government the field of regulationof nuclear power reactors in all matters pertaining to radiological safetyof operation. See 10 CFR 8.4, <T3>Pacific Gas and Electric Co.,</T3> v. <T3>State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Comm.,</T3> 461U.S. 190 (1983). However, State laws on possession, sale or use of controlledsubstances and alcohol were enacted with broad social goals in mind ratherthan radiological safety. Thus, such laws would not be preempted. Therewould be preemption in the rare case where a State sought to control fitness-for-dutyof nuclear plant employees for radiological safety purposes or a Statelaw made compliance with NRC's fitness-for-duty rule difficult or impossible.18.2.4 <T3>Appeal Procedure.</T3> The Commission believes that an appeal or reviewprocedure with respect to positive alcohol or drug determinations is neededbecause elementary fairness to the adversely affected individual will helpassure employee cooperation in the implementation of the licensee's program.Such cooperation should contribute to successful implementation of therule. Fairness is represented in the rule by the employee assistance program,the appeal procedure, and the protection of information. Therefore, theappeal procedure is retained, but modified to replace reference to dueprocess with reference to impartiality and objectivity and removal of referenceto collective bargaining agreements. Because the focus of the rule is onfitness for unescorted access and not directed at an employment relationship,and because the licensee will be making the access determination basedon fitness-for-duty for all persons needing unescorted access, whetherthey are permanent employees, temporary employees or contractor employees,the procedure is not being limited to permanent employees of the licensee.The Commission notes, however, that in union plants the review procedurecovers drug and alcohol issues subject to collective bargaining and thatthe removal of the reference to collective bargaining agreements in therule does not preclude bargained for procedures, including binding arbitration,from being employed in resolving disputes over fitness-for-duty determinations.The allowance of an internal management review is discretionary only, andnot mandatory except in the absence of any other procedure. 18.2.5 <T3>Protection of Information.</T3> It is not the Commission's intentionthat results of testing be routinely available to local law enforcementagencies except under court order since the test result does not, in andof itself, demonstrate whether the use of the drug or alcohol was on-siteor off-site, legal or illegal. The Commission is, however, firmly convincedthat on-site criminal conduct, such as sale or possession of illegal substances,not be protected by the Commission's rule. The Commission agrees that theindividual to whom the information pertains should be able to see the recordsin which the information is contained. The Commission also agrees thatsuch records should be available to an arbitrator, or other adjudicatorwho is being asked to resolve a fitness-for-duty dispute, provided therecords are relevant to the particular dispute. Section 26.29 has beenmodified to clarify its application accordingly. With regard to 42 CFR Part 2, it is the Commission's conclusion that ithas no relationship to the Commission's rule. 42 CFR Part 2 comprises theregulations of the Department of Health and Human Services implementingSection 408 of the Drug Abuse Prevention, Treatment, and RehabilitationAct (42 U.S.C. 290 et. seq.). It states the rules for maintaining confidentialityof patient records for persons in drug or alcohol abuse prevention andtreatment programs regulated by or receiving assistance from the UnitedStates Government. First, the Commission is providing no assistance toany such program in the private sector. Second, it is not regulating sucha program. The requirement for an employee assistance program does notmandate a treatment program that would fall under the regulations in 42CFR Part 2. As noted in the response to the issue of preemption, the employeeassistance program is not a preempted area. Its content is open to bargainingand the application of other nonconflicting State laws. Further, licenseesare not precluded from referring employees to treatment programs to whichthe HHS rules might apply as long as the minimum program required by section26.25 is provided by the licensee. In that case outside patient recordswould be totally separate from records required by 10 CFR Part 26 and wouldbe protected according to other applicable rules. 18.2.6 <T3>Collective Bargaining Rights.</T3> According to Memorandum GC 87-5,issued by the General Counsel of the National Labor Relations Board onSeptember 8, 1987, drug or alcohol testing for current employees and jobapplicants is a mandatory subject of collective bargaining and that theimplementation of a drug or alcohol testing program is a substantial changein working conditions. Although the Commission's rule requires a drug andalcohol testing program and sets certain standards for it, the rule isnot one directed at labor relations, but rather at nuclear safety. TheCommission's rule applies equally to union and nonunion workers. It doesnot affect, even indirectly, the right of self-organization provided bythe National Labor Relations Act. The rule does not preclude collectivebargaining over issues in drug or alcohol testing programs that are notaddressed by it. In the Commission's view, its rule and the opinion ofthe NLRB General Counsel are compatible documents. See, <T3>Metropolitan Life Insurance Co.</T3> v. <T3>Massachusetts,</T3> 471 U.S. 724, 755 (1985).18.2.7 <T3>Employee Assistance Program. </T3>The authority statement for the rulestates that it is promulgated under Section 161, among others, of the AtomicEnergy Act. Included within Section 161 is section 161i(3) which givesthe Commission authority to promulgate rules to govern any activity authorizedpursuant to the Atomic Energy Act, including operation of facilities, toprotect health and safety. The employee assistance program required bythe rule is an incremental addition to safety by giving persons with fitness-for-dutyproblems a nonthreatening avenue to resolve those problems, thus removinga potential for compromising the safety of operation of a nuclear powerreactor. In the Commission's view the employee assistance program can beincorporated in a Commission rule under the broad scope of Section 161of the Atomic Energy Act. 18.2.8 <T3>Administrative Procedures for Alcohol. </T3>Under the AdministrativeProcedure Act (5 U.S.C. 553) the Commission is obligated to provide inits notice of proposed rulemaking either the terms or substance of theproposed rule or a description of the subject and issues involved. Withrespect to alcohol, the proposed rule specifically included it in the scopeof the licensees' fitness-for-duty programs (andSection; 26.20). The performanceobjectives are applicable to any substance, legal or illegal, that canadversely affect a person's ability to perform. There is no doubt thatalcohol is such a substance. The rule text did not, however, include prescriptiverequirements for alcohol. However, the Commission expressly asked for commenton the extent to which guidance should be given as to alcohol and prescriptiondrugs. Standards for blood alcohol content were extensively discussed inthe Statement of Considerations along with a Commission request for commenton whether the Commission should prescribe a cutoff level for alcohol.Thus, the notice of proposed rulemaking clearly covered alcohol both inthe terms of the proposed rule and in describing in some detail the subjectand issues involved. The public was well advised that alcohol testing wasa subject within the rulemaking and that the Commission expected to resolvebasic issues regarding testing for alcohol in the comment period on theproposed rule. Therefore, the inclusion in the final rule of basic additionalrequirements for alcohol testing is, in the Commission's view, well withinthe scope of the proposal. There is no requirement that the additionalrule text dealing with alcohol testing be published for separate comment,and not as part of the final rule. 19.0 Costs/Benefits <ITAG tagnum="81">19.1 Summary of Comments </ITAG>Several commenters stated that the NRC should justify the rulemaking underthe provisions of andSection; 50.109(a)(3), however, no commenters supportedthe alternative that a backfitting analysis is not necessary under theprovisions of andSection; 50.109(a)(ii). Several commenters said that the estimated costs in the Backfit Analysiswere substantially underestimated in the following cost element areas:costs to administer the testing and training programs, particularly theestimate of the numbers of additional staff that would be necessary toadminister the program; length of time estimated for individual employeetraining, both initial and refresher; time to take a test between leavingand returning to work area; added cost of using HHS certified laboratoriesand quality control measures; and, costs to conduct background checks.In addition to these comments, one person, whose comments were includedas enclosures by two respondents from one union, contended that: the numberof persons that would be tested is underestimated and did not include contractorpersonnel; incremental costs are incorrect because not all plants havefully developed programs; average life of plants should be 40 years ratherthan 25; use of 10 percent discount rate is unrealistic; and, costs associatedwith alcohol, legal drug use, and other kinds of performance impairmentwere ignored. This commenter also contends that: written policies and procedures andlabor contract modifications involve recurring as well as initial costs;employee turnover needs to be factored into training and testing; costsof employee assistance programs do not include medical and counseling staff,training materials, and medical testing and treatment; costs of legal challengesresulting from the program omitted awards of back pay and/or damages andunderestimated volume of appeals; and, indirect costs to workers from falsepositives (lost jobs or wages, humiliation, etc.) are not included. In addition to these cost comments, one person, whose comments were includedas enclosures by two respondents from one union, contended that benefitsare overestimated and not documented. In particular, the commenter challenged:benefits of reduction in lost productivity due to employees being unfitfor duty; the nexus between use of illegal drugs and impairment of workperformance; and, reduction in insurance rates resulting from more comprehensivedrug testing. <ITAG tagnum="81">19.2 Summary of Responses </ITAG>The NRC agrees with the comments that the rulemaking should be justifiedunder the provisions of 10 CFR 50.109 (a)(3). The Backfit Analysis hasbeen modified based on consideration of the above cost comments as follows:19.2.1 <T3>Cost to Administer the Testing and Training Programs. </T3>Staff agreesand has adjusted the cost estimate to include the costs of: a. Additional personnel to administer the testing and training programs;b. One person for program administration and recordkeeping; c. One person for collection and processing of specimens; and d. A Medical Review Officer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Miscellaneous costs have also been increased to better reflect thecosts of forms and record development, and the costs of protected storagefor records. 19.2.2 <T3>Length of Time for Individual Training. </T3>Based on the comments,the estimate of training costs has been adjusted to reflect the following:(a) At least one hour of initial training for <T3>all </T3>employees; (b) At least four <T3>additional </T3>hours of initial training for supervisors. 19.2.3 <T3>Time to Take a Test. </T3>Several commenters noted that the estimateof 30 minutes of an employee's lost productive time is too low. Lost productivetime can include time to secure and restart work in progress and travelbetween the employee's work station and the specimen collection station.The Backfit Analysis estimate was based on an assumption of 15 minutesfor travel to and from the collection site and 15 minutes at the collectionstation. This was based on the assumption that the majority of employeestested would have work stations within the protected area, and that atmost sites the collection station would be efficiently located in or nearthe protected area to accommodate the large number of tests to be conducted.Also, the staff had assumed that after selecting an individual for testingon a given day, selection of when the test will be conducted that day wouldtake into account holding down lost production time. Staff discussed theseassumptions with licensees who have been conducting testing. Some suggested90 minutes might be appropriate. Other licensees questioned said that 30minutes is adequate, but that longer times could result from administrativeinefficiencies. Based on the comments and the further discussions the estimatedtime has been increased to 60 minutes. 19.2.4 <T3>Added Cost of Using HHS-Certified Laboratories and Quality ControlMeasures. </T3>Staff reexamined the cost estimates of initial and confirmatorytests by contacting three laboratories to determine their charges for initialscreening and confirmatory tests. Prices quoted were $16, $17, $20, and$25 per initial test, and $50, $65, and $75 per confirmatory test. Thelab that was on the high end for initial test cost was on the low end forconfirmatory test cost, and had two prices, which depended on the numberof samples in the contract. It is speculative to assess whether the labscontacted would have to undergo any additional expenditures to be so certifiedand whether they would pass such costs on to their customers or would absorbthose costs to remain competitive. Costs could go down due to economiesof scale, but could go up initially due to increased demand for certifiedlabs exceeding the supply. Staff sees no compelling reason to change theBackfit Analysis cost estimates of $20 per initial screening and $75 perconfirmatory test. An additional cost of quality control is the blind samples to be includedalong with the employee specimens. The Backfit Analysis included a costto the utilities of $50 per blind performance test specimen. This costis in addition to the cost of initial screening and confirmatory testson these specimens. Staff believes that this is a reasonable representationof the quality control costs that will be incurred, and has made no changeto this cost. 19.2.5 <T3>Costs to Conduct Background Checks. </T3>The staff disagrees that thereis a need to include the costs of conducting background checks in the incrementalcost estimate. Industry has already committed to these background checksthrough NUMARC in its Access Authorization Program, and thus costs associatedwith background checks would be expended regardless of whether or not theywere required by the Fitness-For-Duty Rule. 19.2.6 <T3>Number of Persons to be Tested. </T3>The Backfit Analysis assumed anaverage of 1500 employees and contractors would be tested randomly at eachplant. This estimate was based on experience with the fingerprint cardssubmitted to the NRC in compliance with 10 CFR 73.57, which requires thesecards to be submitted for all persons granted unescorted access to theprotected area. This is the same population as would be covered by theFitness-For-Duty Rule. After receiving the comments, staff checked theseestimates with several licensees and was satisfied that the estimate isappropriate. Staff disagrees that any change is needed to this elementof the cost estimate. 19.2.7 <T3>Incremental Costs. </T3>The comment that not all plants have fullydeveloped programs would be inconsistent with full implementation of industrycommitments to follow the EEI guidelines. Any costs incurred because commitmentshave not been met are considered costs for corrective action and not animpact of the present rulemaking. 19.2.8 <T3>Average Life of Plants. </T3>The NRC issues licenses with a 40 yearlimit. For many plants this time starts at the date of the constructionpermit, resulting in 30 years remaining for operation. Some plants arebeing licensed for 40 years from the date of the operating license, resultingin a longer operating period. Some plants are just beginning their operationswhile others have already been operating under license for many years.Whether the useful life of some will be extended through license renewalis somewhat speculative and has not been considered. However, the effecton the total cost will be small in any event because costs beyond 25 yearscontribute little to the total cost in the present worth approach the NRCis using for its cost estimates. 19.2.9 <T3>Use of 10 Percent Discount Rate. </T3>The NRC uses a 10 percent discountrate in its regulatory impact analyses to be consistent with applicableOMB guidance. Because of concerns that this rate may be unrealistic atthe present time, the NRC also shows the costs associated with a perhapsmore realistic 5 percent discount rate. 19.2.10 <T3>Costs Associated with Other Performance Impairments. </T3>Staff disagreesthat any change to the Backfit Analysis is needed for these costs. Activitiesassociated with preventing alcohol abuse, legal drug use, and other kindsof performance impairment consist of training, testing and employee assistanceprograms. The costs assumed for these cost elements already cover theseactivities. 19.2.11 <T3>Recurring Costs. </T3>The staff disagrees that any change to the BackfitAnalysis is needed for recurring costs of written procedures and contractmodifications. Staff agrees that licensees incur recurring costs for periodicrevision to these documents, but sees no significant difference to theserecurring costs attributable to the Fitness-For-Duty Rule. Costs of periodicrevisions would accrue even without the Fitness-For-Duty Rule. Furthermore,only the costs for compliance with the rule need be considered, not costsof elective changes. The Backfit Analysis contains only the one time costto modify these documents to meet the rule requirements. 19.2.12 <T3>Employee Turnover. </T3>One commenter noted that the NRC seemed toassume an employee turnover rate of zero. Staff recognizes that newly hiredworkers also would need orientation training, but considers this to notadd to the incremental costs because such training is already part of theindustry's existing fitness-for-duty programs. Staff considers the onetime cost for current employees to be an additional cost beyond the currentindustry fitness-for-duty costs because the revisions to the industry programat many plants will require retraining of existing staff in these new proceduresand rules of employment insofar as they differ from existing fitness-for-dutyprocedures and rules of employment. Staff disagrees that any change tothe incremental costs is needed for employee turnover. 19.2.13 <T3>Costs of Employee Assistance Programs. </T3>Staff agrees that the costsof medical and counseling staff, training materials, and medical testingand treatment were underestimated, and has revised the Backfit Analysisto include additional personnel to administer the testing and trainingprograms, in addition to the additional employee assistance program staffprovided for in the draft analysis. 19.2.14 <T3>Costs of Legal Challenges. </T3>Staff agrees that there may be somecosts associated with these legal challenges, but has no basis for assessingthese costs. Attention to quality controls, whose costs were included,should serve to minimize these legal costs.19.2.15 <T3>Indirect Costs to Workers from False Positives. </T3>The program hasbeen designed to essentially eliminate false positives by use of diversestate of the art testing procedures and quality controls, including theuse of certified laboratories, blind samples, chains of custody, and retentionof portions of specimens for retesting. The staff agrees that the coststo an individual could be substantial should such an event occur but hasnot included these indirect costs in a quantitative manner for lack ofa means for estimating them fairly. The NRC has considered these indirectcosts in a qualitative sense, and has determined that the benefits warrantany such indirect costs (which are highly unlikely) in addition to thequantified direct costs. 19.2.16 <T3>Benefits Overestimated. </T3>Benefits are described in Items 3 and4 of the Backfit Analysis. The latter included the statement that, in additionto the more important benefits of preventing unacceptable risk to the publicfrom radiological releases, benefits will likely accrue to licensees fromthe potential reduction in absenteeism, lost worker productivity, medicaland insurance costs, and plant downtime. Staff agrees that these claimedbenefits have not been quantified or documented. Staff did not intend toimply that the cost reductions associated with these benefits would outweighthe costs of implementation of the Fitness-For-Duty Program, only thatthese benefits would exist and would serve to somewhat offset the expensesof the program. Lack of quantification of these benefits tends to makethe Backfit Analysis cost increase estimates conservative. With respect to the relationship of illegal drugs and impairment of workperformance, see discussion under Item 3, Impairment <T3>vs </T3>Reliability, above, and NUREG/CR 5227, ``Fitness-For-Duty inthe Nuclear Power Industry: A Review of the Technical Issues.'' <ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Significant Changes From the Proposed Rule  </ITAG>The NRC amended several sections of the proposed rule in response to commentsreceived from the public on the issues and in response to questions raisedin the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking. The following is a summary of thesignificant changes.  The scope of the rule was amended to include power reactors under constructionand to extend the date for implementation of all requirements to 180 daysafter the effective date of the rule. The definition of ``confirmed positive test'' was amended to clarify thatthe test is not a confirmed positive until the Medical Review Officer hasreviewed the test results. The Medical Review Officer's review must becompleted and licensee management notified within 10 days of the initialpresumptive positive screening test. The definition of ``suitable inquiry'' was amended to clarify that a best-effortverification of employment history is intended. A conforming amendmentwas made to the management actions section that required the inquiry. The general performance objectives were amended to clearly show that thereliability and trustworthiness of nuclear power plant personnel must alsobe assured. The requirements for written policies and procedures were amended to includea prohibition against the consumption of alcohol prior to and during work,and the requirement to address situations where a person has been calledin to perform unscheduled work. The requirements for training of escorts have been amended to clarify NRC'sintent that escorts need not be trained as supervisors. The period in which a test must be performed prior to the initial grantingof unescorted access was specified as 60 days. The random testing rate was established as 100 percent per year. The basis for for-cause tests was clarified. NRC testing guidelines modeled after the HHS Guidelines, have been developedas the standards for the collection, protection, and testing of specimensfor drugs and alcohol. Licensees will be required to certify to the NRC that their fitness-for-dutyprograms have been implemented. Testing laboratories shall be laboratories certified by the Departmentof Health and Human Services. A requirement has been added to limit access to the results of preliminarytests. Tests for alcohol are required to be performed in conjunction with othersubstance tests. Tests are to be administered by a breath analysis. A confirmatorytest may be done with another breath measurement instrument, or if demandedby the person being tested, by gas chromatography analysis of blood. The requirements for management actions were revised to add the use ofalcohol which resulted in on-duty impairment as a subject of the inquiryto previous employers. The requirement for making available information concerning prior violationsof a fitness-for-duty program was amended to include a requirement thatthe inquiry be supported by a signed release from the individual beinginvestigated. The frequency of unannounced tests following reinstatement was amendedto require more frequent testing for the first four months. A requirement was added to the section on management actions for licenseesto impose sufficient sanctions for alcohol, prescription drugs and over-the-counterdrugs to deter substance substitution. The appeals process requirements were clarified. The requirements to protect information have been amended to clarify thatpersonal information can be disclosed to persons deciding matters on reviewor appeal, to persons pursuant to a court order, and to auditors (in additionto those listed in the proposed rule). Records retention periods have been changed to five years. A requirement was added for licensees to periodically submit program performancedata. Reporting requirements have been amended to include abuse of alcohol onsiteby a licensed reactor operator or supervisory personnel. The requirement to maintain a copy of the audit report onsite has beendeleted. <ITAG tagnum="84">Modification of Enforcement Policy </ITAG>The Commission is modifying its General Statement of Policy and Procedurefor NRC Enforcement Actions, 10 CFR Part 2, Appendix C (Enforcement Policy)to reflect the Commission's new rule on Fitness-For-Duty, 10 CFR Part 26.The changes to the Enforcement Policy are being published concurrentlywith the new rule. The modifications to the Enforcement Policy are being made in SupplementVII ``Miscellaneous Matters'' to provide examples of violations of fitness-for-dutyrequirements. The examples are A.6, B.6, B.7, B.8, C.6, C.7, C.8, C.9,D.4, D.5, and E.4. As with the examples in the other Supplements to theEnforcement Policy, the new examples are neither controlling nor exhaustivenor do they establish new requirements. The examples are to be used asguidance in considering the severity levels of violations of requirements.In developing the examples, the Commission notes that it is not the unfitperson that establishes the violation but rather the licensee's failures,including those of its contractors and vendors, that create violation.For example, if the licensee has effectively implemented its fitness-for-dutyprogram meeting NRC requirements and, based on behavior observation, identifiesand removes a person not fit for duty, there may not be a regulatory violation.The example for Severity Level I is of very significant concern becauseit represents the failure to implement a fitness-for-duty program. Thisexample would be applicable to a situation where essentially the licenseedoes not have a program in place. The examples for Severity Level II are also very significant because theyinvolve the failure to take action when there is the potential to havea direct impact on safety-related activities. The examples for Severity Level III are significant because they representsignificant individual violations or significant breakdowns in basic elementsof a fitness-for-duty program. Basic elements include important aspectsof the program, such as: training, appeals, records, testing integrity,randomness in testing, audits, prescreening, management response, contractoroversight, and employee assistance. A breakdown in the program categorizedat a Severity Level III will normally involve more than one signficantfailure of a single element or single failures of a number of elements.In addition, a failure to ensure that specimens collected in accordancewith 10 CFR Part 26 are not used for purposes other than those providedby the rule without the permission of the tested individual may also beconsidered a significant violation. Severity Level IV and V violations are matters which, while requiring correction,are less significant to the overall fitness-for-duty program. <ITAG tagnum="84">Enforcement in Other Licensed Activities </ITAG>The Commission notes that this rule applies to 10 CFR Part 50 licenseesonly, it does not establish standards or criteria to be applied to licensedactivities conducted under any other Part of its regulations. This limitedapplication of Part 26 does not mean, however, that the Commission willnot respond to fitness-for-duty issues involving other licensees that affecthealth and safety. Under the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, andits regulations, the Commission may respond to such cases by the issuanceof appropriate orders. As explained in the Commission's Enforcement Policy (see 53 FR 40027, Thursday,October 13, 1988), the Commission may take enforcement action where theconduct of the individual places in question the NRC's reasonable assurancethat licensed activities will be properly conducted. The Commission maytake enforcement action for reasons that would warrant refusal to issuea license on an original application. Accordingly, enforcement action maybe taken regarding matters that raise issues of integrity, competence,fitness for duty, or other matters that may not necessarily be a violationof specific Commission requirements. And, in taking such enforcement action,the Commission may exercise independent discretion as to the standard offitness for duty to be applied, depending on the circumstances of the caseand the significance of the issue to maintaining reasonable assurance inthe protection of the public health and safety in the use and possessionof nuclear materials. For example, the Commission could take action tomodify, revoke or suspend the license of an individually licensed personseen as not fit for duty on standards more strict than provided in Part26, if necessary to protect the health and safety of the public or otherworkers. Similarly, the Commission could take appropriate action regardinga materials licensee where an employee was seen as endangering health andsafety because he or she was not fit for duty. Individuals who are not reliable and trustworthy, under the influence ofany substance, or mentally or physically impaired in any way that adverselyaffects their ability to safely and competently perform their duties, shallnot be licensed or permitted to perform responsible health and safety functions.<ITAG tagnum="84">Supplemental Provisions of the Drug-Free Workplace Act of 1988 </ITAG>In promulgating this rule the Commission has taken note of the fact thatthe Congress of the United States has recently enacted Subtitle D of TitleV of the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-690, enacted November18, 1988), entitled, ``The Drug-Free Workplace Act of 1988.'' This lawrequires any person being awarded a Government contract for property orservices of a value of $25,000 or more to certify to the contracting agencythat it will provide a drug free workplace for the performance of the contract.The precise requirements are in Section 5152 to 5160 of the Anti-Drug AbuseAct. The Commission has compared the requirements of the Drug-Free WorkplaceAct to the requirements of its rule on Fitness-For-Duty and finds no inconsistency.Any licensee implementing 10 CFR Part 26 who may also be subject to SubtitleD should have no difficulty meeting the supplemental provisions of thelatter concerning notification of the contracting agency of convictionsof onsite criminal drug activities [Section 5152(a)(1)(D) of the Anti-DrugAbuse Act] for those employees within the scope of a program meeting theprovisions of 10 CFR Part 26. Whether or not any licensee subject to 10CFR Part 26 is also subject to the Drug-Free Workplace Act of 1988 is aquestion that the Commission cannot answer. Each licensee will have toexamine its own contractual relationships with agencies of the United StatesGovernment, if any, to ascertain if those contractual relationships areof a kind that call the Drug-Free Workplace Act into play. <ITAG tagnum="85">Finding of No Significant Environmental Impact: Availability </ITAG>An environmental assessment was included in the notice of the proposedrulemaking at 53 FR 36822. The Commission has determined under the NationalEnvironmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended, and the Commission's regulationsin Subpart A of 10 CFR Part 51, that this rule is not a major Federal actionsignificantly affecting the quality of the human environment and thereforean environmental impact statement is not required. <ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Statement </ITAG>This final rule contains information collection requirements that are subjectto the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq). These requirementswere approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) at the proposedrule stage, approval number 3150-0146. The final rule adds new informationcollection requirements and increases records retention periods. Therefore,an amended clearance package is being submitted to OMB. The informationcollection requirements contained in the final rule will not become effectiveuntil they are approved by OMB. Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 8 hours per response, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Recordsand Reports Management Branch (P-530), U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555; and to the Paperwork Reduction Project (3150-0146),Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Analysis </ITAG>An analysis of the costs and benefits of the final rule is included inthe backfit analysis described below. <ITAG tagnum="84">Backfit Analysis </ITAG>Several commenters stated that the NRC should justify the rulemaking underthe provisions of andSection; 50.109(a)(3). The NRC agrees, and finds thatthe rule will provide a substantial increase in the overall protectionof public health and safety, and that the direct and indirect costs ofimplementation are justified in view of the increased protection. The backfit analysis is available for inspection and copying for a feeat the NRC Public Document Room at 2120 L Street NW., Washington, DC 20555.Single copies may be obtained by writing to the U.S. Nuclear RegulatoryCommission, Washington, DC 20555.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act Certification</ITAG>In accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980, 5 U.S.C. 605(b),the Commission hereby certifies that this rule will not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. This new 10CFR Part 26 applies to certain owners and operators of civilian nuclearpower reactors and their contractors. The companies that own power reactorfacilities do not fall within the scope of ``small entities'' set forthin the Regulatory Flexibility Act or the small business size standardsset out in regulations issued by the Small Business Administration in 13CFR Part 121. Any costs to the minor number of small entities affected,i.e., contractors, will apply only to those contractor employees workingat the nuclear power reactors, and would probably be reimbursed throughthe contract.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>10 CFR Part 2Administrative practice and procedure, Antitrust, Byproduct material, Classifiedinformation, Civil penalty, Enforcement, Environmental protection, Nuclearmaterials, Nuclear power plants and reactors, Penalty, Sex discrimination,Source material, Special nuclear material, Violations, Waste treatmentand disposal.10 CFR Part 26Alcohol abuse, Alcohol testing, Appeals, Chemical testing, Drug abuse,Drug testing, Employee assistance programs, Fitness for duty, Managementactions, Nuclear power reactors, Protection of information, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.For the reasons set out in the preamble and under the authority of theAtomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, the Energy Reorganization Act of1974, as amended, and 5 U.S.C 553, the NRC is adopting a new 10 CFR Part26, and amending 10 CFR Part 2.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 2_RULES OF PRACTICE FOR DOMESTIC LICENSING PROCEEDINGS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 2 continues to read in part as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 161, 68 Stat. 948, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2201);sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841).</ITAG>2. Appendix C, Supplement VII, is amended by adding example 6 to paragraphA, examples 6, 7, and 8 to paragraph B, examples 6, 7, 8, and 9 to paragraphC, examples 4 and 5 to paragraph D, and example 4 to paragraph E to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix C_General Statement of Policy and Procedure for NRC EnforcementActions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Supplement VII_Severity Categories</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Severity I. * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Failure to substantially implement the required fitness-for-dutyprogram.\18\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\18\ The examples for violations for fitness-for-duty relateto violations of 10 CFR Part 26. <ITAG tagnum="21">B. Severity II. * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Failure to remove an individual from unescorted access who hasbeen involved in the sale, use, or possession of illegal drugs within theprotected area or to take action for on duty misuse of alcohol, prescriptiondrugs, or over-the-counter drugs;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Failure to test for cause when observed behavior within the protectedarea or credible information concerning activities within the protectedarea indicates possible unfitness for duty based on drug or alcohol use;or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Deliberate failure of the licensee's Employee Assistance Programto notify licensee's management when EAP's staff is aware that an individual'scondition may adversely affect safety related activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Severity III. * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Failure to complete a suitable inquiry on the basis of 10 CFR Part26, keep records concerning the denial of access, or respond to inquiriesconcerning such denials such that, as a result of the failure, a personpreviously denied access for fitness-for-duty reasons was improperly grantedaccess; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Failure to take the required action for a person confirmed to havebeen tested positive for illegal drug use or take action for onsite alcoholuse; not amounting to a Severity Level II violation;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Failure to assure, as required, that contractors or vendors havean effective fitness-for-duty program; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Breakdown in the fitness-for-duty program involving a number ofviolations of the basic elements of the fitness-for-duty program that collectivelyreflect a significant lack of attention or carelessness towards meetingthe objectives of 10 CFR 26.10.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Severity IV. * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Isolated failures to meet basic elements of the fitness-for-dutyprogram not involving a Severity Level I, II, or III violation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Failure to report acts of licensed operators or supervisors pursuantto 10 CFR 26.73.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Severity V. * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Minor violations of fitness-for-duty requirements.</ITAG>3. Part 26 is added to 10 CFR Chapter I to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 26_FITNESS FOR DUTY PROGRAMS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.2 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.4 Interpretations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.6 Exemptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.8 Information collection requirements: OMB approval.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">General Performance Objectives</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.10 General performance objectives.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Program Elements and Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.20 Written policy and procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.21 Policy communications and awareness training.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.22 Training of supervisors and escorts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.23 Contractors and vendors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.24 Chemical testing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.25 Employee assistance programs (EAP).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.27 Management actions and sanctions to be imposed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.28 Appeals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.29 Protection of information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Inspections, Records and Reports</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.70 Inspections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.71 Recordkeeping requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.73 Reporting requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Audits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.80 Audits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">26.90 Violations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix A_Guidelines for Nuclear Power Plant Drug and Alcohol TestingPrograms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 53, 81, 103, 104, 107, 161, 68 Stat. 930, 935,936, 937, 939, 948, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2073, 2111, 2112, 2133, 2134,2137, 2201); secs. 201, 202, 206, 88 Stat. 1242, 1244, 1246, as amended(42 U.S.C. 5841, 5842, 5846).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the purposes of sec. 223, 68 Stat. 958, as amended (42 U.S.C.2273) andSection;andSection; 26.20, 26.21, 26.22, 26.23, 26.24, 26.25, 26.27,26.28, 26.29 and 26.80 are issued under secs. 161b and i, 68 Stat. 948,and 949 as amended [42 U.S.C. 2201(b) and (i)]; 26.70, 26.71, and 26.73are issued under sec. 161o, 68 Stat. 950, as amended [42 U.S.C. 2201(o)].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.  </ITAG>This Part prescribes requirements and standards for the establishment andmaintenance of certain aspects of fitness-for-duty programs and proceduresby the licensed nuclear power industry. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>(a) The regulations in this Part apply to licensees authorized to operatea nuclear power reactor. Each licensee shall implement a fitness-for-dutyprogram which complies with this Part. The provisions of the fitness-for-dutyprogram must apply to all persons granted unescorted access to protectedareas, and to licensee, vendor, or contractor personnel required to physicallyreport to a licensee's Technical Support Center (TSC) or Emergency OperationsFacility (EOF) in accordance with licensee emergency plans and procedures.The regulations in this Part do not apply to NRC employees, or to law enforcementpersonnel or offsite emergency fire and medical response personnel whileresponding on-site. (b) Certain regulations in this Part apply to licensees holding permitsto construct a nuclear power plant. Each construction permit holder, witha plant under active construction, shall comply with sections 26.10, 26.20,26.23, 26.70, and 26.73 of this part; shall implement a chemical testingprogram, including random tests; and shall make provisions for employeeassistance programs, imposition of sanctions, appeal procedures, the protectionof information, and recordkeeping. (c) The requirements in this Part must be implemented by each licenseeauthorized to construct or operate a nuclear power reactor no later than(insert date 180 days after the effective date of the final rule).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>``Aliquot'' means a portion of a specimen used for testing. ``Commission'' means the Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its duly authorizedrepresentatives. ``Confirmatory test'' means a second analytical procedure to identify thepresence of a specific drug or drug metabolite which is independent ofthe initial screening test and which uses a different technique and chemicalprinciple from that of the initial screening test in order to ensure reliabilityand accuracy. For determining blood alcohol levels, a ``confirmatory test''means a second test using another breath alcohol analysis device. Furtherconfirmation upon demand will be by gas chromatography analysis of blood.``Confirmed positive test'' means the result of a confirmatory test thathas established the presence of drugs, drug metabolites, or alcohol ina specimen at or above the cut-off level, and that has been deemed positiveby the Medical Review Officer (MRO) after evaluation. A ``confirmed positivetest'' for alcohol can also be obtained as a result of a confirmation ofblood alcohol levels with a second breath analysis without MRO evaluation.``Contractor'' means any company or individual with which the licenseehas contracted for work or service to be performed inside the protectedarea boundary, either by contract, purchase order, or verbal agreement.``Cut-off level'' means the value set for designating a test result aspositive. ``Follow-up testing'' means chemical testing at unannounced intervals,to ensure that an employee is maintaining abstinence from the abuse ofdrugs or alcohol.``Illegal drugs'' means those drugs included in Schedules I through V ofthe Controlled Substances Act (CSA), but not when used pursuant to a validprescription or when used as otherwise authorized by law. ``Initial or screening tests'' means an immunoassay screen for drugs ordrug metabolites to eliminate ``negative'' urine specimens from furtherconsideration or the first breathalyzer test for alcohol. Initial screeningmay be performed at the licensee's testing facility; a second screen andconfirmation testing for drugs or drug metabolites must be conducted bya HHS-certified laboratory. ``Medical Review Officer'' means a licensed physician responsible for receivinglaboratory results generated by an employer's drug testing program whohas knowledge of substance abuse disorders and has appropriate medicaltraining to interpret and evaluate an individual's positive test resulttogether with his or her medical history and any other relevant biomedicalinformation. ``Protected area'' has the same meaning as in andSection;73.2(g) of thischapter, an area encompassed by physical barriers and to which access iscontrolled. ``Random test'' means a system of unannounced drug testing administeredin a statistically random manner to a group so that all persons withinthat group have an equal probability of selection. ``Suitable inquiry'' means best-effort verification of employment historyfor the past five years, but in no case less than three years, obtainedthrough contacts with previous employers to determine if a person was,in the past, tested positive for illegal drugs, subject to a plan for treatingsubstance abuse, removed from, or made ineligible for activities withinthe scope of 10 CFR Part 26, or denied unescorted access at any other nuclearpower plant or other employment in accordance with a fitness-for-duty policy.``Vendor'' means any company or individual, not under contract to a licensee,providing services in protected areas. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interpretations. </ITAG>Except as specifically authorized by the Commission in writing, no interpretationof the meaning of the regulations in this Part by any officer or employeeof the Commission other than a written interpretation by the General Counselwill be recognized to be binding upon the Commission.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemptions. </ITAG>The Commission may, upon application of any interested person or upon itsown initiative, grant such exemptions from the requirements of the regulationsin this Part as it determines are authorized by law and will not endangerlife or property or the common defense and security and are otherwise inthe public interest. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information collection requirements: OMB approval. </ITAG>(a) The Nuclear Regulatory Commission has submitted the information collectionrequirements contained in this Part to the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) for approval as required by the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44U.S.C. 3501 et seq.). OMB has approved the information collection requirementscontained in this Part under control number 3150-0146.(b) The approved information collection requirements contained in thisPart appear in andSection;andSection; 26.20, 26.21, 26.22, 26.23, 26.24, 26.27,26.29, 26.70, 26.71, 26.73, 26.80 and Appendix A. (c) The total burden for these recordkeeping requirements is estimatedto be 313 hours per site per year. In implementing the recordkeeping requirementsthe affected licensee shall report to the Commission any comments concerningthe accuracy of the estimate and any suggestions for reducing the burden.<ITAG tagnum="84">General Performance Objectives </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General performance objectives. </ITAG>Fitness-for-duty programs must: (a) Provide reasonable assurance that nuclear power plant personnel willperform their tasks in a reliable and trustworthy manner and are not underthe influence of any substance, legal or illegal, or mentally or physicallyimpaired from any cause, which in any way adversely affects their abilityto safely and competently perform their duties; (b) Provide reasonable measures for the early detection of persons whoare not fit to perform activities within the scope of this Part; and (c) Have a goal of achieving a drug-free workplace and a workplace freeof the effects of such substances. <ITAG tagnum="84">Program Elements and Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Written policy and procedures. </ITAG>Each licensee subject to this Part shall establish and implement writtenpolicies and procedures designed to meet the general performance objectivesand specific requirements of this Part. Each licensee shall retain a copyof the current written policy and procedures as a record until the Commissionterminates each license for which the policy and procedures were developedand, if any portion of the policies and procedures are superseded, retainthe superseded material for three years after each change. As a minimum,written policies and procedures must address fitness for duty through thefollowing: (a) An overall description of licensee policy on fitness for duty. Thepolicy must address use of illegal drugs and abuse of legal drugs (e.g.,alcohol, prescription and over-the-counter drugs). Written policy documentsmust be in sufficient detail to provide affected individuals with informationon what is expected of them, and what consequences may result from lackof adherence to the policy. As a minimum, the written policy must prohibitthe consumption of alcohol_ (1) Within an abstinence period of at least 5 hours preceding any scheduledworking tour, and(2) During the period of any working tour.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"> Licensee policy should also address other factors that could affectfitness for duty such as mental stress, fatigue and illness. (b) A description of programs which are available to personnel desiringassistance in dealing with drug, alcohol, or other problems that couldadversely affect the performance of activities within the scope of thisPart. (c) Procedures to be utilized in testing for drugs and alcohol, includingprocedures for protecting the employee and the integrity of the specimen,and the quality controls used to ensure the test results are valid andattributable to the correct individual. (d) A description of immediate and follow-on actions which will be taken,and the procedures to be utilized, in those cases where employees, vendors,or contractors assigned to duties within the scope of this Part are determinedto have been involved in the use, sale, or possession of illegal drugs;or to have consumed alcohol during the mandatory pre-work abstinence period,while on duty, or to excess prior to reporting to duty as demonstratedwith a test that can be used to determine blood alcohol concentration.(e) A procedure that will ensure that persons called in to perform an unscheduledworking tour are fit to perform the task assigned. As a minimum, this proceduremust_(1) Require a statement to be made by a called-in person as to whetherhe or she has consumed alcohol within the length of time stated in thepre-duty abstinence policy; (2) If alcohol has been consumed within this period, require a determinationof fitness for duty by breath analysis or other means; and(3) Require the establishment of controls and conditions under which aperson who has been called-in can perform work, if necessary, althoughalcohol has been consumed. Consumption of alcohol during the abstinenceperiod shall not by itself preclude a licensee from using individuals neededto respond to an emergency. (f) The Commission may at any time review the licensee's written policyand procedures to assure that they meet the performance objectives of thisPart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Policy communications and awareness training. </ITAG>(a) Persons assigned to activities within the scope of this Part shallbe provided with appropriate training to ensure they understand_(1) Licensee policy and procedures, including the methods that will beused to implement the policy; (2) The personal and public health and safety hazards associated with abuseof drugs and misuse of alcohol; (3) The effect of prescription and over-the-counter drugs and dietary conditionson job performance and on chemical test results, and the role of the MedicalReview Officer; (4) Employee assistance programs provided by the licensee; and (5) What is expected of them and what consequences may result from lackof adherence to the policy, (b) Initial training must be completed prior to assignment to activitieswithin the scope of this Part. Refresher training must be completed ona nominal 12 month frequency or more frequently where the need is indicated.A record of the training must be retained for a period of at least threeyears.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Training of supervisors and escorts.</ITAG>(a) Managers and supervisors of activities within the scope of this Partmust be provided appropriate training to ensure they understand_(1) Their role and responsibilities in implementing the program; (2) The roles and responsibilities of others, such as the personnel, medical,and employee assistance program staffs; (3) Techniques for recognizing drugs and indications of the use, sale,or possession of drugs; (4) Behavioral observation techniques for detecting degradation in performance,impairment, or changes in employee behavior; and (5) Procedures for initiating appropriate corrective action, to includereferral to the employee assistance program. (b) Persons assigned to escort duties shall be provided appropriate trainingin techniques for recognizing drugs and indications of the use, sale, orpossession of drugs, techniques for recognizing aberrant behavior, andthe procedures for reporting problems to supervisory or security personnel.(c) Initial training must be completed prior to assignment of duties withinthe scope of this Part and within 3 months after initial supervisory assignment,as applicable. Refresher training must be completed on a nominal 12 monthfrequency, or more frequently where the need is indicated. A record ofthe training must be retained for a period of at least three years. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Contractors and vendors. </ITAG>(a) All contractor and vendor personnel performing activities within thescope of this Part for a licensee must be subject to either the licensee'sprogram relating to fitness for duty, or to a program, formally reviewedand approved by the licensee, which meets the requirements of this Part.Written agreements between licensees and contractors or vendors for activitieswithin the scope of this Part must be retained for the life of the contractand will clearly show that_(1) The contractor or vendor is responsible to the licensee for adheringto the licensee's fitness-for-duty policy, or maintaining and adheringto an effective fitness-for-duty program; which meets the standards ofthis Part; and (2) Personnel having been denied access or removed from activities withinthe scope of this Part at any nuclear power plant for violations of a fitness-for-dutypolicy will not be assigned to work within the scope of this Part withoutthe knowledge and consent of the licensee. (b) Each licensee subject to this Part shall assure that contractors whoseown fitness-for-duty programs are relied on by the licensee adhere to aneffective program, which meets the requirements of this Part, and shallconduct audits pursuant to andSection; 26.80 for this purpose. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Chemical testing. </ITAG>(a) To provide a means to deter and detect substance abuse, the licenseeshall implement the following chemical testing programs for persons subjectto this Part: (1) Testing within 60 days prior to the initial granting of unescortedaccess to protected areas or assignment to activities within the scopeof this Part. (2) Unannounced tests imposed in a random manner. The tests must be administeredso that a person completing a test is immediately eligible for anotherunannounced test. As a minimum, tests must be administered on a nominalweekly frequency and at various times during the day. Random testing shallbe conducted at a rate equal to at least 100 percent of the workforce.(3) Testing for-cause, i.e., as soon as possible following any observedbehavior indicating possible substance abuse; after accidents involvinga failure in individual performance resulting in personal injury, in aradiation exposure or release of radioactivity in excess of regulatorylimits, or actual or potential substantial degradations of the level ofsafety of the plant if there is reasonable suspicion that the worker'sbehavior contributed to the event; or after receiving credible informationthat an individual is abusing drugs or alcohol. (4) Follow-up testing on an unannounced basis to verify continued abstentionfrom the use of substances covered under this Part. (b) Testing for drugs and alcohol must at a minimum, conform to the ``Guidelinesfor Nuclear Power Plant Drug and Alcohol Testing Programs,'' issued bythe Nuclear Regulatory Commission and appearing in Appendix A to this rule,hereinafter referred to as the NRC Guidelines. Licensees, at their discretion,may implement programs with more stringent standards (e.g., lower cutofflevels, broader panel of drugs). All requirements in this Part apply topersons who fail a more stringent standard, but do not test positive underthe NRC Guidelines; management actions must be the same as if the individualfailed the NRC standards. (c) Licensees shall test for all substances described in paragraph 2.1(a)of the NRC Guidelines. In addition, licensees may consult with local lawenforcement authorities, hospitals, and drug counseling services to determinewhether other substances with abuse potential are being used in the geographicallocale of the facility and the local workforce. When appropriate, othersubstances so identified may be added to the panel of substances for testing.Appropriate cutoff limits must be established by the licensee for thesesubstances. (d) Licensees may conduct initial screening tests of an aliquot prior toforwarding selected specimens to a laboratory certified by the Departmentof Health and Human Services, provided the licensee's staff possesses thenecessary training and skills for the tasks assigned, their qualificationsare documented, and adequate quality controls are implemented. Qualitycontrol procedures for initial screening tests by a licensee's testingfacility must include the processing of blind performance test specimensand the submission to the HHS-certified laboratory of a sampling of specimensinitially tested as negative. Access to the results of preliminary testsmust be limited to the licensee's testing staff, the Medical Review Officer,the Fitness-For-Duty Program Manager, and employee assistance program staffwhen appropriate. (e) The Medical Review Officer's review of the test results must be completedand licensee management notified within 10 days of the initial presumptivepositive screening test. (f) All testing of specimens for urine drug testing, except onsite testingunder paragraph (d) above, must be performed in a laboratory certifiedby the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for that purpose consistentwith its standards and procedures for certification. Except for suspectspecimens submitted for special processing (Section 2.7(d) of AppendixA), all specimens sent to certified laboratories shall be subject to initialscreening by the laboratory and all specimens screened as presumptivelypositive shall be subject to confirmation testing by the laboratory. Licenseesshall submit blind performance test specimens to certified laboratoriesin accordance with the NRC Guidelines (Appendix A). (g) Tests for alcohol must be administered by breath analysis using breathalcohol analyses devices meeting evidential standards described in Section2.7(O)(3) of Appendix A. A breath alcohol content indicating a blood alcoholconcentration of 0.04 percent or greater must be a positive test result.The confirmatory test for alcohol shall be done with another breath measurementinstrument. Should the person demand further confirmation, the test mustbe a gas chromatography analysis of blood. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employee assistance programs (EAP). </ITAG>Each licensee subject to this Part shall maintain an employee assistanceprogram to strengthen fitness-for-duty programs by offering assessment,short-term counseling, referral services, and treatment monitoring to employeeswith problems that could adversely affect the performance of activitieswithin the scope of this Part. Employee assistance programs should be designedto achieve early intervention and provide for confidential assistance.The employee assistance program staff shall inform licensee managementwhen a determination has been made that any individual's condition constitutesa hazard to himself or herself or others (including those who have self-referred).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Management actions and sanctions to be imposed. </ITAG>(a) Prior to the initial granting of unescorted access to a protected areaor the assignment to activities within the scope of this Part to any person,the licensee shall obtain a written statement from the individual as towhether activities within the scope of this Part were ever denied the individual.The licensee shall complete a suitable inquiry on a best-efforts basisto determine if that person was, in the past, tested positive for drugsor use of alcohol that resulted in on-duty impairment, subject to a planfor treating substance abuse (except for self-referral for treatment),or removed from activities within the scope of this Part, or denied unescortedaccess at any other nuclear power plant in accordance with a fitness-for-dutypolicy. If such a record is established, the new assignment to activitieswithin the scope of this Part or granting of unescorted access must bebased upon a management and medical determination of fitness for duty andthe establishment of an appropriate follow-up testing program, providedthe restrictions of paragraph (b) of this section are observed. To meetthis requirement, the identity of persons denied unescorted access or removedunder the provisions of this Part and the circumstances for such denialor removal, including test results, will be made available in responseto a licensee's, contractor's, or vendor's inquiry supported by a signedrelease from the individual. Failure to list reasons for removal or revocationof unescorted access shall be sufficient cause for denial of unescortedaccess. Temporary access provisions shall not be affected by this Partprovided that the prospective worker passes a chemical test conducted accordingto the requirements of 26.24(a)(1). (b) Each licensee subject to this Part shall, as a minimum, take the followingactions. Nothing herein shall prohibit the licensee from taking more stringentaction. (1) Impaired workers, or those whose fitness may be questionable, shallbe removed from activities within the scope of this Part, and may be returnedonly after determined to be fit to safely and competently perform activitieswithin the scope of this Part. (2) Lacking any other evidence to indicate the use, sale, or possessionof illegal drugs onsite, a confirmed positive test result must be presumedto be an indication of offsite drug use. The first confirmed positive testmust, as a minimum, result in immediate removal from activities withinthe scope of this Part for at least 14 days and referral to the EAP forassessment and counseling during any suspension period. Plans for treatment,follow-up, and future employment must be developed, and any rehabilitationprogram deemed appropriate must be initiated during such suspension period.Satisfactory management and medical assurance of the individual's fitnessto adequately perform activities within the scope of this Part must beobtained before permitting the individual to be returned to these activities.Any subsequent confirmed positive test must result in removal from unescortedaccess to protected areas and activities within the scope of this Partfor a minimum of three years from the date of removal. (3) Any individual determined to have been involved in the sale, use, orpossession of illegal drugs while within a protected area of any nuclearpower plant must be removed from activities within the scope of this Part.The individual may not be granted unescorted access to protected areasor assigned to activities within the scope of this Part for a minimum offive years from the date of removal. (4) Persons removed for periods of three years or more under the provisionsof paragraphs (b) (2) and (3) of this section for the illegal sale, useor possession of drugs and who would have been removed under the currentstandards of a hiring licensee, may be granted unescorted access and assignedduties within the scope of this Part by a licensee subject to this Partonly when the hiring licensee receives satisfactory medical assurance thatthe person has abstained from drugs for at least three years. Satisfactorymanagement and medical assurance of the individual's fitness to adequatelyperform activities within the scope of this Part must be obtained beforepermitting the individual to perform activities within the scope of thisPart. Any person granted unescorted access or whose access is reinstatedunder these provisions must be given unannounced follow-up tests at leastonce every month for four months and at least once every three months forthe next two years and eight months after unescorted access is reinstatedto verify continued abstinence from proscribed substances. Any confirmeduse of drugs through this process or any other determination of subsequentinvolvement in the sale, use or possession of illegal substances must resultin permanent denial of unescorted access. (5) Paragraphs (b) (2), (3), and (4) of this section do not apply to alcohol,valid prescriptions, or over-the-counter drugs. Licensee sanctions forconfirmed misuse of alcohol, valid prescription, and over-the-counter drugsshall be sufficient to deter abuse of legally obtainable substances asa substitute for abuse of proscribed drugs. (c) Refusal to provide a specimen for testing and resignation prior toremoval for violation of company fitness-for-duty policy concerning drugsmust be recorded as removals for cause. These records must be retainedfor the purpose of meeting the requirements of andSection; 26.27(a).(d) If a licensee has a reasonable belief that an NRC employee may be underthe influence of any substance, or otherwise unfit for duty, the licenseemay not deny access but shall escort the individual. In any instance ofthis occurrence, the appropriate Regional Administrator must be notifiedimmediately by telephone. During other than normal working hours, the NRCOperations Center must be notified.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals. </ITAG>Each licensee subject to this Part, and each contractor or vendor implementinga fitness-for-duty program under the provisions of andSection; 26.23, shallestablish a procedure for licensee and contractor or vendor employees toappeal a positive alcohol or drug determination. The procedure must providenotice and an opportunity to respond and may be an impartial internal managementreview. A licensee review procedure need not be provided to employees ofcontractors or vendors when the contractor or vendor is administering hisown alcohol and drug testing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protection of information. </ITAG>(a) Each licensee subject to this Part, who collects personal informationon an individual for the purpose of complying with this Part, shall establishand maintain a system of files and procedures for the protection of thepersonal information. This system must be maintained until the Commissionterminates each license for which the system was developed. (b) Licensees, contractors, and vendors shall not disclose the personalinformation collected and maintained to persons other than assigned MedicalReview Officers, other licensees or their authorized representatives legitimatelyseeking the information as required by this Part for unescorted accessdecisions and who have obtained a release from current or prospective employeesor contractor personnel, NRC representatives, appropriate law enforcementofficials under court order, the subject individual or his or her representative,or to those licensee representatives who have a need to have access tothe information in performing assigned duties, including audits of licensee's,contractor's, and vendor's programs, to persons deciding matters on reviewor appeal, and to other persons pursuant to court order. This section doesnot authorize the licensee, contractor, or vendor to withhold evidenceof criminal conduct from law enforcement officials. <ITAG tagnum="84">Inspections, Records, and Reports </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspections. </ITAG>(a) Each licensee subject to this Part shall permit duly authorized representativesof the Commission to inspect, copy, or take away copies of its recordsand inspect its premises, activities, and personnel as may be necessaryto accomplish the purposes of this Part. (b) Written agreements between licensees and their contractors and vendorsmust clearly show that the_ (1) Licensee is responsible to the Commission for maintaining an effectivefitness-for-duty program in accordance with this Part; and (2) Duly authorized representatives of the Commission may inspect, copy,or take away copies of any licensee, contractor, or vendor's documents,records, and reports related to implementation of the licensee's, contractor's,or vendor's fitness-for-duty program under the scope of the contractedactivities. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.71</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recordkeeping requirements. </ITAG>Each licensee subject to this Part and each contractor and vendor implementinga licensee approved program under the provisions of andSection; 26.23 shall_(a) Retain records of inquiries conducted in accordance with andSection;26.27(a), that result in the granting of unescorted access to protectedareas, until five years following termination of such access authorizations;(b) Retain records of confirmed positive test results which are concurredin by the Medical Review Officer, and the related personnel actions fora period of at least five years; (c) Retain records of persons made ineligible for three years or longerfor assignment to activities within the scope of this Part under the provisionsof andSection; 26.27(b) (2), (3), (4) or (c), until the Commission terminateseach license under which the records were created; and (d) Collect and compile fitness-for-duty program performance data on astandard form and submit this data to the Commission within 60 days ofthe end of each 6 month reporting period (January-June and July-December).The data for each site (corporate and other support staff locations maybe separately consolidated) shall include: random testing rate; drugs testedfor and cut-off levels, including results of tests using lower cut-offlevels and tests for other drugs; workforce populations tested; numbersof tests and results by   population and type of test (i.e., pre-badging,random, for-cause, etc.); substances identified; summary of managementactions; and a list of events reported. The data must be analyzed and appropriateactions taken to correct program weaknesses. The data and analysis mustbe retained for three years. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting requirements. </ITAG>(a) Each licensee subject to this Part shall inform the Commission of significantfitness-for-duty events including: (1) Sale, use, or possession of illegal drugs within the protected areaand, (2) Any acts by any person licensed under 10 CFR Part 55 to operate a powerreactor or by any supervisory personnel assigned to perform duties withinthe scope of this Part_ (i) Involving the sale, use, or possession of a controlled substance, (ii) Resulting in confirmed positive tests on such persons, (iii) Involving use of alcohol within the protected area, or (iv) Resulting in a determination of unfitness for scheduled work due tothe consumption of alcohol. (b) Notifications must be made to the NRC Operations Center by telephonewithin 24 hours of the discovery of the event by the licensee. (c) Fitness-for-duty events shall be reported under this section ratherthan reported under the provisions of andSection; 73.71. (d) By (insert date 180 days after the effective date of the final rule)each licensee shall certify to the NRC that it has implemented a fitness-for-dutyprogram that meets the requirements of 10 CFR Part 26. The certificationshall describe any licensee cut-off levels more stringent than those imposedby this Part.<ITAG tagnum="84">Audits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Audits. </ITAG>(a) Each licensee subject to this Part shall audit the fitness-for-dutyprogram nominally every 12 months. In addition, audits must be conducted,nominally every 12 months, of those portions of fitness-for-duty programsimplemented by contractors and vendors. Licensees may accept audits ofcontractors and vendors conducted by other licensees and need not re-auditthe same contractor or vendor for the same period of time. Each sharingutility shall maintain  a copy of the audit report, to include findings,recommendations and corrective actions. Licensees retain responsibilityfor the effectiveness of contractor and vendor programs and the implementationof appropriate corrective action. (b) Audits must focus on the effectiveness of the program and be conductedby individuals qualified in the subject(s) being audited, and independentof both fitness-for-duty program management and personnel directly responsiblefor implementation of the fitness-for-duty program. (c) The result of the audit, along with recommendations, if any, must bedocumented and reported to senior corporate and site management. The resolutionof the audit findings and corrective actions must be documented. Thesedocuments must be retained for three years. NRC Guidelines require licenseeaudits of HHS-certified laboratories as described in Appendix A. <ITAG tagnum="84">Enforcement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 26.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Violations. </ITAG>(a) An injunction or other court order may be obtained to prohibit a violationof any provision of_ (1) The Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended; (2) Title II of the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974; or (3) Any regulation or order issued under these Acts. (b) A court order may be obtained for the payment of a civil penalty imposedunder section 234 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, for violations of_(1) Section 53, 57, 62, 63, 81, 82, 101, 103, 104, 107, or 109 of the Act;(2) Section 206 of the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974; (3) Any rule, regulation, or order issued under these Sections; (4) Any term, condition, or limitation of any license issued under theseSections; or (5) Any provisions for which a license may be revoked under section 186of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954. (c) Any person who willfully violates any provision of the Atomic EnergyAct of 1954, as amended, or any regulation or order issued under the requirementsof the Act, include regulations under this Part, may be guilty of a crimeand, upon conviction, may be punished by fine or imprisonment or both,as provided by law. <ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix A_Guidelines for Nuclear Power Plant Drug and Alcohol TestingPrograms </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1.1 Applicability </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1.2 Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart B_Scientific and Technical Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.1 The Substances </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.2 General Administration of Testing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.3 Preventing Subversion of Testing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.4 Specimen Collection Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.5 HHS-Certified Laboratory Personnel </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.6 Licensee Testing Facility Personnel </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.7 Laboratory and Testing Facility Analysis Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.8 Quality Assurance and Quality Control </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2.9 Reporting and Review of Results </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart C_Employee Protection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.1 Protection of Employee Records </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3.2 Individual Access to Test and Laboratory Certification Results</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart D_Certification of Laboratories Engaged in Chemical Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">4.1 Use of DHHS-Certified Laboratories </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">1.1 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) These guidelines apply to licensees authorized to operate nuclearpower reactors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Licensees may set more stringent cut-off levels than specifiedherein or test for substances other than specified herein and shall informthe Commission of such deviation within 60 days of implementing such change.Licensees may not deviate from the provisions of these guidelines withoutthe written approval of the Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Only laboratories which are HHS-certified are authorized to performurine drug testing for NRC licensees, vendors, and licensee contractors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">1.2 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the purposes of this part, the following definitions apply: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Aliquot.'' A portion of a specimen used for testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``BAC.'' Blood alcohol concentration (BAC), which can be measureddirectly from blood or derived from a measure of the concentration of alcoholin a breath specimen, is a measure of the mass of alcohol in a volume ofblood such that an individual with 100 mg of alcohol per 100 ml of bloodhas a BAC of 0.10 percent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Commission.'' The U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its dulyauthorized representatives. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Chain-of-custody.'' Procedures to account for the integrity of eachspecimen by tracking its handling and storage from the point of specimencollection to final disposition of the specimen. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Collection site.'' A place designated by the licensee where individualspresent themselves for the purpose of providing a specimen of their urine,breath, and/or blood to be analyzed for the presence of drugs or alcohol.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Collection site person.'' A person who instructs and assists individualsat a collection site and who receives and makes an initial examinationof the specimen(s) provided by those individuals. A collection site personshall have successfully completed training to carry out this function orshall be a licensed medical professional or technician who is providedinstructions for collection under this part and certifies completion asrequired herein. In any case where: (a) a collection is observed or (b)collection is monitored by nonmedical personnel, the collection site personmust be a person of the same gender as the donor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Confirmatory test.'' A second analytical procedure to identify thepresence of a specific drug or drug metabolite which is independent ofthe initial screening test and which uses a different technique and chemicalprinciple from that of the initial test in order to ensure reliabilityand accuracy. (At this time gas chromatography/mass spectrometry [GC/MS]is the only authorized confirmation method for cocaine, marijuana, opiates,amphetamines, phencyclidine). For determining blood alcohol levels, a ``confirmatorytest'' means a second test using another breath alcohol analysis device.Further confirmation upon demand will be by gas chromatography analysisof blood. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Confirmed positive test.'' The result of a confirmatory test thathas established the presence of drugs, drug metabolites, or alcohol ina specimen at or above the cut-off level, and that has been deemed positiveby the Medical Review Officer (MRO) after evaluation. A ``confirmed positivetest'' for alcohol can also be obtained as a result of a confirmation ofblood alcohol levels with a second breath analysis without MRO evaluation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``HHS-certified laboratory.'' A urine and blood testing laboratorythat maintains certification to perform drug testing under the Departmentof Health and Human Services (HHS) ``Mandatory Guidelines for Federal WorkplaceDrug Testing Programs'' (53 FR 11970). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Illegal drugs.'' Those drugs included in Schedules I through V ofthe Controlled Substances Act (CSA), but not when used pursuant to a validprescription or when used as otherwise authorized by law. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Initial or screening test.'' An immunoassay screen for drugs ordrug metabolites to eliminate ``negative'' urine specimens from furtherconsideration or the first breathalyzer test for alcohol. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Licensee's testing facility.'' A drug testing facility operatedby the licensee or one of its vendors or contractors to perform the initialtesting of urine samples and to perform initial breath tests for alcohol.Such a testing facility is optional and not required to maintain HHS certificationunder this part.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Medical Review Officer.'' A licensed physician responsible for receivinglaboratory results generated by an employer's drug testing program whohas knowledge of substance abuse disorders and has appropriate medicaltraining to interpret and evaluate an individual's positive test resulttogether with his or her medical history and any other relevant biomedicalinformation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Permanent record book.'' A permanently bound book in which identifyingdata on each specimen collected at a collection site are permanently recordedin the sequence of collection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Reason to believe.'' Reason to believe that a particular individualmay alter or substitute the urine specimen. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Split sample.'' A portion of a urine specimen that may be storedby the licensee to be tested in the event of appeal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart B_Scientific and Technical Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.1 The Substances. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Licensees shall, as a minimum, test for marijuana, cocaine, opiates,amphetamines, phencyclidine, and alcohol for pre-access, for-cause, random,and follow-up tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Licensees may test for any illegal drugs during a for-cause test,or analysis of any specimen suspected of being adulterated or diluted throughhydration or other means. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Licensees shall establish rigorous testing procedures that areconsistent with the intent of these guidelines for any other drugs notspecified in these guidelines for which testing is authorized under 10CFR 26, so that the appropriateness of the use of these substances canbe evaluated by the Medical Review Officer to ensure that individuals grantedunescorted access are fit for maintaining access to and for performingduties in protected areas. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Specimens collected under NRC regulations requiring compliancewith this part may only be designated or approved for testing as describedin this part and shall not be used to conduct any other analysis or testwithout the permission of the tested individual. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) This section does not prohibit procedures reasonably incidentto analysis of a specimen for controlled substances (e.g., determinationof pH on tests for specific gravity, creatinine concentration, or presenceof adulterants).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.2 General Administration of Testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The licensee testing facilities and HHS-certified laboratories describedin this part shall develop and maintain clear and well-documented proceduresfor collection, shipment, and accession of urine and blood specimens underthis part. Such procedures shall include, as a minimum, the following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Use of a chain-of-custody form. The original shall accompany thespecimen to the HHS-certified laboratory. A copy shall accompany any splitsample. The form shall be a permanent record on which is retained identitydata (or codes) on the employee and information on the specimen collectionprocess and transfers of custody of the specimen. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Use of a tamperevident sealing system designed in a manner suchthat the specimen container top can be sealed against undetected opening,the container can be identified with a unique identifying number identicalto that appearing on the chain-of-custody form, and space has been providedto initial the container affirming its identity. For purposes of clarity,this requirement assumes use of a system made up of one or more pre-printedlabels and seals (or a unitary label/seal), but use of other, equally effectivetechnologies is authorized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Use of a shipping container in which one or more specimens andassociated paperwork may be transferred and which can be sealed and initialledto prevent undetected tampering. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Written procedures, instructions, and training shall be providedas follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Licensee collection site procedures and training of collectionsite personnel shall clearly emphasize that the collection site personis responsible for maintaining the integrity of the specimen collectionand transfer process, carefully ensuring the modesty and privacy of theindividual tested, and is to avoid any conduct or remarks that might beconstrued as accusatorial or otherwise offensive or inappropriate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) A non-medical collection site person shall receive training incompliance with this appendix and shall demonstrate proficiency in theapplication of this appendix prior to serving as a collection site person.A medical professional, technologist, or technician licensed or otherwiseapproved to practice in the jurisdiction in which collection occurs mayserve as a collection site person if that person is provided the instructionsdescribed in 2.2(3) and performs collections in accordance with those instructions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Collection site persons shall be provided with detailed, clearly-illustrated,written instructions on the collection of specimens in compliance withthis part. Individuals subject to testing shall also be provided standardwritten instructions setting forth their responsibilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The option to provide a blood specimen for confirmatory analysisfollowing a positive breath test shall be specified in the written instructionsprovided to individuals tested. The instructions shall also state thatfailure to request a confirmatory blood test indicates that the individualaccepts the breath test results. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.3 Preventing Subversion of Testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Licensees shall carefully select and monitor persons responsible foradministering the testing program (e.g., collection site persons, laboratorytechnicians, specimen couriers, and those selecting and notifying personnelto be tested), based upon the highest standards for honesty and integrity,and shall implement measures to ensure that these standards are maintained.As a minimum, these measures shall ensure that the integrity of such personsis not compromised or subject to efforts to compromise due to personalrelationships with any individuals subject to testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As a minimum: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Supervisors, co-workers, and relatives of the individual beingtested shall not perform any collection, assessment, or evaluation procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Appropriate background checks and psychological evaluations shallbe completed prior to assignment of any tasks associated with the administrationof the program, and shall be conducted at least once every three years.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Persons responsible for administering the testing program shallbe subjected to a behavioral observation program designed to assure thatthey continue to meet the highest standards for honesty and integrity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.4 Specimen Collection Procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) ``Designation of Collection Site.'' Each drug testing programshall have one or more designated collection sites which have all necessarypersonnel, materials, equipment, facilities, and supervision to providefor the collection, security, temporary storage, and shipping or transportationof urine  or blood specimens to a drug testing laboratory. A properly equippedmobile facility that meets the requirements of this part is an acceptablecollection site. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) ``Collection Site Person.'' A collection site person shall havesuccessfully completed training to carry out this function. In any casewhere the collection of urine is observed, the collection site person mustbe a person of the same gender as the donor. Persons drawing blood shallbe qualified to perform that task.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) ``Security.'' The purpose of this paragraph is to prevent unauthorizedaccess which could compromise the integrity of the collection process orthe specimen. Security procedures shall provide for the designated collectionsite to be secure. If a collection site facility cannot be dedicated solelyto drug and alcohol testing, the portion of the facility used for testingshall be secured during that testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) A facility normally used for other purposes, such as a publicrest room or hospital examining room, may be secured by visual inspectionto ensure other persons are not present, and that undetected access (e.g.,through a rear door not in the view of the collection site person) is impossible.Security during collection may be maintained by effective restriction ofaccess to collection materials and specimens. In the case of a public restroom, the facility must be posted against access during the entire collectionprocedure to avoid embarrassment to the individual or distraction of thecollection site person. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) If it is impractical to maintain continuous physical securityof a collection site from the time the specimen is presented until thesealed container is transferred for shipment, the following minimum proceduresshall apply: The specimen shall remain under the direct control of thecollection site person from delivery to its being sealed in a mailer orsecured for shipment. The mailer shall be immediately mailed, maintainedin secure storage, or remain until mailed under the personal control ofthe collection site person. These minimum procedures shall apply to themailing of specimens to licensee testing facilities from collection sites(except where co-located) as well as to the mailing of specimens to HHS-certifiedlaboratories. As an option, licensees may ship several specimens via courierin a locked or sealed shipping container. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) ``Chain-of-Custody.'' Licensee chain-of-custody forms shall beproperly executed by authorized collection site personnel upon receiptof specimens. Handling and transportation of urine and blood specimensfrom one authorized individual or place to another shall always be accomplishedthrough chain-of-custody procedures. Every effort shall be made to minimizethe number of persons handling the specimens. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) ``Access to Authorized Personnel Only.'' No unauthorized personnelshall be permitted in any part of the designated collection site wherespecimens are collected or stored. Only the collection site person mayhandle specimens prior to their securement in the mailing or shipping containeror monitor or observe specimen collection (under the conditions specifiedin this part). In order to promote security of specimens, avoid distractionof the collection site person, and ensure against any confusion in theidentification of specimens, a collection site person shall conduct onlyone collection procedure at any given time. For this purpose, a collectionprocedure is complete when the specimen container has been sealed and initialed,the chain-of-custody form has been executed, and the individual has departedthe collection site. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) ``Privacy.'' Procedures for collecting urine specimens shall allowindividual privacy unless there is reason to believe that a particularindividual may alter or substitute the specimen to be provided. For purposesof this appendix the following circumstances are the exclusive groundsconstituting a reason to believe that the individual may alter or substitutea urine specimen: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The individual has presented a urine specimen that falls outsidethe normal temperature range, and the individual declines to provide ameasurement of oral body temperature by sterile thermometer, as providedin paragraph (g)(14) of this appendix, or the oral temperature does notequal or exceed that of the specimen. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The last urine specimen provided by the individual (i.e., on aprevious occasion) was determined by the laboratory to have a specificgravity of less than 1.003 or a creatinine concentration below .2 g/L.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The collection site person observes conduct clearly and unequivocallyindicating an attempt to substitute or adulterate the sample (e.g., substituteurine in plain view, blue dye in specimen presented, etc.). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The individual has previously been determined to have used a substanceinappropriately or without medical authorization and the particular testis being conducted as a part of a rehabilitation program or on return toservice after evaluation and/or treatment for a confirmed positive testresult. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) ``Integrity and Identity of Specimens.'' Licensees shall takeprecautions to ensure that a urine specimen is not adulterated or dilutedduring the collection procedure, that a blood sample or breath exhalenttube cannot be substituted or tampered with, and that the information onthe specimen container and in the record book can identify the individualfrom whom the specimen was collected. The following minimum precautionsshall be taken to ensure that authentic specimens are obtained and correctlyidentified: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) To deter the dilution of urine specimens at the collection site,toilet bluing agents shall be placed in toilet tanks wherever possible,so the reservoir of water in the toilet bowl always remains blue. Thereshall be no other source of water (e.g., no shower or sink) in the enclosurewhere urination occurs. If there is another source of water in the enclosure,it shall be effectively secured or monitored to ensure it is not used (undetected)as a source for diluting the specimen. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) When an individual arrives at the collection site for a urineor breath test, the collection site person shall ensure that the individualis positively identified as the person selected for testing (e.g., throughpresentation of photo identification or identification by the employer'srepresentative). If the individual's identity cannot be established, thecollection site person shall not proceed with the collection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) If the individual fails to arrive for a urine or breath test atthe assigned time, the collection site person shall contact the appropriateauthority to obtain guidance on the action to be taken. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) After the individual has been positively identified, the collectionsite person shall ask the individual to sign a consent-to-testing formand to list all of the prescription medications and over-the-counter preparationsthat he or she can remember using within the past 30 days. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) The collection site person shall ask the individual to removeany unnecessary outer garments such as a coat or jacket that might concealitems or substances that could be used to tamper with or adulterate theindividual's urine, breath, or blood specimen. The collection site personshall ensure that all personal belongings such as a purse or briefcaseremain with the outer garments outside of the room in which the blood,breath, or urine sample is collected. The individual may retain his orher wallet. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) The individual shall be instructed to wash and dry his or herhands prior to urination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) After washing hands prior to urination, the individual shall remainin the presence of the collection site person and shall not have accessto any water fountain, faucet, soap dispenser, cleaning agent or any othermaterials which could be used to adulterate the urine specimen. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) The individual may provide his/her urine specimen in the privacyof a stall or otherwise partitioned areas that allows for individual privacy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) The collection site person shall note any unusual behavior orappearance in the permanent record book and on the chain-of-custody form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) In the exceptional event that a designated collection site isinaccessible and there is an immediate requirement for urine specimen collection(e.g., an accident investigation), a public or on-site rest room may beused according to the following procedures. A collection site person ofthe same gender as the individual shall accompany the individual into therest room which shall be made secure during the collection procedure. Ifpossible, a toilet bluing agent shall be placed in the bowl and any accessibletoilet tank. The collection site person shall remain in the rest room,but outside the stall, until the specimen is collected. If no bluing agentis available to deter specimen dilution, the collection site person shallinstruct the individual not to flush the toilet until the specimen is deliveredto the collection site person. After the collection site person has possessionof the specimen, the individual will be instructed to flush the toiletand to participate with the collection site person in completing the chain-of-custodyprocedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Upon receiving a urine specimen from the individual, the collectionsite person shall determine that it contains at least 60 milliliters ofurine. If there is less than 60 milliliters of urine in the container,additional urine shall be collected in a separate container to reach atotal of 60 milliliters. (The temperature of the partial specimen in eachseparate container shall be measured in accordance with paragraph (f)(13)of this section, and the partial specimens shall be combined in one container.)The individual may be given a reasonable amount of liquid to drink forthis purpose (e.g., a glass of water). If the individual fails for anyreason to provide 60 milliliters of urine, the collection site person shallcontact the appropriate authority to obtain guidance on the action to betaken. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) After the urine specimen has been provided and submitted to thecollection site person, the individual shall be allowed to wash his orher hands. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) Immediately after the urine specimen is collected, the collectionsite person shall measure the temperature of the specimen. The temperaturemeasuring device used must accurately reflect the temperature of the specimenand not contaminate the specimen. The time from urination to temperaturemeasurement is critical and in no case shall exceed 4 minutes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) If the temperature of a urine specimen is outside the range of32.5anddegrees;- 37.7 anddegrees;C/90.5anddegrees;-99.8 anddegrees;F, that is areason to believe that the individual may have altered or substituted thespecimen, and another specimen shall be collected under direct observationof a same gender collection site person and both specimens shall be forwardedto the laboratory for testing. An individual may volunteer to have hisor her oral temperature taken to provide evidence to counter the reasonto believe the individual may have altered or substituted the specimencaused by the specimen's temperature falling outside the prescribed range.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) Immediately after a urine specimen is collected, the collectionsite person shall also inspect the specimen to determine its color andlook for any signs of contaminants. Any unusual findings shall be notedin the permanent record book. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) All urine specimens suspected of being adulterated or found tobe diluted shall be forwarded to the laboratory for testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(17) Whenever there is reason to believe that a particular individualmay alter or substitute the urine specimen to be provided, a second specimenshall be obtained as soon as possible under the direct observation of asame gender collection site person. Where appropriate, measures will betaken to prevent additional hydration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(18) Alcohol breath tests shall be delayed at least 15 minutes ifany source of mouth alcohol (e.g., breath fresheners) or any other substancesare ingested (e.g., eating, smoking, regurgitation of stomach contentsfrom vomiting or burping). The collection site person shall ensure thateach breath specimen taken comes from the end, rather than the beginning,of the breath expiration. For each screening test, two breath specimensshall be collected from each individual no less than two minutes apartand no more than 10 minutes apart. The test results shall be consideredaccurate if the result of each measurement is within plus or minus 10 percentof the average of the two measurements. If the two tests do not agree,the breath tests shall be repeated on another evidential-grade breath analysisdevice. Confirmatory testing is accomplished by repeating the above procedureon another evidential-grade breath analysis device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(19) If the alcohol breath tests indicates that the individual ispositive for a BAC at or above the 0.04 percent cut-off level, the individualmay request a confirmatory blood test, at his or her discretion. All vacuumtube and needle assemblies used for blood collection shall be factory-sterilized.The collection site person shall ensure that they remain properly sealeduntil used. Antiseptic swabbing of the skin shall be performed with a nonethanolantiseptic. Sterile procedures shall be followed when drawing blood andtransferring the blood to a storage container; in addition, the containermust be sterile and sealed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(20) Both the individual being tested and the collection site personshall keep urine and blood specimens in view at all times prior to theirbeing sealed and labeled. If a urine specimen is split (as described inSection 2.7(j)) and if any specimen is transferred to a second container,the collection site person shall request the individual to observe thesplitting of the urine sample or the transfer of the specimen and the placementof the tamperevident seal over the container caps and down the sides ofthe containers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(21) The collection site person and the individual shall be presentat the same time during procedures outlined in paragraphs (h) through (j)of this section. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(22) The collection site person shall place securely on each containeran identification label which contains the date, the individual's specimennumber, and any other identification information provided or required bythe drug testing program. If separate from the labels, the tamperevidentseals shall also be applied. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(23) The individual shall initial the identification labels on thespecimen containers for the purpose of certifying that it is the specimencollected from him or her. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) The individual shall be asked to read and sign a statement oneither the chain-of-custody form or in the permanent record book certifyingthat the specimens identified as having been collected from him or herare in fact the specimen he or she provided. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The individual shall be provided an opportunity to set forthon the urine chain-of-custody form information concerning medications takenor administered in the past 30 days. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(24) The collection site person shall enter in the permanent recordbook all information identifying the specimens. The collection site personshall sign the permanent record book next to the identifying information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(25) A higher level supervisor in the drug testing program shall reviewand concur in advance with any decision by a collection site person toobtain a urine specimen under the direct observation of a same gender collectionsite person based on a reason to believe that the individual may alteror substitute the specimen to be provided. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(26) The collection site person shall complete the chain-of-custodyforms for both the aliquot and the split sample, if collected, and shallcertify proper completion of the collection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(27) The specimens and chain-of-custody forms are now ready for transferto the laboratory or the licensee's testing facility. If the specimensare not immediately prepared for shipment, they shall be appropriatelysafeguarded during temporary storage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(28) While any part of the above chain-of-custody procedures is beingperformed, it is essential that the specimens and custody documents beunder the control of the involved collection site person. The collectionsite person shall not leave the collection site in the interval betweenpresentation of the specimen by the individual and securement of the sampleswith identifying labels bearing the individual's specimen identificationnumbers and seals initialled by the individual. If the involved collectionsite person leaves his or her work station momentarily, the specimens andchain-of-custody forms shall be taken with him or her or shall be secured.If the collection site person is leaving for an extended period of time,the specimens shall be packaged for transfer to the laboratory before heor she leaves the site. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) ``Collection Control.'' To the maximum extent possible, collectionsite personnel shall keep the individual's specimen containers within sightboth before and after the individual has urinated or provided a breathor blood sample. After the specimen is collected and whenever urine specimensare split, they shall be properly sealed and labeled. A chain-of-custodyform shall be used for maintaining control and accountability of each specimenfrom the point of collection to final disposition of the specimen. Thedate and purpose shall be documented on the chain-of-custody form eachtime a specimen is handled or transferred, and every individual in thechain of custody shall be identified. Every effort shall be made to minimizethe number of persons handling specimens. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) ``Transportation to Laboratory or Testing Facility.'' Collectionsite personnel shall arrange to transfer the collected specimens to thedrug testing laboratory or licensee testing facility. To transfer specimensoff-site for  initial screening and for a second screen and confirmatoryanalysis of presumptive positive specimens and for transferring suspectspecimens to a laboratory for analysis under special processing [Section2.7(d)], the specimens shall be placed in containers designed to minimizethe possibility of damage during shipment (e.g., specimen boxes, paddedmailers, or bulk shipping containers with that capability) and those containersshall be securely sealed to eliminate the possibility of undetected tampering.On the tape sealing the container, the collection site person shall signand enter the date specimens were sealed in the containers for shipment.The collection site personnel shall ensure that the chain-of-custody documentationis attached to each container sealed for shipment to the drug testing laboratory.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(j) ``Failure to Cooperate.'' If the individual refuses to cooperatewith the urine collection or breath analysis process (e.g., refusal toprovide a complete specimen, complete paperwork, initial specimen), thenthe collection site person shall inform the Medical Review Officer andshall document the non-cooperation in the permanent record book and onthe specimen custody and control form. The Medical Review Officer shallreport the failure to cooperate to the appropriate management. The provisionof blood specimens for use to confirm a positive breath test for alcoholshall be entirely voluntary, at the individual's discretion. In the absenceof a voluntary blood test the second positive breath test shall be considereda confirmed positive. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.5. HHS-certified Laboratory Personnel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) ``Day-to-Day Management of the HHS-certified Laboratories.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The HHS-certified laboratory shall have a qualified individualto assume professional, organizational, educational, and administrativeresponsibility for the laboratories' drug testing facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) This individual shall have documented scientific qualificationsin analytical forensic toxicology. Minimum qualifications are: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Certification as a laboratory director by the appropriate Statein forensic or clinical laboratory toxicology; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) A Ph.D. in one of the natural sciences with an adequate undergraduateand graduate education in biology, chemistry, and pharmacology or toxicology,or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Training and experience comparable to a Ph.D. in one of thenatural sciences, such as a medical or scientific degree with additionaltraining and laboratory/research experience in biology, chemistry, andpharmacology or toxicology, and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) In addition to the requirements in (i), (ii), and (iii) above,minimum qualifications also require: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Appropriate experience in analytical forensic toxicology includingexperience with the analysis of biological material for drugs of abuse;and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Appropriate training and/or experience in forensic applicationsof analytical toxicology, e.g., publications, court testimony, researchconcerning analytical toxicology of drugs of abuse, or other factors whichqualify the individual as an expert witness in forensic toxicology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) This individual shall be engaged in and responsible for the day-to-daymanagement of the testing laboratory even where another individual hasoverall responsibility for an entire multispecialty laboratory. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) This individual shall be responsible for ensuring that there areenough personnel with adequate training and experience to supervise andconduct the work of their testing laboratories. He or she shall assurethe continued competency of laboratory personnel by documenting their inservicetraining, reviewing their work performance, and verifying their skills.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) This individual shall be responsible for the laboratory's havinga procedure manual which is complete, up-to-date, available for personnelperforming tests, and followed by those personnel. The procedure manualshall be reviewed, signed, and dated by this responsible individual wheneverprocedures are first placed into use or changed or when a new individualassumes responsibility for management of the laboratory. Copies of allprocedures and dates on which they are in effect shall be maintained. (Specificcontents of the procedure manual are described in Section 2.7(0) of thisappendix). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) This individual shall be responsible for maintaining a qualityassurance program to assure the proper performance and reporting of alltest results; for maintaining acceptable analytical performance for allcontrols and standards; for maintaining quality control testing; and forassuring and documenting the validity, reliability, accuracy, precision,and performance characteristics of each test and test system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) This individual shall be responsible for taking all remedial actionsnecessary to maintain satisfactory operation and performance of the laboratoryin response to quality control systems not being within performance specifications,errors in result reporting or in analysis of performance testing results.This individual shall ensure that test results are not reported until allcorrective actions have been taken and he or she can assure that the testresults provided are accurate and reliable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) ``Test Validation.'' The laboratory's urine drug testing facilityshall have a qualified individual(s) who reviews all pertinent data andquality control results in order to attest to the validity of the laboratory'stest reports. A laboratory may designate more than one person to performthis function. This individual(s) may be any employee who is qualifiedto be responsible for day-to-day management or operation of the drug testinglaboratory. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) ``Day-to-Day Operations and Supervision of Analysts.'' The laboratory'surine drug testing facility shall have an individual to be responsiblefor day-to-day operations and to supervise the technical analysts. Thisindividual(s) shall have at least a bachelor's degree in the chemical orbiological sciences or medical technology or equivalent. He or she shallhave training and experience in the theory and practice of the proceduresused in the laboratory, resulting in his or her thorough understandingof quality control practices and procedures; the review, interpretation,and reporting of test results; maintenance of chain-of-custody; and properremedial actions to be taken in response to test systems being out of controllimits or detecting aberrant test or quality control results. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) ``Other Personnel.'' Other technicians or nontechnical staff shallhave the necessary training and skills for the tasks assigned. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) ``Training.'' The laboratory's testing program shall make availablecontinuing education programs to meet the needs of laboratory personnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) ``Files.'' Laboratory personnel files shall include: reandCx.174;1sumeandCx.174;1of training and experience; certification or license, if any; references;job descriptions; records of performance evaluation and advancement; incidentreports; and results of tests which establish employee competency for theposition he or she holds, such as a test for color blindness, if appropriate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.6 Licensee Testing Facility Personnel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) ``Day-to-Day Management of Operations.'' Any licensee testingfacility shall have an individual to be responsible for day-to-day operationsand to supervise the testing technicians. This individual(s) shall haveat least a bachelor's degree in the chemical or biological sciences ormedical technology or equivalent. He or she shall have training and experiencein the theory and practice of the procedures used in the licensee testingfacility, resulting in his or her thorough understanding of quality controlpractices and procedures; the review, interpretation, and reporting oftest results; and proper remedial actions to be taken in response to detectingaberrant test or quality control results. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) ``Other Personnel.'' Other technicians or nontechnical staff shallhave the necessary training and skills for the tasks assigned. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) ``Files.'' Licensees' testing facility personnel files shall include:reandCx.174;1sumeandCx.174;1 of training and experience; certification or license,if any; references; job descriptions; records of performance evaluationand advancement; incident reports; results of tests which establish employeecompetency for the position he or she holds, such as a test for color blindness,if appropriate and appropriate data to support determinations of honestyand integrity conducted in accordance with Section 2.3 of this appendix.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.7 Laboratory and Testing Facility Analysis Procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) ``Security and Chain-of-Custody.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) HHS-certified drug testing laboratories and any licensee testingfacility shall be secure at all times. They shall have in place sufficientsecurity measures to control access to the premises and to ensure thatno unauthorized personnel handle specimens or gain access to the laboratoryprocesses or to areas where records and split samples are stored. Accessto these secured areas shall be limited to specifically authorized individualswhose authorization is documented. All authorized visitors and maintenanceand service personnel shall be escorted at all times in the HHS-certifiedlaboratory and in the licensee's testing facility. Documentation of individualsaccessing these areas, dates, and times of entry and purpose of entry mustbe maintained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Laboratories and testing facilities shall use chain-of-custodyprocedures to maintain control and accountability of specimens from receiptthrough completion of testing, reporting of results, during storage, andcontinuing until final disposition of specimens. The date and purpose shallbe documented on an appropriate chain-of-custody form each time a specimenis handled or transferred, and every individual in the chain shall be identified.Accordingly, authorized technicians shall be responsible for each urinespecimen or aliquot in their possession and shall sign and complete chain-of-custodyforms for those specimens or aliquots as they are received. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) ``Receiving.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) When a shipment of specimens is received, laboratory and licensee'stesting facility personnel shall inspect each package for evidence of possibletampering and compare information on specimen containers within each packageto the information on the accompanying chain-of-custody forms. Any directevidence of tampering or discrepancies in the information on specimen containersand the licensee's chain-of-custody forms attached to the shipment shallbe reported within 24 hours to the licensee, in the case of HHS-certifiedlaboratories, and shall be noted on the laboratory's chain-of-custody formwhich shall accompany the specimens while they are in the laboratory'spossession. Indications of tampering with specimens at a testing facilityoperated by a licensee shall be reported within 8 hours to senior licenseemanagement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Specimen containers will normally be retained within the laboratory'sor testing facility's accession area until all analyses have been completed.Aliquots and the chain-of-custody forms shall be used by laboratory ortesting facility personnel for conducting initial and confirmatory tests,as appropriate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) ``Short-Term Refrigerated Storage.'' Specimens that do not receivean initial test within 7 days of arrival at the laboratory or are not shippedwithin 6 hours from the licensee's testing facility and any retained splitsamples shall be placed in secure refrigeration units. Temperatures shallnot exceed 6 anddegrees;C. Emergency power equipment shall be available incase of prolonged power failure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) ``Specimen Processing.'' Urine specimens identified as presumptivepositive by a licensee's testing facility shall be shipped to an HHS-certifiedlaboratory for testing. Laboratory facilities for drug testing will normallyprocess urine specimens by grouping them into batches. The number of specimensin each batch may vary significantly depending on the size of the laboratoryand its workload. When conducting either initial or confirmatory testsat either the licensee's testing facility or an HHS-certified laboratory,every batch shall contain an appropriate number of standards for calibratingthe instrumentation and a minimum of 10 percent controls. Both qualitycontrol and blind performance test samples shall appear as ordinary samplesto laboratory analysts. Special processing may be conducted to analyzespecimens suspected of being adulterated or diluted (including hydration).Any evidence of adulteration or dilution, and any detected trace amountsof drugs or metabolites, shall be reported to the Medical Review Officer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) ``Preliminary Initial Test.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) For the analysis of urine specimens, any preliminary test performedby a licensee's testing facility and the initial screening test performedby a HHS-certified laboratory shall use an immunoassay which meets therequirements of the Food and Drug Administration for commercial distribution.The initial test of breath for alcohol performed at the collection siteshall use a breath measurement device which meets the requirements of Section2.7(o)(3). The following initial cut-off levels shall be used when screeningspecimens to determine whether they are negative for the indicated substances:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Initial test cut-off level (ng/ml)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38"> Marijuana metabolites</ITAG>.....100 <ITAG tagnum="38">Cocaine metabolites</ITAG>.....300 <ITAG tagnum="38">Opiate metabolites</ITAG>.....300* <ITAG tagnum="38">Phencyclidine</ITAG>.....25 <ITAG tagnum="38">Amphetamines</ITAG>.....1,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Alcohol</ITAG>.....0.04% BAC<ITAG tagnum="21">*25 ng/ml is immunoassay specific for free morphine.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition, licensees may specify more stringent cutoff levels. Resultsshall be reported for both levels in such cases.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The list of substances to be tested and the cut-off levels aresubject to change by the NRC in response to industry experience and changesto the HHS Guidelines made by the Department of Health and Human Servicesas advances in technology, additional experience, or other considerationswarrant the inclusion of additional substances and other concentrationlevels. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) ``Confirmatory Test.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Specimens which test negative as a result of this second screeningshall be reported as negative to the licensee and will not be subject toany further testing unless special processing of the specimen is desiredbecause adulteration or dilution is suspected. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) All urine samples identified as presumptive positive on the screeningtest performed by a HHS-certified laboratory shall be confirmed using gaschromatography/mass spectrometry (GC/MS) techniques at the cut-off valueslisted in this paragraph for each drug, and at the cut-off values requiredby the licensee's unique program, where differences exist. All confirmationsshall be by quantitative analysis. Concentrations which exceed the linearregion of the standard curve shall be documented in the laboratory recordas ``greater than highest standard curve value.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Confirmatory test cut-off level (ng/ml)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Marijuana metabolite</ITAG>.....15* <ITAG tagnum="38">Cocaine metabolite</ITAG>.....150**<ITAG tagnum="20">Opiates: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38"> Morphine</ITAG>.....300 <ITAG tagnum="38"> Codeine</ITAG>.....300<ITAG tagnum="38">Phencyclidine</ITAG>.....25 <ITAG tagnum="20">Amphetamines: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38"> Amphetamine</ITAG>.....500 <ITAG tagnum="38"> Methamphetamine</ITAG>.....500<ITAG tagnum="38">Alcohol</ITAG>.....0.04% BAC<ITAG tagnum="21">*Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol-9-carboxylic acid.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">**Benzoylecgonine.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition, licensees may specify more stringent cut-off levels.Results shall be reported for both levels in such cases.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The analytic procedure for confirmatory analysis of blood specimensvoluntarily provided by individuals testing positive for alcohol on a breathtest shall be gas chromatography analysis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The list of substances to be tested and the cut-off levels aresubject to change by the NRC in response to industry experience and changesto the HHS Guidelines made by the Department of Health and Human Servicesas advances in technology, additional experience, or other considerationswarrant the inclusion of additional substances and other concentrationlevels. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Confirmatory tests for opiates shall include a test for 6-monoacetylmorphine(MAM) if the screening test is presumptive positive for morphine. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) ``Reporting Results.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The HHS-certified laboratory shall report test results to thelicensee's Medical Review Officer within 5 working days after receipt ofthe specimen by the laboratory. Before any test result is reported (theresults of initial tests, confirmatory tests, or quality control data),it shall be reviewed and the test certified as an accurate report by theresponsible individual at the laboratory. The report shall identify thesubstances tested for, whether positive or negative, the cut-off(s) foreach, the specimen number assigned by the licensee, and the drug testinglaboratory specimen identification number. The results (positive and negative)for all specimens submitted at the same time to the laboratory shall bereported back to the Medical Review Officer at the same time when possible.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The HHS-certified laboratory and any licensee testing facilityshall report as negative all specimens, except suspect specimens beinganalyzed under special processing, which are negative on the initial testor negative on the confirmatory test. Specimens testing positive on theconfirmatory analysis shall be reported positive for a specific substance.Presumptive positive results of preliminary testing at the licensee's testingfacility will not be reported to licensee management. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The Medical Review Officer may routinely obtain from the HHS-certifiedlaboratory, and the laboratory shall provide, quantitation of test results.The Medical Review Officer may only disclose quantitation of test resultsfor an individual to licensee management, if required in an appeals process,or to the individual under the provisions of Section 3.2. (This does notpreclude the provision of program performance data under the provisionsof 10 CFR 26.71(d).) Quantitation of negative tests for urine specimensshall not be disclosed, except where deemed appropriate by the MedicalReview Officer for proper disposition of the results of tests of suspectspecimens. Alcohol quantitation for a blood specimen shall be providedto licensee management with the Medical Review Officer's evaluation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The laboratory may transmit results to the Medical Review Officerby various electronic means (e.g., teleprinters, facsimile, or computer)in a manner designed to ensure confidentiality of the information. Resultsmay not be provided verbally by telephone from HHS-certified laboratorypersonnel to the Medical Review Officer. The HHS-certified laboratory mustensure the security of the data transmission and limit access to any datatransmission, storage, and retrieval system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) The laboratory shall send only to the Medical Review Officer acertified copy of the original chain-of-custody form signed by the individualresponsible for day-to-day management of the drug testing laboratory orthe individual responsible for attesting to the validity of the test reportsand attached to which shall be a copy of the test report. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) The HHS-certified laboratory and the licensee's testing facilityshall provide to the licensee official responsible for coordination ofthe fitness-for-duty program a monthly statistical summary of urinalysisand blood testing and shall not include in the summary any personal identifyinginformation. Initial test data from the licensee's testing facility andthe HHS-certified laboratory, and confirmation data from HHS-certifiedlaboratories shall be included for test results reported within that month.Normally this summary shall be forwarded from HHS-certified laboratoriesby registered or certified mail and from the licensee's testing facilitynot more than 14 calendar days after the end of the month covered by thesummary. The summary shall contain the following information: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Initial Testing: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Number of specimens received; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Number of specimens reported out; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Number of specimens screened </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">positive for:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Marijuana metabolites </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cocaine metabolites </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Opiate metabolites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Phencyclidine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Amphetamines </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Alcohol</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Confirmatory Testing: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Number of specimens received for confirmation; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Number of specimens confirmed positive for:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Marijuana metabolite </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cocaine metabolite </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Morphine, codeine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Phencyclidine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Amphetamine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Methamphetamine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Alcohol</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) The statistics shall be presented for both the cut-off levelsin these guidelines and any more stringent cut-off levels which licenseesmay specify. The HHS-certified laboratory and the licensee's testing facilityshall make available quantitative results for all samples tested when requestedby the NRC or the licensee for which the laboratory is performing drugtesting services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Unless otherwise instructed by the licensee in writing, all recordspertaining to a given urine or blood specimen shall be retained by theHHS-certified drug testing laboratory and the licensee's testing facilityfor a minimum of 2 years. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) ``Long-Term Storage.'' Long-term frozen storage (^20 anddegrees;Cor less) ensures that positive urine specimens will be available for anynecessary retest during administrative or disciplinary proceedings. Unlessotherwise authorized in writing by the licensee, HHS-certified laboratoriesshall retain and place in properly secured long-term frozen storage fora minimum of 1 year all specimens confirmed positive. Within this 1-yearperiod a licensee or the NRC may request the laboratory to retain the specimenfor an additional period of time, but if no such request is received, thelaboratory may discard the specimen after the end of 1 year, except thatthe laboratory shall be required to maintain any specimens under legalchallenge for an indefinite period. Any split samples retained by the licenseeshall be transferred into long-term storage upon determination by the MedicalReview Officer that the specimen has a confirmed positive test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) ``Retesting Specimens.'' Because some analytes deteriorate orare lost during freezing and/or storage, quantitation for a retest is notsubject to a specific cut-off requirement but must provide data sufficientto confirm the presence of the drug or metabolite. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(j) ``Split Samples.'' Urine specimens may be split, at the licensee'sdiscretion, into two parts at the collection site. One half of such samples(hereafter called the aliquot) shall be analyzed by the licensee's testingfacility or the HHS-certified laboratory for the licensee's purposes asdescribed in this appendix. The other half of the sample (hereafter calledthe split sample) may be withheld from transfer to the laboratory, sealed,and stored in a secure manner by the licensee until the aliquot has beendetermined to be negative or until the positive result of a screening testhas been confirmed. As soon as the aliquot has tested negative, the splitsample in storage may be destroyed. If the aliquot tests positive by confirmatorytesting, then, at the tested individual's request, the split sample maybe forwarded on that day to another HHS-certified laboratory that did nottest the aliquot. The chain-of-custody and testing procedures to whichthe split sample is subject, shall be the same as those used to test theinitial aliquot and shall meet the standards for retesting specimens [Section2.7(i)]. The quantitative results of any second testing process shall bemade available to the Medical Review Officer and to the individual tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(k) ``Subcontracting.'' HHS-certified laboratories shall not subcontractand shall perform all work with their own personnel and equipment unlessotherwise authorized by the licensee. The laboratory must be capable ofperforming testing of the five classes of drugs (marijuana, cocaine, opiates,phencyclidine, and amphetamines) and of whole blood and confirmatory GC/MSmethods specified in these guidelines. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``Laboratory Facilities.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) HHS-certified laboratories shall comply with applicable provisionsof any State licensure requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) HHS-certified laboratories shall have the capability, at the samelaboratory premises, of performing initial tests for each drug and drugmetabolite for which service is offered, and for performing confirmatorytests for alcohol and for each drug and drug metabolite for which serviceis offered. Any licensee testing facilities shall have the capability,at the same premises, of performing initial screening tests for each drugand drug metabolite for which testing is conducted. Breath tests for alcoholmay be performed at the collection site.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(m) ``Inspections.'' The NRC and any licensee utilizing an HHS-certifiedlaboratory shall reserve the right to inspect the laboratory at any time.Licensee contracts with HHS-certified laboratories for drug testing andalcohol confirmatory testing, as well as contracts for collection siteservices, shall permit the NRC and the licensee to conduct unannouncedinspections. In addition, prior to the award of a contract, the licenseeshall carry out pre-award inspections and evaluation of the proceduralaspects of the laboratory's drug testing operation. The NRC shall reservethe right to inspect a licensee's testing facility at any time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(n) ``Documentation.'' HHS-certified laboratories and the licensee'stesting facility shall maintain and make available for at least 2 yearsdocumentation of all aspects of the testing process. This 2-year periodmay be extended upon written notification by the NRC or by any licenseefor which laboratory services are being provided. The required documentationshall include personnel files on all individuals authorized to have accessto specimens; chain-of-custody documents; quality assurance/quality controlrecords; procedure manuals; all test data (including calibration curvesand any calculations used in determining test results); reports; performancerecords on performance testing; performance on certification inspections;and hard copies of computer-generated data. The HHS-certified laboratoryand the licensee's testing facility shall be required to maintain documentsfor any specimen under legal challenge for an indefinite period. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(o) ``Additional Requirements for HHS-certified Laboratories and Licensee'sTesting Facilities.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``Procedure manual.'' Each laboratory and licensee's testing facilityshall have a procedure manual which includes the principles of each test,preparation of reagents, standards and controls, calibration procedures,derivation of results, linearity of methods, sensitivity of the methods,cutoff values, mechanisms for reporting results, controls, criteria forunacceptable specimens and results, remedial actions to be taken when thetest systems are outside of acceptable limits, reagents and expirationdates, and references. Copies of all procedures and dates on which theyare in effect shall be maintained as part of the manual. Superseded materialmust be retained for three years. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) ``Standards and controls.'' HHS-certified laboratory standardsshall be prepared with pure drug standards which are properly labeled asto content and concentration. The standards shall be labeled with the followingdates: when received; when prepared or opened; when placed in service;and expiration date. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) ``Instruments and equipment.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Volumetric pipettes and measuring devices shall be certified foraccuracy or be checked by gravimetric, colorimetric, or other verificationprocedure. Automatic pipettes and dilutors shall be checked for accuracyand reproducibility before being placed in service and checked periodicallythereafter. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Alcohol breath analysis equipment shall be an evidental-gradebreath alcohol analysis device of a brand and model that conforms to NationalHighway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) standards (49 FR 48855) andto any applicable State statutes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) There shall be written procedures for instrument set-up andnormal operation, a schedule for checking critical operating characteristicsfor all instruments, tolerance limits for acceptable function checks, andinstructions for major troubleshooting and repair. Records shall be availableon preventive maintenance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) ``Remedial actions.'' There shall be written procedures for theactions to be taken when systems are out of acceptable limits or errorsare detected. There shall be documentation that these procedures are followedand that all necessary corrective actions are taken. There shall also bein place systems to verify all stages of testing and reporting and documentationthat these procedures are followed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) ``Personnel available to testify at proceedings.'' The licensee'stesting facility and HHS-certified laboratory shall have qualified personnelavailable to testify in an administrative or disciplinary proceeding againstan individual when that proceeding is based on positive breath analysisor urinalysis results reported by the licensee's testing facility or theHHS-certified laboratory. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.8 Quality Assurance and Quality Control. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) ``General.'' HHS-certified laboratories and the licensee's testingfacility shall have a quality assurance program which encompasses all aspectsof the testing process including but not limited to specimen acquisition,chain-of-custody, security, reporting of results, initial and confirmatorytesting, and validation of analytical procedures. Quality assurance proceduresshall be designed, implemented, and reviewed to monitor the conduct ofeach step of the process of testing for drugs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) ``Licensee's Testing Facility Quality Control Requirements forInitial Tests.'' Because all positive preliminary tests for drugs are forwardedto an HHS-certified laboratory for screening and confirmatory testing whenappropriate, the NRC does not require licensees to assess their testingfacility's false positive rates for drugs. To ensure that the rate of falsenegative tests is kept to the minimum that the immunoassay technology supports,licensees shall process blind performance test specimens and submit a samplingof specimens screened as negative from every test run to the HHS-certifiedlaboratory. In addition, the manufacturer-required performance tests ofthe breath analysis equipment used by the licensee shall be conducted asset forth in the manufacturer's specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) ``Laboratory Quality Control Requirements for Initial Tests atHHS-Certified Laboratories.'' Each analytical run of specimens to be screenedshall include: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Urine specimens certified to contain no drug; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Urine specimens fortified with known standards; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Positive controls with the drug or metabolite at or near the threshold(cut-off). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition, with each batch of samples, a sufficient number of standardsshall be included to ensure and document the linearity of the assay methodover time in the concentration area of the cut-off. After acceptable valuesare obtained for the known standards, those values will be used to calculatesample data. Implementation of procedures to ensure that carryover doesnot contaminate the testing of an individual's specimen shall be documented.A minimum of 10 percent of all test samples shall be quality control specimens.Laboratory quality control samples, prepared from spiked urine samplesof determined concentration, shall be included in the run and should appearas normal samples to laboratory analysts. One percent of each run, witha minimum of at least one sample, shall be the laboratory's own qualitycontrol samples. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) ``Laboratory Quality Control Requirements for Confirmation Tests.''Each analytical run of specimens to be confirmed shall include: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Urine specimens certified to contain no drug; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Urine specimens fortified with known standards; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Positive controls with the drug or metabolite at or near the threshold(cut-off).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The linearity and precision of the method shall be periodically documented.Implementation of procedures to ensure that carryover does not contaminatethe testing of an individual's specimen shall also be documented. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) ``Licensee Blind Performance Test Procedures.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Licensees shall purchase chemical testing services only from laboratoriescertified by DHHS or a DHHS-recognized certification program in accordancewith the HHS Guidelines. Laboratory participation is encouraged in otherperformance testing surveys by which the laboratory's performance is comparedwith peers and reference laboratories. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) During the initial 90-day period of any new drug testing program,each licensee shall submit blind performance test specimens to each HHS-certifiedlaboratory it contracts within the amount of at least 50 percent of thetotal number of samples submitted (up to a maximum of 500 samples) andthereafter a minimum of 10 percent of all samples (to a maximum of 250)submitted per quarter. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Approximately 80 percent of the blind performance test samplesshall be blank (i.e., certified to contain no drug) and the remaining samplesshall be positive for one or more drugs per sample in a distribution suchthat all the drugs to be tested are included in approximately equal frequenciesof challenge. The positive samples shall be spiked only with those drugsfor which the licensee is testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The licensee shall investigate, or shall refer to DHHS for investigation,any unsatisfactory performance testing result, and based on this investigation,the laboratory shall take action to correct the cause of the unsatisfactoryperformance test result. A record shall be made of the investigative findingsand the corrective action taken by the laboratory, and that record shallbe dated and signed by the individuals responsible for the day-to-day managementand operation of the HHS-certified laboratory. Then the licensee shallsend the document to the NRC as a report of the unsatisfactory performancetesting incident within 30 days. The NRC shall ensure notification of thefinding to DHHS. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Should a false positive error occur on a blind performance testspecimen and the error is determined to be an administrative error (clerical,sample mixup, etc.), the licensee shall promptly notify the NRC. The licenseesshall require the laboratory to take corrective action to minimize theoccurrence of the particular error in the future; and, if there is reasonto believe the error could have been systematic, the licensee may alsorequire review and reanalysis of previously run specimens. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Should a false positive error occur on a blind performance testspecimen and the error is determined to be a technical or methodologicalerror, the licensee shall instruct the laboratory to submit to them allquality control data from the batch of specimens which included the falsepositive specimen. In addition, the licensee shall require the laboratoryto retest all specimens analyzed positive for that drug or metabolite fromthe time of final resolution of the error back to the time of the lastsatisfactory performance test cycle. This retesting shall be documentedby a statement signed by the individual responsible for day-to-day managementof the laboratory's substance testing program. The licensee and the NRCmay require an on-site review of the laboratory which may be conductedunannounced during any hours of operation of the laboratory. Based on informationprovided by the NRC, DHHS has the option of revoking or suspending thelaboratory's certification or recommending that no further action be takenif the case is one of less serious error in which corrective action hasalready been taken, thus reasonably assuring that the error will not occuragain. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.9 Reporting and Review of Results</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) ``Medical Review Officer shall review results.'' An essentialpart of the licensees' testing programs is the final review of results.A positive test result does not automatically identify a nuclear powerplant worker as having used substances in violation of the NRC's regulationsor the licensee's company policies. An individual with a detailed knowledgeof possible alternate medical explanations is essential to the review ofresults. This review shall be performed by the Medical Review Officer priorto the transmission of results to licensee management officials. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) ``Medical Review Officer_qualifications and responsibilities.''The Medical Review Officer shall be a licensed physician with knowledgeof substance abuse disorders and may be a licensee or contract employee.The role of the Medical Review Officer is to review and interpret positivetest results obtained through the licensee's testing program. In carryingout this responsibility, the Medical Review Officer shall examine alternatemedical explanations for any positive test result (this does not includeconfirmation of blood alcohol levels obtained through the use of a breathalcohol anaylsis device). This action could include conducting a medicalinterview with the  individual, review of the individual's medical history,or review of any other relevant biomedical factors. The Medical ReviewOfficer shall review all medical records made available by the tested individualwhen a confirmed positive test could have resulted from legally prescribedmedication. The Medical Review Officer shall not consider the results oftests that are not obtained or processed in accordance with these Guidelines,although he or she may consider the results of tests on split samples inmaking his or her determination, as long as those split samples have beenstored and tested in accordance with the procedures described in theseGuidelines. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) ``Positive Test Results.'' Prior to making a final decision toverify a positive test result, the Medical Review Officer shall give theindividual an opportunity to discuss the test result with him or her. Followingverification of a positive test result, the Medical Review Officer shall,as provided in the licensee's policy, notify the applicable employee assistanceprogram and the licensee's management official empowered to recommend ortake administrative action (or the official's designated agent). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) ``Verification for opiates; review for prescription medication.''Before the Medical Review Officer verifies a confirmed positive resultand the licensee takes action for opiates, he or she shall determine thatthere is clinical evidence_in addition to the urine test_of unauthorizeduse of any opium, opiate, or opium derivative (e.g., morphine/codeine).Clinical signs of abuse include recent needle tracks or behavioral andpsychological signs of acute opiate intoxication or withdrawal. This requirementdoes not apply if the GC/MS confirmation testing for opiates confirms thepresence of 6-monoacetylmorphine. For other drugs that are commonly prescribedor commonly included in over-the-counter preparations (e.g., benzodiazepinesin the first case, barbiturates in the second) and that are listed in thelicensee's panel of substances to be tested, the Medical Review Officershall also determine whether there is clinical evidence_in addition tothe urine test_of unauthorized use of any of these substances or theirderivatives. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) ``Reanalysis authorized.'' Should any question arise as to theaccuracy or validity of a positive test result, only the Medical ReviewOfficer is authorized to order a reanalysis of the original sample andsuch retests are authorized only at laboratories certified by DHHS. TheMedical Review Officer shall authorize a reanalysis of the original aliquoton timely request of the individual tested, and shall also authorize ananalysis of any sample stored by the licensee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) ``Results consistent with responsible substance use.'' If theMedical  Review Officer determines that there is a legitimate medical explanationfor the positive test result and that use of the substance identified throughtesting in the manner and at the dosage prescribed does not reflect a lackof reliability and is unlikely to create on-the-job impairment, the MedicalReview Officer shall report the test result to the licensee as negative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) ``Result scientifically insufficient.'' Additionally, the MedicalReview Officer, based on review of inspection reports, quality controldata, multiple samples, and other pertinent results, may determine thatthe result is scientifically insufficient for further action and declarethe test specimen negative. In this situation, the Medical Review Officermay request reanalysis of the original sample before making this decision.(The Medical Review Officer may request that reanalysis be performed bythe same laboratory or, that an aliquot of the original specimen be sentfor reanalysis to an alternate laboratory which is certified in accordancewith the HHS Guidelines.) The licensee's testing facility and the HHS-certifiedlaboratory shall assist in this review process as requested by the MedicalReview Officer by making available the individual(s) responsible for day-to-daymanagement of the licensee's test facility, of the HHS-certified laboratoryor other individuals who are forensic toxicologists or who have equivalentforensic experience in urine drug testing, to provide specific consultationas required by the licensee. The licensee shall maintain records that summarizeany negative findings based on scientific insufficiency and shall makethem available to the NRC on request, but shall not include any personalidentifying information in such reports. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart C_Employee Protection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">3.1 Protection of Employee Records </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Licensee contracts with HHS certified laboratories and proceduresfor the licensee's testing facility shall require that test records bemaintained in confidence, as provided in 10 CFR 26.29. Records shall bemaintained and used with the highest regard for individual privacy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">3.2 Individual Access to Test and Laboratory Certification Results</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Any individual who is the subject of a drug or alcohol test underthis part shall, upon written request, have access to any records relatingto his or her tests and any records relating to the results of any relevantlaboratory certification, review, or revocation-of-certification proceedings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Subpart D_Certification of Laboratories Engaged in Chemical Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">4.1 Use of DHHS-certified laboratories </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Licensees subject to this part and their contractors shall useonly laboratories certified under the DHHS ``Mandatory Guidelines for FederalWorkplace Drug Testing Programs'', Subpart C_``Certification of LaboratoriesEngaged in Urine Drug Testing for Federal Agencies,'' (53 FR 11970, 11986-11989)dated April 11, 1988, and subsequent amendments thereto for screening andconfirmatory testing except for initial screening tests at a licensee'stesting facility conducted in accordance with 10 CFR 26.24(d). Informationconcerning the current certification status of laboratories is availablefrom: The Office of Workplace Initiatives, National Institute on Drug Abuse,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, Maryland 20857. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Licensees or their contractors may use only HHS-certified laboratoriesthat agree to follow the same rigorous chemical testing, quality control,and chain-of-custody procedures when testing for more stringent cut-offlevels as may be specified by licensees for the classes of drugs identifiedin this Part, for analysis of blood specimens for alcohol, and for anyother substances included in licensees' drug panels.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, MD this 24th day of May, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For The Nuclear Regulatory Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John C. Hoyle,  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Secretary of the Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-12806 Filed 6-6-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>